"Hmm. Well, apparently 100% of 23 year olds think any kind of sex is ok. 100% of 24 year olds think casual sex is the gateway drug to Satan. 100% of 25 year olds think casual sex is ok. Hmm. *Inconclusive data* on 26 year olds. 27 year olds are completely split down the middle..."
&gt; Here are my questions for you: What do you think of his position on Kosovo? Do you agree? What do you think of his position on Afghanistan? Do you agree? What do you think of his defense of the Khmer Rouge? Do you agree? Have you read "American Power and the New Mandarins?" I have no idea, since I haven't read anything by him on these issues.  Now that you've given me pointers, I'll see what I can find. 
You had me at "voluptuous"... :'-}
Dang guys, this one long thread! I did not read past the first word of my post so i have no idea what i am writing. The line break is going icky-icky-icky-ptwanngowwww
I wish I could agree with your reasoning, but there is a hole in it: it is possible that the prayer itself demonstrates some sort of "help receptivity".  Since there are 2 variables here- the fact that people were praying vs. doing something otherwise useful with that chunk of time and the fact that they prayed as opposed to not praying - it is, I think, impossible to say anything about a God's motives in acting on the prayers without controlling for all other behavior.  Controlling for that much behavior is probably unfeasible. More generally, I think there are far better arguments to make against the religious than to say "your god would be a jerk if he existed".
That is a very poorly written article.   It is entirely composed of one-sentence paragraphs with no transitions or indication of any coherent thought behind the writing. Why is the complex on Salamis thought to be associated with Aias? The article sugar-coats Aias's character.  Aias the Greater is from Salamis, but the article doesn't tell us. Where's the angry suicide we love? 
I have a **p**atent **p**ending on the letter **P**, so if eru lans to atent the otato, they'd better **p**ay up **p**rom**p**tly....
Pfft.  Everyone knows only nice people found companies!
OK, is my point clear now?
Damn web 2.0. It's a calculator. Just a calculator. Something someone could throw together in a day. Any we're supposed to be impressed?!
QuicklyBored.com review of the latest game from Magmic. It's something that all BlackBerry users should check out if they like games. The review is pretty funny, too.
Hmmm, number 4 is a lot like my [halfbakery](http://halfbakery.com) submission: [slap-bracelet cell phone](http://www.halfbakery.com/idea/Slap_20Bracelet_20Cell_20Phone).
Not to go all Hugh Hewitt, but this is another example of how bad the mainstream media is. This isn't even political, as one of the examples is ESPN. Much of the current MSM is full of incompetent people who just steal from others to further their careers and have so far gotten away with it. The next ten years will see lots more stories like this one and the people involved will be shaken out of prominent positions.  Will that be due to blogs? Yes and no. Yes, it will be driven by blog reporting/criticism, or possibly some successor software to the blogging model. No, it is really due to the nature of the internet in general. At some level the net can be thought of as a huge annotation system for the world. Blogs are a great way of doing that annotation, but the net will probably get something better in time.  On the internet, anyone can figure out you're a plagarist.
It took me a second to realize that this: http://www.huffingtonpost.com/larisa-alexandrovna/msm-plagiarism-strikes-ag_b_17873.html was the link I wanted to follow from this blog entry.
Read this: http://www.newtimesbpb.com/Issues/2006-03-09/news/feature_full.html And just in case you don't want to, there is no afterlife. It is just wishful thinking. When you die, your brain shuts down and you're DEAD. No sensory perception or conciousness. So the answer to your question "IF" is: no.
The notion of cold fusion has been around since the late 1940s, propounded by none other than Andrei Sakharov.  It's nothing more than a neat curiousity, though.   What P&amp;F were claiming was utter nonsense.  When their claims came out, I was an undergraduate physics student; the consensus we reached was that if their set-up was producing the energy they claimed, the neutrons released by the reaction would have killed everyone in the building.
Ha! How about "you are wearing clothes, or a loincloth, or perhaps body paint". :) 
Love? A soul? To be a real boy?
I rather doubt that it is true, but I have read a few accounts of Crusaders who would convert people at swordpoint, and then kill them before they could renounce their, um "newfound faith".  The freakish thing about this is that it looks sensible, even altruistic, if you make the assumptions the guys with swords did.  They knew, of course, that the conversion was insincere, but thought that the ritual was what mattered, and that as long as the person did not recant before dying, they would go to heaven.  The converter would be guilty of murder, of course, but on the positive side, they would send a bunch of otherwise damned infidels to paradise, so it's a net win. In a similar vein, it is pretty easy to argue that there should be one person in every church whose job it is to kill people who are starting to have doubts about their faith, if the lapsing rate is high enough.  One person has a bunch of sins that he maybe can get forgiven, and a bunch of people are spared the risk of lapsing from the church and ending up in hell. Obviously, very few or no churches do this.  That is a good thing, but I don't understand why it does not happen.  I love my family, and I hope I am brave enough to die to protect them.  If I thought that they could end up in eternal punishment for lapsing from a true faith that we both held, and that I could save them from hell by committing the terrible sin of killing them, how could I not do so? Is it that the doubts themselves are enough to keep people out of heaven, so that by the time you can see that your brother is doubting, it's already too late? In an attempt to forestall heated responses, I want to make clear: approximately 0% of religious people pre-emptively kill possible sinners to save them from sin, and I'm glad they don't.  My question is why not, and I really don't know. -do people who doubt but who have not yet renounced or lost their faith still go to heaven?   -where do people who have lost their faith but not done any sins yet go?   
Anxious to know if there's psilocybine in them.....
No, no... only in the Super mushrooms... the red ones that make you think you're twice as tall and attempt to break bricks with your fist and head...
Too Precious!
There is a better article at the George Mason University web site.
Not to mention the Bridges of Konigsberg problem... Real Men just swim across...
Never get lost on Jupiter again! :-)
Yes, true, but that monsterous Amazon billboard plopped right in the middle there just looks tacky.  And the placement suggests that the image is related to the content; oh wait, I see, I'm merely being tricked into paying more attention to the ad. Leaves a sour taste, that's all.
George Carlin, by the way. At least, most commonly.
...in a highly controlled environment?
In the subject of guilds, the behaviour Paul describes was a later development. In their earlier days, guilds were a liberating force, similar to unionisation, that allowed craftspeople to escape the control of the nobility and make their own living. The corruption produced by power - which was also seen in the unions in the UK during the 1970s - came later, once the Guilds had made all their founders the equivalent of the nobility. It's actually tempting to look on the Guilds as a positive force for humanity and to consider open source communities as their modern equivalents... Also in that section, the assertion that Freemasonry is the descendent of the craft guilds is suspect - see the History section on Wikipedia, http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Freemasons
Do you really dare to trust any news source that much?  Isn't that why you browse reddit?   For instance, take this *poorly* researched article on the [limitations of FL/OSS, and open content](http://www.economist.com/business/displaystory.cfm?story_id=5624944).  I say poorly-researched because I also read this [response and inside view of the article's research on Groklaw.](http://www.groklaw.net/articlebasic.php?story=20060317090404388)  I also say poorly-researched because I know that the following quote from the Economist article is flat-out crap: &gt;As problems of vandalism, prejudice and inaccuracy ensued, Mr Wales was reluctant to clamp down. In the end, he had to. The site has set down policies to mediate debates; it has banished unco-operative contributors; it locked down entries that were frequently vandalised (such as one on George Bush)—changes come only from contributors who are designated as leaders on the strength of their work. A blunt new policy was promulgated: “Don't be a dick.” And after the furore over the biographical entry last year, Wikipedia changed its rules so that only registered users can edit existing entries, and new contributors must wait a few days before they can start new ones. Seriously now.  The ENTIRE paragraph is a misrepresentation. Factually, it's flawed in several places.  Try editing Wikipedia articles anonymously; you can.  It was the creation of new articles which was restricted.  ["Don't be a dick" is an ideal, not a policy, but an anti-policy](http://meta.wikimedia.org/wiki/Don%27t_be_a_dick). The implication of this quote is that Wikipedia, and in the rest of the article, "open source" in general, are doomed to eventual failure because they cannot properly regulate themselves and cannot encourage the competition which is "necessary" for economic success.  Instead of offering evidence that this is actually the case, the anonymous editor who penned the piece merely implies it.  The author implies that Wikipedia will fail because vandalism forces it to clamp down, which could just as easily imply that the problem of open source is *merely* one of organization and coherence, and in that a problem that may be addressed by the careful application of some of the oldest organizational principles around.  Placed in the context of doom and gloom forecasting, these poorly-researched, or merely spoofed, "facts" lead the reader to a conclusion which has little to do with reality. The strangest part of all this is that Economist articles *have no named authors*.  This writer can thus scribe pages of factual inaccuracies and misrepresentations without the potential reprecussions associated with a stated identity.  Readers will not know whose articles to avoid in the future.  They will not know who to contact to talk about the problems of this work. And this, my friend, demonstrates the manner in which your beloved magazine cannot deal with problems close to its heart.  For, even anonymous editors on Wikipedia are named, if only by their ip addresses.  Devoid of this simple level of accountability, its writers can get away with the subtle equivalent of journalistic murder---poor and misleading research and representation---without the possibility of being truly nabbed for the deed. Only in the realm of traditional finance and economics would I ever trust that magazine.  Ultimately, I'm not even sure I could go that far; I'll never know who I'm trusting.
This is a better, though still not excellent article on the discovery that I found later - it actually quotes the archaeologist a bit, and does refer in passing to the suicide:  http://www.baltimoresun.com/news/health/bal-hs.ajax31mar31,0,2539784.story?coll=bal-health-headlines I don't think that any MSM article on the discovery of ancient ruins of interest is going to do a great job since our education system has essentially abandoned the classics.  Most reporters just couldn't write knowledgeably about it.
The example you link to in that paragraph isn't ideal by the way; the conflict between Azul and Sun has a whole lot to do with Azul's CEO and is not typical of Sun's behaviour. The Kodak suit against all and sundry over OO techniques might be a better example...
Ahh, you're right judgmentalist... USC's Online Journalism Review doesn't deserve the traffic ;-)
It wasn't that I thought it was linkjacking or anything, I was just confused about where to go for the goods. Their layout and wording conspired to baffle me to peices.
Well the rant tries to be funny, but it isn't
Right, since everybody had perfect health back in the good old days before industry, these problems people have now are clearly the result of industrial chemicals infiltrating every aspect of our lives. The proof is what these unchecked chemicals (and patching people up with drugs instead of addressing the cause of the problem) have done to our lifespan. No... wait... :) Your views are precisely the unfounded 'negative britain' the article was focusing on. Simply restating them doesn't make them founded. Your feeling that we'll see effects real soon now is based on what? Did you know the rate of *occurance* for many cancers is going down? Likely a few of these chemicals will reduce our health, though it would seem not as much as other aspects of our lives are increasing it. Perhaps it's because we stopped taking plant extracts (selected on anecdotal experience), each a natural concoction of hundreds of unknown drugs, hormones, carcinogens and chemicals to fix our ailments?   (ie drugs are not new, what is new is knowing what's in them and what they do) One thing is clear, the real world evidence is not supporting your worldview, and that is what the article was about.
LOL!
Haha!  Good one!
[eshell](http://www.emacswiki.org/cgi-bin/wiki/CategoryEshell), the Emacs shell, can do this too.
Well, not really. Those studies are published first and then reported to the media... and studies that demonstrate global warming certainly have been verified in peer-reviewed journals.
It's a variation on the old "I'm rich, so why would I steal" defense. Of course, people wouldn't use it if it didn't work sometimes.
Thanks for the clarification. I really need to read more law stuff, at least before posting questions related to court cases.
I was certain this was an April Fools joke, but [maybe not](http://www.ryanair.com/site/EN/).
I think you've got the right approach here. Paul correctly observes that the dividing line between software and hardware for patentability is vanishingly small and diffuse, so the problems associated with reforming the *granting* of patents so that software is excluded seem vanishingly small. But there's certainly scope to control the *use* of patents once issued. So a short list: * Making exercise depend on implementation by the patent holder (your idea). This also deals with trolls. * On a similar but differnt tack, require an openly published implementation to complement the patent before it can be enforced (so that society benefits from the invention, todays patents hold little of use to a programmer).  * Shorten the term of patents to be more suited to the volatility of today's technology market. * Prohibit enforcement of patents where interoperability is involved (protocols, interfaces etc). * Make standards trump patents - declare patents unenforceable against *de jure* standards.  * Make filing of a patent for which there exists prior art a felony Using measures like these, I believe most of the problems we all face from software patents could be effectively addressed without needing to go back and rework the grounds on which patents are considered for issue.
This is why you shouldn't be stupid enough to write specs, or write code to a spec. Write code, and see how it works, and fix it from there. Specs assume that the programmer is too stupid to be allowed to just write something that Does the Right Thing; and anything that assumes the programmer is stupid is doomed to create a lot of morons and assholes.  EDIT: Point taken that the article was actually about standards specs and not internal company specs; what I say here is clearly false for standards specs.
Or, to restate your point, the hypothetical god might give aid only to those who request it. This would exclude a whole class of apparently suitable recipients, for example, infants and the unconscious. And it would entail reviewing many entreaties from the unworthy. I fail to see the logic.  I think you are anthropomorphizing your god -- we humans entertain pleas for help because we understand that custom benefits us in several ways -- we may benefit from future aid ourselves, and it increases trust. We cannot, however, have such a relationship with any hypthetical omnipotent god. The mutual benefit is lost, for there is nothing we could do for him. On the contrary, the feel-good asking and receiving of prayer rings hollow -- for believers know they can owe god nothing in return.  I did not call anyone's god a "jerk" -- I was merely identifying an inconsistency in the Christian mythology -- the juxtaposition of vanity and prayer.
A good, free wiki system. New features are being added every month. I highly recommend checking it out if you have a project you would like to collaborate on.
Our marketing department has done extensive research over the last 3 quarters and discovered that our audience is strangely disproportionately skewed towards males. Like, 98.3% males to be precise. ....
Good post.  Just as a side note, I wanted to do a simple little test in R (http://www.r-project.org).  If we assume a null hypothesis that those who don't like the book at all ='s 0.15, even with a small sample of 2 it appears significant.  Just do: prop.test(2, 2, p=0.15, alternative="g") This tests against the alternative hypothesis that the proportion of those who don't like the book &gt; 15%.  A 95% confidence interval would seem to be between 24.8% and 100%. I'm not a statistician (not even close), so I'm not sure how accurate my "test" is; either way, seems useful though.  If we go to a sample of 10/10, the CI goes from 71.5% to 100%.  Take it for what it's worth - like I said, I'M NOT A STATISTICIAN :)
Why is this on *programming* reddit?
They missed the Apple III.
Right, let's toss the specs for tcp/ip, http, html, and xml straight away.  What idiots thought those were good ideas?  We're not stupid.  Let's each invent our own protocols and file formats that Do the Right Thing in each of those cases and see how far we get. In all seriousness, I agree with you in the general case.  Drawing up a strict spec for everything you code is rigid stupidity. But specs do have their place in the arena of data sharing and system interop.  Given that Mark was a big contributer to the Atom Syndication Format, I'd guess this is what he has in mind when he talks of specs.
&gt;Why is that worth mocking? Because you believe in an invisible fairy in the sky.
Its not something that is provable one way or another. The only wishful thinking is your own.
I'm willing to give it more time. However, I feel like the way it is set up there is the tendency for it to become one sided, with the most successful people constantly being asked for jobs and advice by everyone else. I think LinkedIn will acheive success faster if they can smooth this dynamic by coming up with ways for everyone to contribute to everyone else's success.
&gt; I don't see why Christians pray for good stuff to happen to them in life. If you believe that kooky shit, pray for judgment day to come sooner. And pray that everyone finds Jesus in time. I don't see why they wouldn't pray the heart transplant fails, if the patient was already a Christian. Because there still is this life. The next life is inifinitely more valuable, but that doesn't mean you are to neglect this one.
&gt; do people who doubt but who have not yet renounced or lost their faith still go to heaven? Biblically, yes. There's nothing wrong with doubt. What matters if your relationship with Christ. &gt; where do people who have lost their faith but not done any sins yet go? Find me that person who has committed no sins and I'll answer that question for you.
&gt;I expect we'll be forced to learn Mandarin because of sheer demographics and purchasing power. Isn't that a good enough reason? And there's always Esperanto.
Interesting thing is this: Python (at least in its C implementation) has more or less become the platform that Java was supposed to be - a virtual machine that allows you to "write once, run anywhere." Is also a relatively cruft-free language.
Hehe.... hahaha..... Oh my.... hoho....he... WAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA..... (*gasp*).....hahahahaha...... (*huff, huff*).... Wheeeeeeeeeeeeeeee!!!!!
Probably belongs on NSFW reddit, but this is too good not to mod up.
"Ryanair intends to offer in-flight gambling in 2007" Makes me wonder whether the attendants will offer lap-dances.
If you seriously think ALL developers are either morons or assholes, and a developer who can implement a spec in the real world is a complete fiction... you've got serious problems.  Look at your hiring practices, or review your dev process, or question honestly whether you might just be a frustrated asshole.   This rant would get an exemption from reality if it were funny or interesting, but it's just crap.  Take a vacation.
As a general rule, I don't read threads with more than 2 or 3 entries in them. And I sure as hell would *never* post to such a monstrosity. People who do that are just jerks.
No, to appeal to female users, not male. "to widen our appeal to these less active demographics."
Must reading for the abortion debate, regardless of which side you're on.
I just watched the documentary "Toxic Sludge is Good for You", which is about the PR industry and how they manipulate the media by planting stories made to look like news. Apparently they don't just release information, they create and produce entire "news stories" (video and print) designed to look like they have been produced by journalists, but in fact pushing some agenda on the part of a client of the PR firm. It's rampant, and shocking in its extent - you should see this if you haven't already. Well, looking at this story, my first reaction is now "Who wrote this, and more importantly, WHY?" Now, look at this article. At the top, it says "By TARA PARKER-POPE, Staff Reporter of THE WALL STREET JOURNAL". So this appears to lend it an air of legitimacy and authenticity, no? But look down at the bottom of the article, and it says this: "--Ms. Parker-Pope, who writes The Wall Street Journal's weekly Health Journal column, served as contributing editor of this report."... so what does THAT mean? Well, it means she didn't actually write the article. She "executive edited" it. And right at the bottom, in gray text, there's something else: "Copyright © 2006 Dow Jones &amp; Company, Inc.". Now, I really don't know how to interpret all this. Another thing that raises my suspicion, having just seen the Toxic Sludge documentary, is the picture on the article. This seems to be very carefully chosen to portray a woman looking very suspiciously at a shelf of vitamins, as if they might leap off up and attack her at any moment. There's a subliminal message there. So why would a drug company want to make vitamins look bad, and even dangerous? Well, perhaps because vitamins aren't OWNED by anybody. You can't patent a vitamin. But you can patent new drugs. Sorry, I don't know if this article is such a case, really. But I do know one thing: I will be looking at EVERY SINGLE news story that I see from now on with different eyes. The big question you have to ask when you see a news segment (even on your local channel, where this is actually the most common - they use these "video news releases" sometimes verbatim)... who benefits from this? When you see a story on how orange juice is good for you, presented as if it's an interesting health story, look at what brand is prominently featured (is it Tropicana?)...
Screenshotting for posterity. :)
&gt; ...there's always Esperanto. Proof that there's only *some* beauty in rigid structure. The rest of the beauty is in flow and expressive power. (The most incredible romantic writings are Italian, go figure...) Of course, English is the most prevalent language internationally, and it ain't because of either of these factors.
Looks like they are creating their website on the cheap, too.
I call bullshit. If the next life is infinitely more valuable, then *any* increase in quality of next-life outweighs *any* increase in quality of this-life, no matter what the size of either is. Therefore, if you believe the next-life stuff, your current life should be *solely* preoccupied with next-life maximization.  Now, granted, the sources on next-life-quality as a function of this-life-activity are conflicting, as are most other sources on anything to do with flying spaghetti monsters or variants thereof, but it seems clear that, given the existence of the next life, our only endeavor should be discovering and then maximizing the next-life-quality function.
Deb Talan and Steve Tannen form the Weepies. Their music is driven by Talan's gorgeous voice, with an increasing level of vocal involvement from Tannen along with his capable guitar playing. This is a great pair to see live as Talan's voice will captivate an audience.
Heh. Yeah, you're right. I was thinking of specs in the sense of we-MBAs-are-specifying-how-you-will-connect-our-OracleDB-to-our-website, rather than the standard specifications. Although for clarity, maybe we could call the things managers write specs, and call the things Turing award winners write standards.
Well, give us the link, then!
Collection of good websites that provide free service
Collection of good websites that provide free service
I kinda agree with prrometheus.  It feels like the global warming is similar scare tactic of the past naturalist or environmentalist.  Reminds me of Paul Ehrlich with his book Population bomb - which clearly stated back in 1968 that we are heading to our doom.  The planet cannot possibly support a larger population and mass starvation is to occur in the 70-80s.  Didn't happen.  Thanks to great innovators like Norman Borlaug who contributed to new agriculture technology.  I say trust in human ingenuity.  We will invent our way into a brighter future.  We always have.
&gt; Biblically, yes. There's nothing wrong with doubt. What matters if your relationship with Christ. So yeah, Jez, I like you, you're a great guy and all, but I'm just not sure you exist... WTF?
And the date would be ...
Of course I agree with what you're saying in general, but I just want to point out that I still meant proof in the normal court-of-law sense rather than a mathematically-rigorous sense. [Evidence](http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=evidence) is something that is "helpful in forming a conclusion or judgement". Fingerprints on a murder weapon is evidence, but that doesn't *prove* (i.e. may not be enough to convince a court of law) that the suspect actually committed the crime. [Proof](http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=proof) "compels the mind to accept an assertion as true". Fingerprints + motive + no alibi + ..., "beyond reasonable doubt", so to speak, that's proof. In a probabilistic sense, evidence increases the probability of the hypothesis; proof is when you have enough evidence to get that probability high enough. That's why I said that absence of (reasonable) proof is still not (reasonable) proof of absence. It makes it likelier, but that may not be enough. Anyhow. Hail Bayes, hail Laplace. Go out and do the impossible, or at least the improbable.
Well, and you'd be right. That's exactly what Christ taught. Unfortunately most people aren't ready to truly give up everything. But again, that still doesn't mean that you are to just neglect this life. I'm studying to be a programmer. Why? Its not because its more important than the next life, but rather because being a programmer (which is something I'm productive at and I enjoy) is a way to come in contact with other people and to be friends with them, and hopefully somewhere along the way tell them about that next life. Even Paul of Tarsus was a tent-maker, and its not because making tents was important, but rather because it meant that he wasn't a financial burden to anyone and also meant that he had contact with people he might not normally. Ultimately what really matters in this life AND the next is your relationship with God and your relationship with others. While going and watching a basketball game with someone doesn't directly have to do anything with the next life, that growing relationship with the other person is what matters. Biblical Christianity is not confusing and its not difficult. Its unfortunate people have made it so. A man once asked Christ what the greatest commandment was. He said, *"Love the Lord your God with all your heart and with all your soul and with all your mind. This is the first and greatest commandment. And the second is like it: 'Love your neighbor as yourself.' All the Law and the Prophets hang on these two commandments."* Its just not complicated, and its a shame that we've made it so over the centuries.
Its not terribly different than our own human relationships. "So, yeah, Jez, I like you, you're a great girl and all, but I'm just not sure that I'm ready to get married." We do stuff like that on a daily basis, maybe not pertaining to marriage, and while its not a doubt of existence (which is naturally going to happen when pertaining to God because most people haven't talked to him face to face), but rather a doubt of commitment or whatever that issue in your human relationships may be.
And what exactly do you believe? There is no more proof of the unexistance of God than their is of his existence. You're belief process, if you're an atheist, is just as much one about an "invisible fairy" as any other religion because ultimately, you cannot prove God doesn't exist. I mean, prove to me God doesn't exist and I'll agree with you. Until then, I'll continue to believe in that "invisible fairy in the sky."
Where does it point out the flaws? It only goes to show again, that God doesn't answer every prayer, because we as finite humans don't always understand what is best for us. Its like your child walking up to you and demanding that they get to eat ice cream for breakfast, lunch, and dinner every single day. Hey, that's what your child *wants*, but as a loving parent you aren't going to give that to them because that isn't what is best for them. And we are back to square one; the human idea that God should answer all our prayers is the height of arrogance. Essentially it is saying, "I know better than God himself what is good for me."
Oh my, they still use the blink tag...
Please, people. The article is about standards specifications. Things like HTTP, XML, Atom. The context is the problems like HTML's leniency allowing the web to fill with tag soup, something that's being repeated with RSS. The point is that a protocol standard must be properly and diligently specified so that "morons" can be corrected while "assholes" don't get incited. Again, this is *not* about project specifications within companies. Sadly it's not clear from the article itself, but then Mark Pilgrim was writing for his audience of XML geeks and everybody knew what he meant. The article is now considered a classic in the XML community, actually, and the terms "moron" and "asshole" in this sense are pretty well known. See for example [this post](http://www.tbray.org/ongoing/When/200x/2006/03/23/Google-Atom) by Tim Bray, co-editor of the XML 1.0 and 1.1 specifications.
Standards are already called standards. Documents that specify standards are called standards specifications.
Why I stopped promoting Linux in government: Because there were some people from Microsoft, and tehy were *teh MEEN*, and I tolded the govermint that they should use Lunix, and they didn't listen to me immediately, so now I think the whole government is teh suxxorz &amp; I won't help them any more. Oh, and politicians is all liars and cheats." No, really, the vocabulary level was a little higher, but the essential gist of the linked story was about that asinine. The writer relies on a few anecdotes that don't even have much detail, blames Microsoft and won't even say what s/he's blaming them for, and essentially refuses to even give any supporting evidence for his/her own position. So sorry, but I can't take it seriously. 
Wow, Java coders are finally starting to catch on to what I thought the first time I encountered Java... "Wait, so even something as simple as Hello World has to be its own object class? You can't do *anything* without making it an object? That just sounds like going way too far." Like Yegge quotes a Perl-hacking friend saying, "Dude, not everything is an object!" I think Yegge and his friend put it better and more pithily than I did. 
I hate to break it to you all, but government is always based on force. They have the guns, or tasers in this case, and they will eventually use them.
"The point is that a protocol standard must be properly and diligently specified so that "morons" can be corrected while "assholes" don't get incited." Maybe so, but in the context I'm reading it in, the point was badly made. From where I'm sitting, it looks like the point is that the author is cranky, cynical, embittered and probably just way too tired. And I can easily imagine how a few years too many of software development and standards definition could lead to that condition. But the essay doesn't seem to have anything very enlightening to say (except, maybe, "Learn from my example and switch career tracks before you get like me"). Maybe it worked better in its original context, when confined to a more restricted audience (indeed, its *intended* audience). Given the link you provide as documentation, I'm quite willing to believe that this piece has made a lasting and positive impression on XML geeks. But it's not doing much for me, and I did initially read it as having either standards specifications or what I might term "sensible software specs" in mind.
&gt;And what exactly do you believe? None of your business.  However, I'll tell you this much: Not in an invisible fairy in the sky. &gt;There is no more proof of the unexistance of God than their is of his existence. The same can be said of purple polka-dotted space giraffes from the planet Nebulon XII who have come to earth disguised as humans and have infiltrated the highest reaches of government, business, the media and the military as the first step in their dastardly plot to steal our precious bodily fluids.  Our precious, precious bodily fluids. The *same*. &gt;I mean, prove to me God doesn't exist and I'll agree with you. The burden of proof lies on the party making the outrageous claim.  In this case, "the outrageous claim" being that there's an invisible sky fairy. And in any case, I am not particularly interested in convincing you to "agree" with me.  You asked why it's worth mocking, and I told you.  If you want to believe it, great, fine with me. &gt;Until then, I'll continue to believe in that "invisible fairy in the sky." Go for it.  And I'll continue to find it worth mocking.
This thread wins. :) 
"They should also watch you code "live" over weeks on a large open source project of your choosing." Interesting and cool idea, but *OMG, the time and expense!* Companies already incur a lot of time and effort on their candidate searches; there's no way they're going to go for something like this. 
Funny, but TCP/IP, HTTP, HTML and XML were all RFCs, weren't they?
Chyba chodzi w reddit o ciekawe artykuły/newsy z sieci, a nie o reklamowanie swoich serwisów czy zastępowanie katalogów stron.
I am hoping by "same", you intended that they should all be weakened heavily in favour of a freer labour market.  Rather than equally strengthened to hurt companies of all variety (which would just end up hurting the people they wouldn't employ...).
&gt;Well, I'm agnostic, so you're both full of crap to me I'm full of crap because I *don't* believe in an invisible fairy in the sky? Agnosticism is fine, especially in a vague, theoretical sense: Yes, we don't *know* whether or not there's an invisible fairy in the sky. But to take it to the next level - claiming that because there's no absolute *proof* of one or the other, "invisible sky fairy" or "no invisible sky fairy" are equally likely, and that therefore disbelieving that some specific god exists is just as "full of crap" as believing that that specific god does exist - is to enter the realm of extreme theoretical inanity where we must be completely agnostic about *everything*. You don't *know* that Pluto isn't going to crash into Earth tomorrow.  Hell, you don't even *know* that Pluto exists.
Paranoid baloney.  Yes, pharmaceutical companies benefit more from treatments than cures.  That's why they spend billions of dollars more developing treatments than they spend developing cures. BUT!  No pharmaceutical company would ever suppress a cure.  They'd patent it and bring it to market so darn fast it would make your head spin. No sane person or corporation would ever suppress a cold fusion reactor, or a cancer cure, or a 300-mpg carburetor.  They'd change their business-model to start selling it in an instant.
Reddit to nie digg. Poza tym nie tędy droga. Reddit nie jest od katalogowania czy reklamowania sajtów, tylko co ciekawego można przeczytać w sieci.
If this is the last nail, then I'd say the first nail was when their workers negotiated their overinflated salaries.  Not to knock the skill required to work on the auto-plant line, but when these guys make on average 20% more than a school-teacher (someone with about 6 years more education) and on average 100% more than anyone else with the equivilent education (high school diploma), that says to me that something is not right.
Good job, insult the reddit readers when their opinions differ from yours.  I guess that is easier than explaining your position and trying give strong arguments for your cause.  From experience on reddit comments, I find if you make a good point, even if people don't agree with you they will probably mod you up.  Or possibly skip past, and at least not mod down.
The thing I didn't like about this is that at the end of the article, the emphasised the fact that one of the people being tasered was a girl, as if that is somehow worse than tasering a boy.
no
whoops
"To believe otherwise is to believe the fallacy of the broken window" If one thought that the benefit of patents was in the fact that they created work for lawyers, then an equivalence to that version of the broken window theory would apply. However, patents also enable some kinds of inventions to happen that wouldn't without them.  If Peter doesn't create something because of the ease with which Paul could copy it and steal his lunch, then getting rid of patents loses some inventions. How valuable are those inventions that wouldn't have happened?  How do they compare to the costs involved?  Are software patents a net win?  I don't know, and I doubt you do either.  Neither does Paul Graham know, which is why he merely stated in his essay that it was the question that needed to be answered.   
I think the most interesting quote in the article is  "I prefer to live in a world where you can get fired within two weeks but find work quickly, than in a world where you have a job for life but it takes five years to find another if you lose it."
The study said that they couldn't say why those that knew they were being prayed for did worse.  I can explain it: Because they gave up their own hopes, believing that other people's prayers would save them.  Stay with me here. If you believe in science, then you probably believe in the fact that the mind has a lot of power of the body, exhibited by the placebo effect. If you believe in god, then you probably still believe that even if others are praying for you, you need to pray for yourself, and help yourself. Either way you believe, you can't give up your own hope, which the people who knew they were being prayed for probably did. Commence the downmodding.
Keşke Türkçe'ye çevirebilecek biri olsa...
Just to avoid decreasing any of our productivity by giving into radical environmentalist demands of cutting energy usage.   Don't wanna start slipping back in the middle ages.  Not good for all the factories we built.  Not good at all
Word. It's one of those things. You know that if you don't market it, someone else will. Especially if some lone genius discovered it -- who knows how many such kooks are out in garages even now, plotting to destroy your industry! You can stop some, but you can't stop them all. It's better to be the exclusive supplier of the world changing new tech.
Ludzie to nie social bookmarking tu dodajemy teksty, a nie sajty.
Ciekawe, dość solidne. Może brakuje tej uncji dziegciu.
good 
I completely disagree with you, and I even have supporting documentation.  See here: http://reddit.com/info?id=19o4 This is an article about how all the major saw makers are trying to supress an industry-changing technology by spreading FUD.  So clearly here is a big company trying to supress a technology that will make table saws safer for everyone, and it was even inveted by one lone invetor in his garage.
http://blog.csdn.net/myan/archive/2005/11/23/535391.aspx http://www.hwb.cn/blog/2006/01/why-microsoft-can-blow-off-with-c.html
The Wall Street Journal is owned by Dow Jones, that's why the copyright is there.  http://www.dowjones.com/Products_Services/PrintPublishing/ConsumerMedia.htm  You're right though, it doesn't list an author.  This could mena multiple authors, but it's unlikely for a health piece in a finance newspaper.
No. What I meant by "same" is that the law should not be different depending on your age. Am I really so difficult to understand?
&gt; The burden of proof lies on the party making the outrageous claim. In this case, "the outrageous claim" being that there's an invisible sky fairy. Actually I think the outrageous claim would be the one that has no solid theory about how exactly this universe was created.
Dude, being happy about anyone dying is not cool, no matter how much they inconvienced you with pop up ads.
My favorite of the jokes at the end: 668 = Next-door neighbor of the Beast
Yep..and lacking in details as to why tasers were used.
What is the point of this?
 Pretend two people wash ashore, each having spent years on a different deserted island.  One arrives on Monday, the other on Tuesday. They each have a book they wrote while stranded, and on their first day back each has it copyrighted.  Even if Tuesday's book is the exact same as Monday's, Tuesday still gets to keep his copyright, because independently works are allowed to co-exist under copyright law. Now, instead of a book, pretend that they each washed ashore with an invention and patented it on their first day back.  If it's the same invention (which wouldn't be surprising, since they're both trying to survive on a deserted island!) then Monday gets the patent while Tuesday gets the shaft. (For simplicity's sake I'm going with the "first to file" rule.  You can craft the hypothetical such that it wouldn't matter if I used the "first to invent" rule.) I understand that there are good reasons in the history of copyrights and patents such that independently works are handled differently, but I think the time to unify their approaches may have come. Very rarely do you see "copyright trolls" popping out of the woodwork.  JK Rowling had to deal with a case of someone else writing a book similar to "Harry Potter" years earlier, but it was so obscure that it was easy for Rowling to assert that she had never heard of it.  And the case against Dan Brown's "The DaVinci Code" is practically dead in the water, partly because Dan Brown was so upfront about how he had used the original work in his research. Clearly, a lot of what people see as "bad patent" cases are those for  which someone gets nicked when they are totally unaware of the  original work or any of its derivatives.  An example is BT's patent on  hypertext, which BT itself promptly forgot about for over a decade. The existence of this affirmative defense would cause early inventors to do what a patent application is supposed to do: show their stuff to as many people as possible.  In the BT example, this probably would've caused them to come up against Apple's Hypercard very early on. For the software industry, showing the stuff off could be as simple as having a web-enabled demo.  Other industries would require a bit more work -- publishing your idea for a novel engine design in a trade publication ought to be sufficient. 
Frankly the idea of letting Dawkins and his ilk “fix” someone based on whatever psycho/social fantasy theory is currently preferred by the intelligentsia sounds a lot more scary than incarceration, IMHO. For some reason “Clockwork Orange” comes to mind.
&gt; I think that one of the rules regarding the holder of a Trademark should be implemented on patents... &gt; If you don't enforce your right to it either by education, litigation or other means, you loose the privilege it provides to you. In theory, that rule already applies to patents.  But, as with other aspects of our court system, it can be easier to just settle rather than to fight an obviously incorrect charge.   
But that doesn't actually let you do anything neat.  J2ME runs on millions of devices.  For instance, Italy has something very close to a 100% penetration rate in the cell phone market.  They aren't all Java enabled, yet, but... in short, there is a lot of room for creative people to implement interesting ideas that will be used by thousands, if not millions of users. 
This approach might end up saving money.  Companies would no longer fly people for onsite interviews who are not all that great at what matters most -- effective development of large non-trivial applications in groups. Moreover, you could reward your software engineers for discovering talent.  This might encourage them to keep an eye out on several live coding sessions throughout the day. They would only receive a bonus if the person they recommended eventually ends being hired. For something like a startup with limited funds, hiring the right people is absolutely crucial to the success of the company.  And so it is worth your while to know what you are getting. 
**YAZ-AR.COM yeni gelişmekte olan bir site**  Türk internet kullanıcılarına açık kaynağı tanıtmak tek hedefimiz, sizlerinde desteğini bekliyoruz.
I realise that having firearms in the house poses a danger to children, and it scales up the damage potential in a domestic dispute. Nevertheless, I still feel that it's just one more way in which the gov't should be less involved in peoples' personal affairs. The fact that there's the *possibility* of guns in a house makes every house safer, whether individual families have one or not. After all, **don't we decry censorship by saying that it's the parents' job to protect their kids from inappropriate material?** Is it not also the parents' job to see that the six-shooter is locked up out of reach somewhere? Of course, this is all coloured by the fact that I'm from Canada, and fed to the teeth with our federal gun registry. It was retarded to begin with, and has ended up being an open account from which various opportunistic individuals have seen fit to repossess sums totalling in excess of $2B.
BTW, you might find this discussion interesting: http://groups.google.com/group/videoblogging/browse_thread/thread/8708340409ccc586/52b1d9de5049f0c0#52b1d9de5049f0c0 In any case, as I said, VNCCasts has other uses.  In fact, I am hoping this would turn into something like "VNC TV".  So feel free to contribute compelling content.
100% scripted is very likely, in that instance. Which makes the lacklustre spider-walk particularly disappointing. However, the possibility definitely exists here for a genuinely robust bot of this general construction that could suffer a failure in one arm, and still be mobile on the other two and have a single 'tool' hand free. Or, perhaps, extend to a hexaped, where, depending on mode, between 2 and 4 limbs can be used for mobility, with the remaining count free to interact with the environment. (A pick-n-place bot which carries its load under its belly is certainly an intriguing notion...)
&gt;Not to mention that the source of their economic growth is widely considered to be the tax breaks and grants they give to new businesses Any reason, not to imitate them on this too?
You're certainly not the first one to complain about the auto workers' unions. Then again, the Asian car manufacturers continue to expand their North American assembly lines, so obviously it's still cheaper to pay the ludicrous salaries demanded here than to ship the product from home.
Responding to this article is difficult, because there is truth and bogus mixed together in a tight package. The truth is, studying nutrition can make you go nuts. There are many conflicting studies, and sometimes a study may use a defective form of a vitamin, or not use it with the required co-factors.  For example, the article says Calcium &amp; D aren't all they are cracked up to be. But, The results of a three year randomized controlled trial published in the February 27 2006 issue of the American Medical Association journal Archives of Internal Medicine found that "Our results have clinical significance," the authors conclude. "We show a significant reduction in the odds of falling in ambulatory older women with a very inexpensive, well-tolerated, and simple supplementation with cholecalciferol-calcium." Hmm. So, you have to dig deep sometimes. Another example: a recent study "concluded" that fish oil is potentially bad. The meta analysis looked at maybe 10 studies that said fish oil=good, 3-4 studies that said fish oil=no benefit, but no harm, and 1 study that said fish oil=bad. The last study derived the omega-3s from MARGERINE. Hmmm. But, anyhow, the researchers still concluded that fish oil could be bad because of one study - and ignoring the rest. Unfortunately, at this point, it becomes useful to follow the $$$ trail and see who funded these guys. I don't know, but it would be interesting to find out. Of course, your mainstream media picked it up. Anyhow, a few things need to be said: * Get most of your vitamins from food. The quality of food has decreased over the past 60 years, so broccoli in your supermarket now has far less Vitamin C than it did back then. Use a multi as an "insurance policy". Cooking can damage some of the nutrients, but eating raw food often results in the same things being not bioavailable. Steaming is a good option for veggies. * Nutrients have complex relationships. Things need to be taken in balance. For example, there is a good ratio to get your Calcium:Magnesium. Same for Vit C &amp; E. If you take 10 grams of C but no E, you'll probably be messed up. Also, some minerals are antagonistic - they interfere with the absorption of others. For example, copper interferes with some thins. Yet, Vit C enhances Iron absorption. * What your nutritional needs are depends on race, age, level of activity, and sex. For example, the more active you are, the more nutrition you will need. * Your genetic makeup will determine what benefit / harm comes from many things like fat, carbs, and vitamins. A new field called nutrigenomics will grow and cover this. * Some vitamins are considered "antioxidants". But anti-oxidants can be pro-oxidative if taken in excess. A olympic athlete can probably use 1G of Vitamin C OK, but a couch potatoe would not be well served by 1G. A lower dosage ( 120mg - 250mg would probably suffice). * Vitamins during cancer: When you are in a disease state, the rules are different. Many chemotherapies are pro-oxidative on purpose, so its possible that antioxidants may thwart the whole point of it. So yes, in that case, they could be a problem. The article talks about a few compounds: Vitamin E - many studies used synthetic vitamin E, witch is worthless. Also, Vitamin E is really 8 compunds : {alpha,beta,gamma, delta} tocopherol, and { alpha,beta,gamma,delta} tocotrienol. The tocotrienols as well as gamma tocopherol are getting a lot of attention lately, because they have some interesting properties. Its possible that too much alpha tocopherol may displace the gamma, and alpha is prevalent as the only form of vitamin E in many multivitamin formulations. So vitamin E is complicated, and we haven't heard the end of it yet. When somebody says "a study on vitamin E ..." you should ask "what fractions? Synthetic or natural?" Beta Carrotene / Vitamin A : Vitamin A is fat soluble, and too much is not good. The body can convert some beta carrotene, which is water soluble (and generally safe), to active vitamin A. The conversion process doesn't seem to be that efficient though ... I think about 1/12 beta carotene can be converted. Unfortunately, many of the vitamin A formulations in your store start at around 10,000 IU, which is probably too much. 5000 IU is safer. Vitamin C - again, genetics at play here. If you have an iron loading disorder, Vitamin C may not be a good idea. Many people can get away with 250mg a day. Calcium &amp; D: Its been known for at least 10 years that you can take enough Ca &amp; D to turn yourself blue, and still not get all the benefits. The reason is, Ca &amp; D are necessary but insuffiecient for bone health. Many years ago it was established that bone needs stress/load (weight training) to be healthy. Without it, Ca &amp; D won't do anything. In conclusion, I find it interesting that there appears to be an assault on vitamins by the mainstream media. This has been going on for some time. Not sure why. But hey, if you got all your info from CNN, you would probably be messed up. Its up to you to use good espistemology to evaluate the evidence and methods used to obtain it.
&gt;Actually I think the outrageous claim would be the one that has no solid theory about how exactly this universe was created. That's patently absurd. You're saying that when we don't know something, admitting that we don't know it is an "outrageous claim".   And in fact *more* outrageous than claiming that we *do* know how: "It was made by a being whom we have no evidence of, of course! And a specific one, at that! But certainly not by any of the other specific beings that other people have claimed created the universe - they *clearly* don't exist.  Only *my* invisible sky fairy exists, and he *clearly* made the universe, and for you to *claim* that we *don't* know how the universe was made is simply *outrageous*!" Yeah.
His ethic seems to be very similar to every enterpreneur.
I think society is safer when criminals don't know who's armed; there's a good reason people tend not to [rob gun stores](http://www.darwinawards.com/darwin/darwin1993-06.html). The general trend has been that relaxing gun laws lowers crime rates, which I find much more compelling than the huge number of anecdotes about various situations that would have ended better if someone had or had not been armed. As for children having accidents with guns, I think it's the responsibility of parents to keep dangerous items properly secured until their children are responsible enough not to play with them. There are *many* ways to secure a gun against use by a child without significantly increasing the time required to make it ready to fire. One device I find appealing resembles a giant rubber band that goes around the slide of a handgun, making it impossible to chamber a round. Most adults can remove it easily, but children aren't strong enough.
5 gallon buckets kill more kids than guns each year.  Guns kill more criminals than 5 gallon buckets.
Very interesting. I would like to see the graph of first letter distributions changed so that it goes in order of popularity, rather than alphabetical order. I imagine that it would become a half-Bell curve, but without seeing it, I can't say for sure. Maybe it's strongly discontinuous… The love versus sex graph, however, pwns me.
funny
My favorite quote was about Columbine and other public shootings all taking place in "gun free zones", while shootings never seem to happen at gun shows. London is now considered one of the most violent cities in the world.  Handguns were banned there in 1997. Anyway, judging from the other responses here, I'd say that redditers generally believe in the right of self-defense.
&gt; It was made by a being whom we have no evidence of, of course! You only make such statements because you won't accept any of the evidence given for it. If I told you that I've seen things that could only be called "miracles" happen in my life, you'd find some way to dismiss them.
If you had bothered to read it, and investigate the after-math, you'd see that the University of Maryland study didn't in any way document that prayer is "indeed effective". You little simpleton liar, lying for Jeezuz, as you guys usually do. It was simply a meta-study, going through other studies done up to that time, finding that they had such methodological weaknesses that no conclusion could be made. Also, one of the three authors later followed up on this a couple of years after the original publication, saying that later studies, with good scientific methodology, clearly shifted the evidence in favour of prayer just being another placebo. Not that I believe you would be interested, as I've never, ever seen a single religious person being able to react to *any* contrary evidence from *anyone* to their silly little superstitions. But hey, maybe other people were trusting you (although the chance seems very slim), so perhaps it was worth the 15 minutes spent. 
That's not even CLOSE to the same thing.  We're talking about bogus science.  You're talking about saw companies not wanting to spend extra money to put safety devices on their saws. They aren't trying to claim that his safety technology doesn't exist.  And they certainly aren't stopping him from selling it himself.
"...we continue to witness the same policies of free market being glorified by the media, smuggled in surreptitiously by elected governments, and put into practice to disastrous effects . . . over and over again." This is so completely wrong I don't know what to say.  Governments pretend to deregulate industries while really just changing the structure of the regulation.  When this doesn't work, they blame the free market, and this author has fallen for the bait. Any time you hear about "market-based reform" or "privatization", take a closer look at what's going on.  Most often it's just a state-controlled industry being turned over to a state-granted monopoly, or regulation being moved to different parts of the industry, like in the California electricity "deregulation."
Ah, yes, you have evidence. Go for it.  Yahweh.  Evidence.  Let's see it.
Having lived in two gun-controlled nations, one where even police don't normally carry, I must say that for handguns I much prefer gun control. (I won't go into reasons why, but none involve children) It strikes me that Americans often don't realize how gun control can work, while the gun control lobby often don't understand that as a solution, it is somewhat situation dependent. As an example of the former, there is a belief that if you outlaw guns then only the outlaws will have guns, but in the countries with solid gun control it seems guns become a hinderance to most criminals. If police don't normally carry guns, and crimes don't normally involve them, then being seen with one ends up with the whole neighborhood locked down and you surrounded by SWAT, getting either dead, or in a whole heap of trouble. Involving a gun in a crime becomes a bit like killing the gas station attendant during the robbery. Even just owning one puts you at continual risk of being done on possesion if police find some excuse to raid your place (a popular tactic for dealing with gangs). As example of the latter, the effectiveness of gun control will depend critically on things such as the the ability of customs/border patrol to prevent illegal imports (I'm not convinced the country I'm in at the moment has this under control), if geography/corruption/whatever prevents this then the problem gets hairy.
I have two hypothetical questions: - Do you think less people would be killed if there would be less firearms in your area/country? - Do you think that amount of all legal/illegal firearms owned by "normal people" has any connection to amount of legal/illegal firearms owned by "criminals"? I'm really interested in hearing your comments
Well, like it or not, your average 14-year-old girl is significantly less of a physical threat to those around her than your average 14-year-old boy.
Oh dear, it's that time of year.
Ever heard of deliberate exaggeration?  And are you completely sure you read the whole article? Quoting from it: "The second faction of morons work from examples, ship code, and get yelled at. But when they get around to reading the spec, they magically turn into advocates and write up tutorials on what they learned from their mistakes. These people are called experts." Not everyone writes proper tutorials, of course, but in my experience, experts are eagerly giving advice to novices, in some form or another. I think the text here tries to capture that class of people. In the context of protocol specifications (and not just simple project specifications), Mark's classification of morons, assholes and angels is, in my opinion, accurate enough to be informative and, more importantly, entertaining.  
Funny thing people mention London as a prof that banning guns leads to high criminality. What can be said about Tokyo then, or about countless other cities around the world? The  right to self-defense is not identical with the right to have guns (at least outside USA). Banning guns saves lives, deal with it. Banning guns makes criminals less deadly. A community without guns is safer for its citizens. I as simple as that.  Fact is I feel safer in a country like Romania, where private ownership of guns of any kind is banned, where having a gun without justification and permit is against the law. Note that the same kind of laws were in use at the moment of the revolution that ended Ceauşescu's dictatorship, and the fact that the people had no guns didn't save the government. Same thing happened in Poland, Czechoslovakia and Russia, same thing happened to Milošević in Serbia.
I wish stuff like this was what we *usually* got from Christians.
I think that when it stops working, the solution is not going to be found in the private ownership of handguns. I am also somewhat skeptical about a militia taking on the US armed forces.
IMO reddit to po prostu pewna technologia, a sposób jej wykorzystania zostaje określony przez społeczność użytkowników.
That's why the aliens come here: to collect the $12,700,000,000,000 in external debt that Earth owes them.
great article. good information.
London, UK? Ever been? Felt scared? It's one of the safest cities in the world, actually. There's nothing to stop you defending yourself with your own wits and limbs.
Same time as last year (it's dated 2005). 
ahi, what language are you referring to?
While I'm on your side generally, I don't think it's this simple. In Switzerland, there are rifles in most homes, but there's no gun culture, they have very low crime rates, and very little reason to take the gun outside their houses. (It is, of course, far easier to use a handgun for petty crime than a rifle, though). If crime rates are high, and gun possession rates are high, it stands that gun crime will be high as well. *Crime rates are the initial problem*. They have much more to do with a society's health - and with the intelligence and responsibility of members of that society - than with the availability of weapons. This isn't something that other countries can correct easily, though, and in the short term, it's inevitable that even with high crime rates, low gun possession rates = less gun crime.
As I said before, you would immediately dismiss it as nothing more than coincidence or whatever you desire to attribute it to.  No. Thanks.
trtetretret
A lot of my distaste for guns comes from a general disgust for what they represent. Ideally, I would prevent them from being manufactured in the first place, melt every one of them down, and only allow people who are skilled in, say, swordplay, or martial arts - skills which actually require some grace and wits and a bit of respect for the opponent - to kill people. Guns make death far, far too simple. This is why there are so many accidents. This is why they're misused so readily. Power without skill, or thought. They are ugly, ugly things.
Are you really suggesting that you prefer that only people who have the free time to practice armed and unarmed martial arts deserve to be able to protect themselves?  People who cannot train with weights and katas due to disability or simple weakness *should* be easy prey for the strong, you're asserting?   Guns don't make it any easier for a thug to kill an 80-year-old grandmother, because the thug is already vastly more powerful than she.   Guns are equalizers in a quite literal sense.  I'm a big, strong, and fairly practiced at fighting, personally.  In a world without guns, I'd probably not be attacked any more than I am now (that is, not at all).  My wife, however, who cannot leave the house except in a wheelchair (temporarily, we hope), needs a gun to be *able* to defend herself.  Blithely asserting that she should just have "a bit of respect" for her attackers, and that this will allow her to rise from her wheelchair and spend 4-6 hours a day lifting weights and practicing deadly martial arts seems odd.   It's hard for me to come to any conclusion other than that you would prefer to see the weak robbed, raped, and killed than see them use guns to defend themselves.  We don't live in a martial arts movie, and people who are practiced at fighting typically have less respect for those they attack, not more.
OK folks, here's the latest status on this. At this point, if there was a way I could delete this item from reddit, I would. I just posted this update to the beginning of the piece: [Further update: As I originally  mentioned in the piece, the statistical calc was "for our amusement." I didn't take it very seriously and had no idea it would get this much attention. The (very appropriate) criticism emerged in discussions that at least some of the 10 Amazon reviews I was counting as the  basis for the stats were undoubtedly the result of the original &lt;a href="http://reddit.com/"&gt;reddit&lt;/a&gt; attention to the &lt;a href="http://www.physics.buffalo.edu/~bapowell/amazon.html"&gt;Brian Powell issue&lt;/a&gt;, invalidating the calcs. I had explicitly noted that possibility in the original piece, but people didn't apparently didn't notice that very much and still took it seriously. As the discussion went on someone suggested that as few as 2 of the posts might have been legit. So I redid the calcs with 2, resulting in the .02366865 result in now the title: still statistically significant, and I did take it more seriously at that point. But now I'm trying to confirm that there actually were 2 "legit" reviews of the book in question on the day in question on Amazon. So far, one of the reviews I thought was likely to be independent has turned out to be in response to the reddit post. It's legit in the sense that the reviewer really did look at the book and write intelligently about it, but he did so in response to the reddit attention, which invalidates it from a statistical point of view. I have a couple more queries out there and if it does turn out that there are 2 independent reviews, I'll note it here. (If YOU wrote one on March 30 for The Final Theory, let me know.) For now, however, my feeling is that this was a not-very-serious and not-very-careful thing that got too much attention. Move on, there's nothing happening here.]
Scientists who work in the nanotech industry have long promised better products in basic technologies and human health. While many of the applications have yet to leave the lab, nanotech is all around you. From sunscreens to baseball bats and kitchen paint, more than 200 everyday items made a new list of nanotechnology consumer products.
It eats our trash, makes soil fertile, turns the food we swallow into useful vitamins, and yet it gets no respect.   And now, it seems, our pursuit of a bacteria-free world is making us sick.
Of course it's an April Fool's joke, you fool.
[April fools](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/April_1,_2006) (scroll down to The Register)
If you have nipped and tucked your way into an expression of permanent surprise, it makes sense to tailor your wardrobe around that sentiment
&gt;It's hard for me to come to any conclusion other than that you would prefer to see the weak robbed, raped, and killed than see them use guns to defend themselves. Don't attribute elitism to malice; it's usually a simple failure to think things through. I wish it was much harder to hurt people, but there's no easy way to make large numbers of people less breakable. The next best thing is to make it more risky to hurt people. A cop on every street corner and security cameras everywhere might have that effect, but it would be expensive and nobody wants to live in a police state. Another way to do it is to encourage ordinary citizens to arm themselves and protect each other. It seems to work: permitting concealed handgun carry drops crime rates.
&gt;Do you think less people would be killed if there would be less firearms in your area/country? Possibly. 'Killed' includes criminals who are killed by their victims. The availability of a firearm also increases the chances that any kind of fight will be deadly, though I suspect it reduces the chances of a fight occuring. &gt;Do you think that amount of all legal/illegal firearms owned by "normal people" has any connection to amount of legal/illegal firearms owned by "criminals"? Yes. More guns tends to mean more stolen guns, all of which at least pass through the hands of criminals. I'm not sure why you selected these specific questions. Care to elaborate?
I considered putting "irony intended" at the end of my first paragraph: I did say "ideally." I don't think there's a "good" way to kill someone. In an ideal world, killing eachother wouldn't really happen, and people in wheelchairs wouldn't require protection. I don't think we live in a martial arts movie, and actually, I had someone in a wheelchair on a deserted, dark street in mind after I posted the above - you're absolutely right, *realistically* speaking. Incidentally, I hope your wife gets better. I'm still thinking about the "equalisers" argument, but there's inequality when the victim is able-bodied and unarmed, as well. Suggesting everyone be armed was part of what I was getting at, above: it's escalation, and it would be unnecessary in a world without guns, and in a world where we all had a bit more respect for one another.
Det er gode foredrag du har plukket ut, men jeg hadde helst sett en slik liste over norske foredrag som var tilgjengelige. Det må da være noen forelesere eller foredragsholdere som har lagt ut eller gitt andre tillatelse til å legge ut et mp3 opptak, eller hva?
What, you mean, there are still people who are not protected from pop-ups?
Off topic:  When I want to know what redditers think about a post I just click the *comments* link. This works on the assumption that if anyone bothered to comment it would be to do just that - comment (on the subject, yes).
Website is just a long add for a Vendor. No useful Vendor neutral information!
This one is serious, though:  Windows Hasta La Vista - Ironclad Security  http://distrowatch.com/dwres.php?resource=review-winvista
Ah, yes, gun control: the idea that a 125-lb woman should have to defend herself "with ... [her] own wits and limbs" from a 225 lb mugger or rapist.
No and no. Gun control is bullshit because it's un-Constitutional, irrespective of its effect on violent crime. It's not OK to violate the Constitution even if it would make us safer, which it probably wouldn't. We'd be a lot safer from Islamist terrorists if we summarily deported all Muslims without due process but that's not Constitutional and it's not acceptable. 
&gt; Creator Matt Groening said last year that the animated hit would keep going as long as he and his colleagues could keep generating fresh ideas. On that basis the TV series should probably have ended several years ago.
I pity the fool. :) 
modded down: tempest in a teapot.  simple explanation: the excessive number of one star reviews submitted on the same day has been treated as a statistical "outlyer" (sic?) and they've decided to weight them less, especially as they may have evidence about the IPs or IP blocks that they come from are all similar.
This is so lame. Everybody knows RFID chips are better implemented on the back of your right hand or on your forehand.
The default settings should leave things just like they are, or else people are going to complain that it's spoiling their fun.. those people shouldn't be able to see the difference between April Fools stories and real ones. But users who have the option enabled should be able to tag stories as April Fools, see this flag prominently next to each story, and be able to filter them out.
See also this subreddit request: http://request.reddit.com/info?id=3s2o
See also this feature request: http://features.reddit.com/info?id=3s2l
Hell yeah.
*A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear arms, shall not be infringed."*   Technically speaking, the most niggardly interpretation of the wording would allow citizens the right to keep arms- at their local barracks- and bear them- during their weekly maneuvers- as part of a local people's militia.  And nothing else, which I don't think anyone could reasonably object to.  Yes, the wording of the constitution says' 'people' rather than 'mitlita', but this is directly after stating how important an armed milita is to the security of the nation, which would strongly suggest that the intention of the the framers of this amendment was to allow and encourage the general populace to enroll in part-time military service. It is also true that some of the founding fathers were very fond of guns as an implement for sport and hunting.  But I severely doubt they would have advocated the widespread ownership of handguns useless in hunting, large scale military engagements or guerilla warfare, but excellent at killing unsuspecting people at close range. The argument that widespread gun ownership leads to a peaceful society would imply that the US had among the lowest rates of violent crime in the industrialised world.  For that matter, criminals would have the lowest rates of violent crime in society at large- hell, they're all armed to the teeth, right?   Do you know the guy who invented the machine gun did so in the belief it would end mass warfare, as no sane man would contemplate violence between nations when such assured horrors awaited him?  Same logic. There is no conclusive evidence that low rates of gun ownership lead to lower rates of violent crime, certainly.  Gun ownership is an attempt to address a symptom, rather than the disease, and as such will always be inefficient.  Another effect to consider is that gun control is usually enforced locally, when the black market can easily supply demand for guns from outside the policed area, over state lines, city limits or even national borders.  This is the era of globalisation, after all.  The other problem is that guns and ammunition can remain in working order for decades, and even if a total global ban on manufacturing, distribution and ownership were to be enforced tomorrow, it might take years for any marked effect on gun use to show.
Manchmal enthält die Realität doch die besten Gags,  man muß sie nur entdecken.
Great city - I was astonished at all the signs about pickpockets.  Is that all those people have to worry about?!  That's awesome!! I felt totally comfortable and unconcerned walking around downtown after midnight, which is more than I can say for any large American city I've visited.
Huhuu! Das hier ist **de**.reddit.com 
That's why God put testicles on the outside :)
snip: "So how does Yoo come by the work of Carl Schmitt, and why does he fail to acknowledge it in his publications? Yoo is currently a scholar in residence at the American Enterprise Institute, the center stage of the American Neoconservative movement. That movement traces itself back to Leo Strauss, the political philosopher who lived and taught for many years in Chicago. Though a Jew forced to flee Nazi Germany, Strauss was a lifelong admirer of Carl Schmitt, a scholar and teacher of his works. Moreover, Strauss’ early work in Germany played a key role in development of the Begriff des Politischen, and Schmitt’s intercession helped Strauss obtain a key scholarship that made his escape from Germany possible. Though arrested by the Americans and accused of complicity in Nazi crimes, Schmitt achieved a partial rehabilitation late in his life - thanks in large part to Leo Strauss. Indeed, Schmitt emerged as an essential part of the Neocon canon, and his work – including all the relatively obscure works cited here – were translated into English and published by the University of Chicago Press (also Yoo’s publisher). It is therefore hardly plausible to suggest that Yoo would be unfamiliar with the writings of Carl Schmitt. On the other hand, it is easy to surmise why he would fail to acknowledge his reliance on such a highly stigmatized writer. After all, Schmitt was a notorious antisemite best known for crafting the legal cover for Hitler's Machtergreifung."
Thank you for responding to my somewhat hurried and clearly over-the-top comment with restraint.  I apologize for my aspersions on your intent, and in my defense can plead only thoughtlessness. Having everyone armed *is* escalation, I agree.  I'm not prepared to cede that it's a bad thing, however.  As we progress technologically, we improve our tools, and arms races are just part of that improvement. Such improvement in weapons wasn't at all unnecessary in the world before guns:  atlatls are better than stones, and bows better than atlatls, longbows an improvement on short bows, and so on.   Even if guns had never been invented, we could easily be having this conversation about swords or bows: the main difference is that it would be fairly easy for ruffians to tell if their intended victim was carrying a sword or bow than a powerful handgun.   (Just to be clear, I'm not trying to imply that the history of the world we inhabit would be plausible without guns).  :)
I think you would be surprised about how many people would welcome a police state "for your protection".  We're not too far from that now. I agree that I overstepped good taste by assuming malice on taliswolf's part, but I wouldn't necessarily label such views "elitist", either.
Are you scared in the American city of the lady closing up her fur store, that might decide to just randomly shoot passers-by because she's allowed to carry, or by criminals who obtain guns illegaly (and always would, regardless of laws or bans) that might want to mug or hurt you?
Do a barrel roll!  To do a barrel roll, press Z or R twice.
I don't know about ahi, but the [Devanagari alphabet](http://www.omniglot.com/writing/devanagari.htm) is impressively systematic. Check out the consonants laid out in a two-dimensional array under orthogonal phonetic axes. That *is* the canonical arrangement; I gained a whole new respect for the language when in my teens I discovered the reason why they were arranged that way.
People, it is just one day a year, get some perspective.
No, they're serious about this. Ryanair have been planning this since 2002. From [The Irish Times - 5th Apr 2002](http://www.ireland.com/newspaper/breaking/2002/0405/breaking25.htm) (subscription):  &gt;  Ryanair is reportedly planning to offer free flights by setting up "casinos in the sky" and showing pay-per-view football matches.   &gt; Scottish daily the Daily Record says Ryanair chief executive Mr Michael O'Leary plans to introduce in-flight entertainment to subsidise the cost of the flights. "We are currently talking to Boeing about in-flight entertainment where passengers will swipe through a credit card and pay, for example, a pound to watch children's cartoons or a football match. &gt; "We are also planning to introduce gambling - like Las Vegas slot machines with a limited jackpot" Whatever reservations I would have about flying with them due to their [poor service reputation](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/england/norfolk/4337162.stm) and use of [inconvenient airports](http://reddit.com/goto?id=1dp6), their financial success can't be ignored. They've consistently been [Europe's most profitable airline](http://web.archive.org/web/20040203173244/http%3A//www.ryanair.com/press/2004/jan/gen-en-280104.html).
It certainly reflects their style. Amazingly, ryanair.com is the most visited travel website in Europe and all their seat sales are made online. They have no call centres or bricks-and-mortar representation. I guess their attitude is "if it ain't broken"...
I diagree. What does it have to do with Java?  They only mention Java in the first example and they claim that catching multiple exceptions is a hassle. In reality, you only need to catch each exception on a different line. Then they do this in Ruby.   
never trust a news release on April 1st
If that were the case, it seems that [many other news sources](http://news.google.com/news?q=simpsons+film) were also taken in. However, since the announcement was actually [made yesterday](http://today.reuters.com/news/newsArticle.aspx?type=filmNews&amp;storyID=2006-04-01T020842Z_01_N31332335_RTRIDST_0_FILM-LEISURE-SIMPSONS-DC.XML),  it seems unlikely to be a hoax.
I went searching for a code review tool for automating the code review workflow after reading this: http://www.hacknot.info/hacknot/action/showEntry?eid=84
In case you couldn't tell... April fool's!
I was very impressed by this video.  Way more exciting than my senior project was!  More videos from this research lab are here: http://www.et.byu.edu/groups/magicc/movies.html
This is the best April Fool's day joke ever!
I don't agree this is NSFW.  It's a tad risque, but nothing over the top. Just sayin' I agree this is too good to not mod up.
aren't plants creatures too? If so, there might be countless trees (even bonsai) older than Harriet.
I was ambivalent about gun control until a thug held a gun to my wife's head and my head. No joke. He broke gun control laws in here in California to get that gun. Gun control laws did squat to protect me.  I own a shotgun, not because I plan on harming others, but because I plan on protecting my family in the event I need to.  Ben Franklin's wife held off a mob intent on burning down her house while he was in England. She held them off with a firearm by making it clear that at least one of them would die if they harmed her or her house. They backed off.  Partially because of that incident, Franklin didn't object to the second amendment being added to the Constitution. He wasn't thinking about militias, he was thinking about his wife.   
If you have any doubts about that try clicking the "submit profile" link :-)
SQL On Rails is the most elegant web application framework for developers to date.  Check out their astounding screencast that shows off the new features of version 4.1, released today.
Damn! I'm ashamed to admit I completely fell for this one. Good job!
He just wasn't thinking about her when it came time to decide who should be allowed to vote ;-)
Welcome, both our OPs were a bit hasty. Realistically, I'm pretty convinced that a society's crime rate is a more important factor in the number of gun-related deaths than the number of guns (see my mention of Switzerland in another reply). That said, I'm still made uneasy by the concept of the pocket instrument of instant death. To be able to do something so catastrophic, physically and morally, as easily as guns allow seems fairly obviously wrong - and only right when the entire society consists of responsible people... (in which guns wouldn't be necessary anyway). I have problems with escalation because there are inevitable conclusions: from handguns to shotguns to automatics to explosives and beyond. Technology has already advanced beyond what society has decided to allow. You're given more and more responsibility as things escalate and the consequences of something going wrong get worse. Responsibility isn't something everyone has, and society has to accept that, at some point. It's a balancing act, in other words. I think my point is, I think handguns are already too far up the scale. It's ludicrously easy to kill, and with that fact comes all the tragedy.
To perfectly preserve the layout and formatting of the original document? It's irritating when casually reading aritcles like this, but in publishing and science PDFs are still very useful.
thanks, I almost fell for it.
Provides the opportunity to engage in meditation courses and retreats in the busyness of London
Consider the number of American military. Then consider the number of people in the US. Then do the math.
&gt; "Computer animation has less direct appeal, less charm, it's less humane - it lacks the roughness that nature gives." Filter &gt; Noise &gt; Add Noise ;) But seriously. Check out [non-photorealistic rendering](http://www.red3d.com/cwr/npr/). Some beautiful examples, all made by an open-source research project called [Freestyle](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/): [bunny](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/JAPANESE/bunny-japanese.php),  [plane](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/RENAISSANCE/plane.php), [minnie](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/GUIDING-LINES/minnie-guidinglines.php),  [locomotive](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/TECHNICAL/loco-technical.php),  [building](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/SKETCHY/building-sketchy.php),  [virgin](http://freestyle.sourceforge.net/GALLERY/RENAISSANCE/virgin.php).
Man, I wish it were true.
But [FictionAlley](http://www.fictionalley.org/) is already merging with Google, Yahoo, and Microsoft.  Among others. Join the conglomerate?
I think they may have the causality reversed.  People who do well in interviews, get the job, perform well at work, etc. tend to be fairly happy, so *of course* there'd be a correlation. That said, there is definitely a feedback effect.  Nobody wants to work with a sourpuss.
The difference, as far as I could tell, was that in Ruby you can catch *many* exceptions on a single line. Probably good if you want to do the same thing in several but not all cases.
Yep...you really got me there!
This is not possible. Python cannot be stricter. It's too strict as it stands right now. This is like saying, "Perl to become more unreadable...." Everyone knows that's not possible :) P.S. I realize this is an old April Fool's joke.
Yes, but Reddit owners see red when they were refused seat representation on the newly formed board by you-know-who!
Yes, I doubt the BBC would pull an April Fools' joke. On the other hand, remember the "confirmed" Futurama movie...?
Here's another [Web April Fool's list](http://aprilfools.urgo.org/) that this guy does every year, a bit cleaner than the Wikipedia article.
Best article I've read on The Register in years :)
&gt; the source of their economic growth is widely considered to be the tax breaks and grants they give to new businesses That's essentialy a myth that's only recently been circulated in response to the allegations that Microsoft was somehow using the country as a tax haven. While corporation taxes are generally lower than elsewhere in Europe, the idea that this was the sole reason for dramatic improvement in the nation's economic fortunes has been [soundly debunked](http://www.ictu.ie/html/publications/ictu/Tax%20Cuts%20did%20not%20Create%20Celtic%20Tiger.pdf) (PDF).
Consider the population of Iraq after gulf war 1, and the size of the Iraqi military. Consider that the military had just been defeated by another nation and that nation called upon the population (which was armed) to rise against the government and even said they would support them. You can't ask for a better situation than that - everybody contemplating taking up arms against Saddam would have seized that day together, plus the military would have thought the nation that just kicked their ass was about to join in. The Iraqi air force slaughtered them all. Imagine what the *American* air force could do. These days it is maintaining the allegiance of the military that matters, whether the population have some guns appears to be of little consequence.
check out www.boycottborders.com
MSM is also used by the liberal/left blogosphere ([example](http://talkleft.com/new_archives/014432.html)) and is a lame justification. Defending GWB - thats proof.
Ah, I see.  You have evidence, but you can't or won't show it.  And you blame me for why you can't or won't show it. Believable.  *Very* believable.
Almost a year ago they were already offering London-Dublin return for 1 GBP. I happened to be visiting my sister in england so I took a few days off to go and see Dublin because of this offer. There were no strings attached, and also no gambling on board! You had to pay for your own in flight refreshments, though, something that I and everyone on board was only too happy to do.
Pedantic quiblle: that story is from the book of Lieh-Tzu.
Didn't we recently hear about another tortoise that died at age 255? 
I've been to the richest, safest part of London, and if by "felt scared" you mean nothing bad happened, then no, I didn't (fear of the government doesn't count, I assume)  But would you rather feel safe, or actually be safe?  If you haven't used one, guns are scary, no doubt about it. Pretty much every study done on guns indicates a negative correlation between private gun ownership and crime.  For every time they are used to commit a crime, they are used many times to prevent crimes. If you really don't believe me, look here:  http://www.gun-control-network.org/GF05.htm  That's a page on an anti-gun rights website.  Look at the statistics for crime, and remember that handguns were banned in 1997.
Hello Bella ----
The whole point is that private ownership of handguns KEEPS the government working.  If those at the top know they can't pull too much ridiculous BS for fear of revolution, then they won't.
O RLY?
As a tribute to Yahoo's branding, I only noticed the Yahoo portion of the logo.
lol, markdown needs &lt;sarcasm&gt; tags
I'm not sure if you are asking me or maximelt, but my opinion doesn't change if the person is Russian or they sent spam instead of popups -- I still think it's a horrible thing.
No, we were talking about large companies surpressing groundbreaking work by small inventors, which is exactly what this is.
I don't think escalation is quite inevitable.  Yes, a gangster with a machine gun can may take me out with a handgun.  But how many times can he do that before getting shot?  Maybe 2 or 3 times, if he's lucky?  But if he can be reasonably certain that I'm not armed, he can probably get away with doing it hundreds of times before he runs into the police or an armed victim.  The fact that a gun is scary is why it is so useful for self defense - criminals are not immune to fear. An instant-kill device can't be made much more lethal, so when large numbers of good citizens carry protection, criminals are far outnumbered even if they escalate.  One bad guy with two Uzis can't take on ten women armed with pistols.   The argument that because something can be used for good or bad, we should ban it to prevent the bad is generally flawed, because most people are somewhat responsible, and their actions more than cancel out those of irresponsible people.  Think about Wikipedia - it's very easy to add false/obscene information.  Should it be banned?  Should free speech be banned because some people will use it to lie or say bad things?  No, because free speech enables truth far more than lies.  In the same way, guns help victims (especially women) far more than criminals. I understand how guns can seem like horrible instruments of destruction, and I understand wanting to ban them.  It took me a long time to get over my fear of guns - and to tell the truth, I'm still scared of them.  But now I know that it is because guns are so deadly and scary that they empower victims, which scares criminals.
The difference is that those workers are not with the UAW.  The reason that those Asian carmakers have plants here in the US is that they took a look at the *entire* cost of making autos here and found that it was still cheaper to make them here than at home.  Labor costs are just one part of the equation.  The costs of energy, land, transportation, etc., also figure in.   Remember too, that even if the wages that are being paid here are higher than in Taiwan or China, if the worker productivity is even higher, then the employer comes out ahead.
CSS discuss
Actually, it says that "a WELL REGULATED militia" is important to the security of "a FREE state".  That means that the militia needs to be regulated and controlled, not given more power to take away freedoms.  Otherwise it would say "An armed militia being necessary to the security of a State."
AJAX
Yes, I think they mean the oldest known *animal*.
Source?
not so.  He argues that religion is a product of evolution, but so is our little toe, and the appendix.  That religion is a product of evolution does not make it useful.
The two are very different.  As you said yourself "the oil companies would do everything they could to stop word from spreading".  Stopping information from spreading is orders of magnitude harder than a few manufacturers cartelling to cut costs.
Are newborn babies sinners?  Presumably they do not yet have faith.
I wish there were a digg/slashdot/reddit type aggregator site that let me filter out all the inane bogus April 1 "news stories" and websites. They're never funny enough to compensate for the waste of time.
I would love this feature. April 1 stories piss me off. Surely it could be implemented before April 1, 2007, right? :)
Actually, the notion of "selective enforcement" is a real legal principle, and most frequently applies in cases related to freedom of speech. Certainly it would be relavant in a lawsuit (as opposed to a traffic ticket).
Hotmail does not provide you with a way to read encrypted email. If someone wants to send you encrypted email, you have to use an account that allows you to download your messages and then decrypt them. Unless you use Izemail: Izemail lets you decrypt email inside your Hotmail account. Works for all webmail.
&gt; Flying the Typhoon is relatively simple. Uh huh.   It's interesting to see how [the Arrow](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avro_Arrow) stacks up against a plane like this. Obviously, the Arrow never had a female warning voice or integrated terrain maps or anything, but it *did* have a top speed approaching Mach 2.
First, I'm an atheist, so I'm pretty sure that I am not anthropomorhizing that in which I do not believe.   Second, you  infer the existence of vanity in god, which is anthropomorphizing.   Third, you mis-state my point:  I noted that the act of praying might either indicate or create a sort of fitness for receipt of divine assistance.  That has nothing at all to do with using prayer as a requirement for divine intervention, and could be the case independently of there being a god.  Perhaps people who write out a list of things they want every morning tend to get those things, either because those things are pushed to the front of their subconscious or something else like that.  Fourth, christianity specifically and religion in general has far worse flaws than a possible vanity on the part of a god who may prefer to intervene on behalf of praying people.  I'd rather see them get beaten up on really awkward questions like "If this life is infinitely less valuable than the afterlife, why not just kill babies to get them to the afterlife faster?" ,r "so how do you know your religion is the right one of N extant religions?" I want atheist arguments to be as good as possible, and arguing that god is vain and hence inconsistent for intervening on behalf of praying people is a weak argument.
The article is posted on March 30th
You equate someone wondering why, eg., they have no arms now with a kid wanting ice cream 3 meals per day.   Have you no sense of how offensive that is? There are people who are congenital amputees-they are simply born without some of their limbs.  There are even congenital quadrupral amputees.  Such people face extraordinary challenges, and probably some of them pray for assistance, or maybe to get a leg so they can walk down the street.  They do not get such prayers answered. You are, in other domains, a pretty smart guy, and apparently reasonably nice, too.  How the hell can you be so condescending as to equate someone who wonders why they will never walk again with a ice-cream craving kid?  If someone made a comparison between Jesus and a crack dealer, saying that both handed out poison that renders the users addicted and drives them to destroy their own and other's lives, you would be livid, and rightly so.  Do you just shut off a hunk of brain when it comes to religion?
When I'm using the recommended or my.reddit pages, sometimes I get links from the programming subreddit, all well and good.  The problem arises when I hit my little reddit bookmarklet to see the comments.  As an example, one of them takes me here: http://reddit.com/info?id=3pck which give a 404 error.  If I manually type in the subreddit name: http://programming.reddit.com/info?id=3pck I get the comments.  This is less than effcient.  Also, if I hit the 'like' or 'dislike' button, it just doesn't work, and I can't even manually edit the link. Would it be possible to make reddit.com understand all article id's, since they seem to be unique across all subreddits, or at least redirect me to the proper subreddit?
Or just show it next to the domain name in the same small grey font.  That seems like it would be pretty clean.
It's also difficult to keep track of which column a comment is in when there are a lot of replies and sub-replies.  Perhaps a line that extends down or something like that might help.
OK, so if: -the next life is infinitely more valuable than the present one -there is a non-zero chance of any random person failing to get into heaven because they do not take jesus as a savior -there is a non-zero chance of people lapsing from religion, even if they are faithful now -people who die with doubts but who still accept jesus as a a savior go to heaven coequal with the ones who have no doubts then why not kill anyone who has doubts now, but still accepts jesus as a savior?  You would be saving them from a chance of going to hell, no? If you believe all of the above, I can't see how you can justify letting someone who has doubts make their own choice.  They are, after all, playing with their afterlife.
This would make it easier to pick out sites one likes to read, much like fark uses their little icons.  As long as its an option, it seems like a good idea.
I'm going to upmod this, but with the caveat that it would have to be optional.  It would totally ruin the simplicity of the site otherwise.
You've alluded to miracles a lot.  Are we talking about things like "I got a good job and a girlfriend even though I thought I could get neither" or "my arm got cut off and regrew"? The reason I ask is that I am an awfully lucky guy.  I get help from lots of people, all the time, even when I probably don't deserve it.  Is that the sort of thing you call a miracle?
Perhaps after they get the same following as slashdot, they can open source the code... :)
given that it is not provable, why do you assert its existence?
&gt;For example, a valid registration key might look something like this: &gt; 5|_4!C|@W/#\r$cw3 r\/1=|\xV|Zb0+aR t3qh h^0w ilE |r_1]n\/x-(pY)5\C 3k&amp;|\|3*j[%=G(.Mx^G$Hd:" 7{OK4"GDe:E &amp;y$C[;}4!s3C|@W/O8@#\r$Uc~w3 r\`/1=|\xV|Z"b&gt;,0+]{*$4%f_b+a@Q=-^.&gt;c#wC|@=}4!+sG$]Hd:C)|@W/0+&amp;]{ qC h=G?(&gt;,0+] \/1?+n]e{f *^j0w@~&gt;n V^"|k\E$ The registration keys are perl programs?
Presumably what this really says is "I think the discussion of an article is interesting but not the article itself, so I want to submit the discussion as its own link." I'm pretty sure you can do that already.
I think the problem lies in the way people percieve the arrows.  To me, the arrows mean "I would like to see more stuff like this."  Thinking this way applies to both articles and comments.
And don't forget Fungi.  [The Malheur National Forest Armillaria ostoyae](http://www.fs.fed.us/pnw/news/fungus.htm) is estimated to be at least about 2400 years old, and could be far older.  It's also 3.4 square miles in size!
They are...but only if you measure only the difference in waste of time between a real news story and a fake one.
12000 ft in four seconds is ridiculous. That's 3000 ft/sec, the speed of sound is 1100 ft/s. No aircraft is going to get to mach 3 in 700 feet of runway (according to the article). If this article isn't wrong, I'd be very surprised.
A really well written blog on everything from IT news to British humor and music reviews.
I regularly fly with RyanAir, and the're not bad. The company is famous for its penny-pinching - it won't even let its employees charge their mobiles in the office, to keep down electricity costs. If I'm ever looking for a cheep holiday, their [destinations map](http://www.ryanair.com/site/CA/dests.php?flash=chk) is where I start.
Yea.   FAS says 30kft in 2.5min http://tinyurl.com/m8owu   Google says 12kft in 51sec http://tinyurl.com/r7t6f  Perhaps the author blacked out for 47sec ;-)
perl, smalltalk, lisp, and probably others did the same thing, before python did.  The VM thing was not new when java did it, and was done better elsewhere.
Actually some versions of the flying spaghetti monster story hold that babies are tainted at birth with an inherent tomato sauce, which must be cleansed by various rituals demonstrating faith in the Spaghetti Monster. They call this doctrine 'original sauce.'
I like tinyscheme for many of the same reasons-do most of the phones that run J2ME allow C binaries to run also, or is there some sort of DRM-ish thing that keeps you from running non-java code?
I think the most interesting bit of this is the fact that DHH and TOR were talking about different things:  DHH was talking about how to make money writing a few books in something you know a lot about, and TOR was talking about having a relatively broad-based publishing house.  They could be, and probably are, both right.
As a matter of a fact I have a friend that was born with only one arm. He was my best friend for awhile but now he's off at college. I don't know if he's ever prayed that he would be healed, but I do know that he never has been. He's never seen his disability as something that holds him back or as a reason to blame God. He just accepts that's how God made him and he is okay with that. He has struggles with his arm, but those struggles make him rely upon God even more than he might if he had two arms. He sees it as a blessing, not a problem. I think our society forgets that struggles can make us better people. It comes down to the fact that we don't know what is best for us. Sure, maybe we don't understand it or don't like it, but to assume that our needs are what is important is selfish. Who whould my friend be if he was born with two arms? I don't really know. Perhaps he'd be full of himself and would be an asshole. Maybe he would still be a really nice guy. But I know that because of who he is - because of the struggles he's gone through, he's been able to help other people. And without those struggles, maybe he never would have or would have been able to help others like he has because of what he's experienced. So again, to believe that we know better than God as to what we need, is absolute arrogance. &gt; If someone made a comparison between Jesus and a crack dealer, saying that both handed out poison that renders the users addicted and drives them to destroy their own and other's lives, you would be livid, and rightly so. I wouldn't, because I know it isn't true; my friend is evidence of that.
It is incorrect to assume "militia" means "army."  Miltia: "the whole body of able-bodied male citizens declared by law as being subject to call to military service" http://www.m-w.com/dictionary/militia So, in the modern context, we can discount the mysogyny, and assert that the modern militia is simply all able bodied, competent citizens. Your argument assumes that the role of government is to manage and control its citizens to presumably optimize their condition, which is, of course, antithetical to individual liberty. Since individual liberty is the cornerstone of the Republic, your thesis does not apply here. 
"Banning guns makes criminals less deadly." Ensuring that criminals don't have guns does, indeed, make the criminals less deadly. There's no evidence whatsoever (at least in the US) that banning guns keeps the criminals from having them. 
Die 64-bit-Version ist noch einmal deutlich stärker: http://www.husvankempen.de/nunn/cegtrating4040best.html Siehe auch das Interview mit Vasik Rajlich: http://www.uciengines.de/UCI-Engines/Rybka/vrivd/hauptteil_vrivd.html
I'm not a math guy at all (I did Classics, so I did read some Euclid), but I though it was really funny - the references to the rewriting of the postulate at the root of non-Euclidean geometry, the references to Fractals and using distributed computing to create them, and the reference to Fermat's last theorem, were all well done.  The intro. line was great too, "When a famous mathematician has something new to say, the whole world pays attention."
Cool story. Can you point me to a source on that? (Not intended as a challenge, just a request for further information.) Oh, and I mean the Ben Franklin story. Regarding your own story, you have my sympathies. 
I don't have a TV, so I've never seen an episode of "Bullshit" before this. Are they always so slanted? Please note, I'm against gun control myself. I'd especially love for my disabled girlfriend to be able to get a concealed carry permit. (We live in California, so it's unlikely.) Still, I was annoyed at how Penn &amp; Teller kept calling the gun control advocate "Mr. Smug" and otherwise using their voice-overs as a way of framing and shaping the debate to slant it toward their own side. If they thought their position could stand on its own, why not let it do so? Instead, they acted like they thought their own anti-gun-control position needed extra cheerleading. It really undermined their point, and my previous respect for them. 
Very cool, tons of stuff there.
You'd say that about academics in any decade after Marx was *born*.
Very nice but this is the Polish reddit Fajna sprawa, ale to jest reddit dla textów po polsku
Excellent resource for Londonners interested in meditation and/or Buddhism - weekly classes at over 25 London venues
 Appreciate it but this is the Polish reddit Fajna sprawa, ale to jest reddit dla textów po polsku 
In Polish only in this reddit please
of course it's real, try it out yourself.
Why is this a joke? Don't get me wrong. It IS insane to ask programmers to be this strict, but most of these style guidelines can be automatically enforced. It would certainly produce a much readable and "standard" styled code.
I think Dawkins would object to being associated with pantheism mumbo-jumbo.
Broken links.
Article from local paper about how the City Manager - "with 22 years of computer experience" - got quite irate when his city web site showed the "CentOS how to set up a web server" page and ended up threatening to call the FBI on them, despite their best efforts to point out that his own IT folks needed to fix this. Your tax dollars at work.
At first I thought it was real but the single sql file with 70k lines got me suspicious. ;)
37 degrees 14'42.08" N  115 degrees 49'13.34 W Roughly
The Boston Phoenix has a great article this week about this and other websites. http://thephoenix.com/article_ektid7187.aspx
You're absolutely right. Even zero altitude to 12 *hundred* feet in four seconds would be tough on a reporter, and probably what happened. The plane needs to climb at an *average* of 18,000 fpm (about 180 knots) during those four seconds.  That's not a problem for it, but going from zero climb at the start means you need more than 180 knots upwards at the end. Assuming that you accelerated to some arbitrarily high speed just above the ground and then did a constant G pull-up, it would take a steady 4.5 G pull-up to get to 1200 ft in the first four seconds of climb, at which point you'd be going up at 360 knots.  Which means you'd need to start with a fair bit more speed than that horizontally -- close to 500 knots, probably You could also do it with a much harder pull up to vertical, and a climb speed only a little over 180 knots.  Start with 250 knots, say, and do a 9 G pull-up to near vertical.  That would be even harder on the reporter, but is probably what they did. 
Thank YHVH the "The Register" article about Bush Administration circulating a memo calling for an "extension" of his second term is fake.
Our troops are dying so that Iraqis can be free to kill our troops. What a joke.
Notice how The Register didn't report the news, but simply copied the ebay post.  I don't even see a link to the ebay auction that they are referencing! I voted up for this submission, but The Register does not have a shed of integrity or credibility.
Funny, a while ago I took a look at these and used them as the basis for my own Lisp interpreter.  Of course, it isn't a very small Lisp interpreter (compiles down to about 270K at minimum), but that's because it has a decent feature-set.
No - it is real.  Use Google Earth, not Google Maps.  The little green (OK, blue) men are there.
If so, that doesn't discount this one being the oldest -living- animal.  ;)
Explains the meaning behind the Eight Auspicious Symbols of Buddhism
I too am very impressed with Devanagai - it's an excelent writing system and covers far more phonemes that the roman alphabet, and does so far more coherently.  I loved the fact that I could sort out where to find a word in the Sanskrit lexicon by moving my tongue slowly forward - the ordering has a basis in something that was non-arbitrary.  One thing that I was surprised by was that the order of characters in the lexicon, and much of the work in developing those cool phonetic arrays was done initially by Western scholars.
“This is just a bunch of freaks out there that don’t have anything better to do,” he said. “When I came in to work Monday morning, I had about 500 e-mails, plus anonymous phone calls from all the geeks out there. [CentOS is] a free operating system that this guy gives away, which tells you how much time he’s got on his hands...I’m not about to follow any instructions on an unknown web page,” Taylor said. “That could put a virus on my system.” - Yes, talking to your ISP can put a virus on your system. Good grief!
Or of course the other likely posssibilily (maybe more likely) is that it was 0 - 12,000 ft in *40* seconds. 
I tend to go more for the simple approach, for example, swapping out the masthead on our engineering class website for the [Lonely Hearts Band](http://tron09.com/?special=lonely). And for what it's worth, I thought SQL on Rails was pretty funny, and quite elaborate.
That system of protection sounds a lot like an arms race. You own a gun to protect yourself from people who own a gun, and the police carry a gun because most situations they get called to will then involve armed citizens. If everyone's armed then no one gets hurt right? What kind of protection are you offering your family if you have a shootout in your home with an armed thug?
thanks, I guess?
which did you base yours on?  hedgehog or SIOD are both good if you can tolerate a largeish (~200K) image size. If your lisp is available to the public, I'll add it to the page.
If you read the few sentences The Register did add you'll know why they have screenshots rather than links (hint: eBay don't have a sense of humour). 
&gt; "London is now considered one of the most violent cities in the world. Handguns were banned there in 1997." Some facts for you: London murder rate: 2.4 per 100,000 (2005) ([source](http://www.timesonline.co.uk/article/0,,3-1424319,00.html))  New York murder rate: 6.9 per 100,000 (2005) In fact, only El Paso, Texas, has a lower homicide rate than London among major US Cities (according to [these figures](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_cities_by_crime_rate)). i.e. Every major US city has a higher murder rate than London. 
The headline should read - "Local Village Idiot Refuses to Admit What a Tool He Really Is"
I'm glad that your friend ended up well-adjusted.  Would you say, were someone in a similar situation to pray for an arm, that they would be like a kid asking for ice cream 3 meals per day?  It sounds like the answer is yes, that anyone asking for anything in their prayers is a child before god, and they will either get it or not, and if they don't, then it must be for the best, because god knows best, and everyone else knows nothing.  Is that about how you'd characterize it?
In case anyone missed this, Reddit's joke is in the logo. Cute.
http://jiggscasey.com/newhtml/index.html
He nails it.  "We got bought!" is old.
As explained here: http://reddit.com/info?id=3s4l :)
does anyone else find the US gun debate absolutely bizarre? It's like an argument over the tip of an iceberg, where everyone (on both sides) refuses to discuss the enormous mass beneath the surface. The video also spends about 10 minutes disecting the constitution like some sort of bible. Has anyone in America ever had the temerity to suggest that the founding fathers might have been wrong on this? I hope no-one shoots me.
Don't use Ajax for the sake of using Ajax, sounding cool, l33t, and web2.0. Use it when it makes sense. Using Ajax to serve up every page you might want a search engine to see is not one of these cases. It makes perfect sense to use Ajax with things that do not to be indexed or followed by search engines to provide immediate feedback to user interaction.
The videos are in the TV screenish thing to the right - click the labelled buttons at the top to watch the videos.
It's surreal looking at the prices... they're charging less than Toronto's public transit fare for some of those flights! How is it that the TTC, a publicly-subsidized institution, still has to charge $2.50 for a one-way bus ticket?
This game didn't seem to work for me in Firefox.  I can't see what I type, and when I hit enter, the word always floats to the top, regardless of whether or not it is supposed to.
meh, it worked for me in firefox
True.  I agree with Penn and Teller, but the constitution is only proof that gun control is *illegal*, not *wrong*.  I believe it's wrong for entirely different reasons. Anyway, what is this enormous mass you speak of?  Let's get it out in the open! :)
It currently doesn't have webspace, but I can send you a tarball. My email address is eligottlieb@gmail.com, and I have decent spam filtering. I didn't actually use any code from one there, I rolled my own.  However, I read up on how they were built and used some of those ideas to write mine.
xtreme Perl is a book about Extreme Programming using the programming language Perl. This site contains the entire book
Ohhhhh ... Now I get it.
Except a sufficient amount of absence of (reasonable) proof _is_ (reasonable) proof of absence. That is, eventually it accumalates to the point that the probability really is strong in one direction. Some cases faster than others. (depending on the specific likelyhoods)
ie, if there're a whole lot of cases in which hypothesis A would somewhat somewhat E to occur, hypothesis B would predict strongly ~E, and in general only ~E happened, then it would end up being strong evidence. Ie, a sufficient amount of it really does shift things to "beyond reasonable doubt"
A little different maths trick which will guess your age and choclate habits. A simpler one taking less than one min.
Some can, some can't. Sort of like hand-drawn characters--some of the rotoscoped Disney stuff is embarassing, some of it works well. Finding Nemo is brilliantly human, while in the Polar Express zombies walk the earth.
Reddit has a new logo, a mixture of google's, yahoo's and microsoft's logo. So we can call it a GYM (Google,Yahoo.microsoft) logo.
I can understand Tom Adelstein's decision to give up on pushing open source in government.  I have two computer lives.  At home I have FreeBSD servers and a Mac power book.  At work I use windows workstations and we have Sun/Solaris servers.  All I can say is that I'm happy that we use Solaris for the servers.  I watch our Microsoft administrator adding patches pretty much every week.  The Sun servers we run require much less of that. Getting things done in government takes patience.  I have some interface agreements still being staffed, that I started in 2003.  I'm hoping they will be signed by the end of 2006....  It’s like kicking a dead whale down the beach. Getting back to the adoption of Microsoft in government, I see one key claim that Microsoft will never be able to make.  Their software can never be verified if they don't release the source for verification.  With all the noise you here about security in government, I'm surprised that the proprietary nature of Microsoft software isn't a bigger issue.  I guess it could have been one of the drivers that finally pushed Sun to release Solaris 10 as open source.  There are a lot of forces in Government that continue to push the Microsoft rollout.  I feel lucky to be in a place where we still run unix systems.
I think my favourite car commercial of all time is the one where the guy touches the car and has the fantasy/dream about it, and then at the end, he touches the picture of the woman... can't find it anywhere, and obviously the manufacturer failed, since I don't even remember which one it was. Honda, on the whole, does pretty well with avant-garde auto ads. The Element one with the LEGO is good, as is the Civic one with the bobble-head people.
Yeah, well, they give it away with the error pages and the cracks about uploading multiple profiles. If they'd been less obvious, I'd have fallen for it. After all, this is the company that launched Gmail on this day two years ago.
It's interesting that most of the cheaters are small business owners.  But at the same time, it isn't very surprising, given that the tax code is written in such a way to make it very easy for small bussiness owners to underreport.
The only April Fool's joke I actually fell for today was Google Romance, because they released Gmail on April 1 and the front page was pretty professional. Everything else was pretty lame. At least Wikipedia admins were responsible enough this year to keep the front page relatively sane (last year there were amazing wheel wars about how silly it ought to be).
I guess I'll spoil it for everyone and say it works, as an oversimplification, by converting canvas methods into VML, something (I guess) IE does support.
I'm refering to the underlying social causes that lead to this debate being framed in such desperate terms: ghettoization, inequality of oppurtunity, gang culture, poverty, police oppression, and so on.  Advocates of gun ownership like P&amp;T are defending their right to protect themselves from the symptoms of these problems, rather than asking how one might tackle their root causes for the common good - in order to create a society where there would be little reason to fear the sort of violent attack they're concerned about. For example, the woman in the video says she carries a gun to ensure 'equality'. Her reasoning is sound, but continually asking only how one might protect oneself from crime will perpetuate a vicious circle of civil armament.  Penn &amp; Teller advance some fairly logical pro-gun arguments, but they're entirely self-interested ones that ignore the empirical evidence that a pro-gun ownership culture leads to higher levels of gun crime. Advocates of gun control also seem reluctant to point to any real evidence - seemingly the constitution is sacrosanct the only way to defend gun control is to quibble over its semantics.
You DO realize that this commercial makes extensive use of CGI.  Many of those mechanical interactions are faked.  It still is an impressive piece of advertising though.
That is good propaganda. But how about sending the girls onto front line?
That was nissan
this commercial is like 2 years old, but definately worth the watch (again)
"When you think about it, love is just another search problem." Great stuff.
"most of the small lisps are single namespace.  i do not know why" - because they are schemes, not CL implementations.
I think this links to the TinyScheme he refers to:   http://tinyscheme.sourceforge.net/home.html
All such emotional reddit users have modded down the above comment. Cool, way to go humans.
Don't forget, it's a "1 April exclusive."
That's a Google ad (probably for "atheism"). The website is a freethought archive, some other neat things here too. http://www.reitstoen.com/multimedia.php
You don't have any idea what you are talking about. Do you?
It's already my style of Python coding anyway :)
On the other hand, how valuable are the products that don't make it to market because of patents?  It's well known that a monopoly is economically inefficient.  What about all the companies that don't exist because someone had already patented their idea? Ideas are not scarce like property, so it doesn't make sense to treat them that way.  If property could be copied like information, there would be no need for a concept of "ownership" because everyone could have anything they ever wanted - food, cars, houses, your own planet even.  Ideas are not subject to the same restrictions of property, and the problems with the patent system are just symptoms of the real problem, which is that we are treating a non-scarce resourse as if it were scarce.
They failed to notice that Harriet was female for how long? Wasn't she laying eggs before that?
Afraid not...  http://www.snopes.com/autos/business/hondacog.asp
Exceptionally bad taste for the Washington Post, IMHO.
Interesting how they consider collecting more taxes "generating" money.  I'd be more likely to consider that money mostly destroyed through government waste, since at that point it becomes OPM (Other People's Money).  Why not just let the people who earned it spend it on something they want or need? 
If this didn't have a date of 27 March on it I'd think it another April 1st gag. A marine biology researcher called Frank Fish? Really?
Another reason why working for yourself is better than working for others.
A list of pages not to visit... excellent.
I thought a last name like that can't possibly be real, but the author seems legit:  http://www.time.com/time/europe/hero/politkovskaya.html  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anna_Politkovskaya   
What kind of protection are you providing if the armed thug can just walk in and shoot your family with impunity? A shootout is certainly an undesirable outcome, but it's better than being slaughtered.
Perhaps it's possible, but it's not really easy, as far as I can tell.  It's pretty easy to install and run a .jar file, but there isn't any mechanism in place to add executables, so you'd have to do some reasonably serious hacking/reverse engineering, I think. Symbian lets you write code in C, but for the moment it's only present on higher end phones.
&gt;I have problems with escalation because there are inevitable conclusions: from handguns to shotguns to automatics to explosives and beyond. I don't think we're headed down that slippery slope. Most people who want to carry guns for protection[0] don't want anything but a handgun. Larger weapons are too heavy, bulky and unwieldy to use in crowded situations. More deadly weapons, like grenades are totally inappropriate to any likely self-defense situation. What people really want is a pocket instrument of instant incapacitation. Death just happens to be a side effect. I'd gladly trade my pistol for something that could incapacitate people just as reliably as long as it was of similar size with similar effective range, accuracy and capacity. [0] When not doing a job that specifically requires it, like law enforcement or military, or going in to a war zone.
The [source](http://www.childdeathreview.org/causes.htm) I just checked says otherwise, but defines 'child' as 0-18 and might not be the most reliable source in the world, as they seem to have an agenda. If you only include accidental shootings, you might be right. The afformentioned source says a few more children are intentionally killed with firearms than drowned, but *many* more drown than get shot to death accidentally.
hilarious version of what really happened with Judas and Jesus
That is a good argument for collecting less taxes, but not a good argument for making tax collection less fair.
An office worker's brain gets splattered on a busy city street, which overwhelms an eyewitness with questions on eternity.
Just a hilarious take on childhood delusion of grandeur.
http://reddit.com/info?id=3s1w
1. Cockroaches communicate through chemicals  2. ???  3. Cockroaches devide themselves perfectly between shelters
äh -&gt; Fortbewegungsmittel
Hier noch ein weiterer Überblick über die Entwicklung bei den Schachengines: http://www.beepworld.de/members39/computerschach2/bff-liste.htm
Originally seen [here](http://www.chipx86.com/blog/?p=166). The first comment is inspiring.
Very nice!
Very nice!
Top nice babe that Nella!! 
Damn shes hot!!
Hep..thats burning!
WoW
Thats nice!
Any reason why you choose to call the Russian Revolution so-called? 
Shouldn't this be posted to reddit.com and not the de sureddit?
Good read; I had one small nit pick: it says Slackware has limited hardware detection, while I was, as a Slackware-user-since-7.1 (2.2.16 kernel), impressed by the level of hardware configuration I had to do for my laptop: zero.
The terrorists have won.
I can speak about my country and i can tell you that incidents involving guns (used by police, honest citizens or criminals) are extremely rare. Last big gun related incident (measured by the amount of attention invested by the press and the public opinion) was last November i think.
harsh 
Ah, thanks.
「ウォール街がウェブバブル 2.0 の真っ最中だ。しかし私が心配するのは、インターネットのプロフェッショナルたちが、危険なバブルの匂いに酔いしれて、彼らの趣向や趣味が一般的なユーザたちと同じであると勘違いしてしまっているのではないか、ということだ。」
Interesting.  Though I would rather see a video of someone actually using it instead of the stylized cartoon commercial they provide on the site.
You're right - my mistake.
Blogを書くのが仕事になっていませんか...あたりが良い。
Why do you think that?
This is only true if the house prices are not already too heated up.  It's the same as you would say "Buy tech stocks!" in middle of previous bubble before it has bursted.
I wonder if maybe we are accepting medicines like this too much without being concerned about their long-term side effects. Some research shows the storage of long-term memories is largely done during sleep, for example, and many other things happen during sleep, as mentioned in the article.
I first thought he meant the [Common Gateway Interface](http://hoohoo.ncsa.uiuc.edu/cgi/), but then I realized he actually meant [computer-generated imagery](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Computer-generated_imagery).
I have to confess that I didn't realise [this](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/europe/4867024.stm) was a joke (so obvious with hindsight). I did wonder why I'd never seen it in Ikea.
Right.  As soon as someone says "riskless way to become a millionaire!", you *know* it's time to stay away from whatever they're advocating.
I don't want to be a cynic, but I'm pretty sure a mouse and keyboard is still more efficient, and a lot cheaper.
Nice article. "Western" people are not aware what kind of shit is happening here. Anna is one of the few Russian journalists who is not afraid to say the truth.
It's the concept that matters. Give them a few years, and there will be a lot of applications where interfaces like this are much more effective than today's technology. This is an example of what Ray Kurzweil calls a competing paradigm: the early versions of the technology are very clumsy, but as the technology matures, it replaces the earlier ways of doing things. And don't even get me started on those brain-computer-interfaces. They seem to be some years away even for high-end purposes, but I can't wait for the day when I can think text into my word processor.
Or Eolas falls under his "patent troll" category.
What a sad article. I'm crying for Allen because he is only worth 15 billion dollars. I'll ignore Allen's own words.... “I made out okay,” he told me when I asked about it. In my experience, if they setup the company as a 50%-50% share it would not be worth nearly as much today. Ask around, divided splits with an even number of controlling interest parties...    "I am told that Paul Allen heard Gates and Ballmer discussing his health and talking about how to get his Microsoft shares back if Allen were to die."   This is not an unreasonable concern for a business. In my last business (multiple founders) we built a buy back based on death into the terms of the LLC for all of the founders. We also put insurance in place to fund the buy back.  He throws a lot of mud in this article and provides almost no information. I'm not sure why it is rated so high. I need to train my filter to recognize Robert X. Cringely. 
The last sentence *is* a good simple guide ("The investment should be divided as one-third should be in real estate, one-third in stocks and one-third in bonds"). Although a lump of cash ought to be included too. 
Small business owners are also the most likely to be focused simply on surviving, and the difference between taking any money home this week or not is whether or not you pay your taxes.  Gee, I wonder why they decide to pay their mortgage instead? :-) I'm not saying it is right. Just that it is real.
Is it too much to ask that those who submit stories exhibit some basic English skills?  I don't want to see this site turn into another Slashdot/Digg. If English isn't your primary language (or you're just not sure), copy the headline; that's acceptable. And for the record, the title should be, "Too busy to iron?  Get your washing machine to do it."  (Might as well dispense with the not-so-subtle sexism as well.)
Spencer, who is all of 29 years old, is poised to disrupt the $7 billion market for office telecom switches (often called PBXs) much the way the Linux open-source computer operating system crushed the price of business computing and brought woe to established leaders such as Microsoft and Sun Microsystems.
&gt; [CentOS is] a free operating system that this guy gives away, which tells you how much time he’s got on his hands. Priceless. It seems that Mr. Taylor never learns.
We should start putting question mark boxes up everywhere.
Yes.
"If you do web development and need your pages to render properly in any browser, you should take a look at the latest open source project from Google." If you need your pages to render properly in any browser, shouldn't you first try to stick to the W3C (X)HTML and CSS specs?
Finally a way to solve a [Cake cutting problem](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cake_cutting_problem)! Just feed the cake to cockroaches and let them divide it.
True.  I don't think it's going to happen though: "Finally, five years after his brainstorm became the law, Szilagyi, who earned about $80,000 annually at the time, was given a check for $25,000." How's that for rewarding good perfomance?  Guy helps out his agency to the tune of billions, and gets a $25,000 check five years after the fact. Tax collection is one place where I appreciate the government's lack of incentive to do a good job.
Looks nice, but doesn't play the songs i want. You can't analyze music just by it's characteristics. It works on paper, but you can have completely different music with exactly the same characteristics. So, i'm still a [last.fm](http://last.fm) user.
Daylight savings time is a fundamentally dumb idea. Just say that government, schools, and TV shows all run an hour ahead of time in the summer. Boom! Problem solved. No clock fiddling needed.
Not the first time I share the *love* of having an *useful* explanation from the poster. If I wasn't able to read or click a link ...
"Benjamin Franklin ... wrote that he was ... surprised that the sun was up, well before his usual noon rising." This is the man who wrote "early to bed, early to rise, makes a man healthy, wealthy and wise."?
What's funny is that the independent reporting agency does not seem to take into account all of the items that individuals could write off on their taxes as business expenses, etc. that they are too ignorant to write off. That would be one healthy chunk of change.
Competition is not "economic damage".
How is that damage?  I was expecting a virus or other malicious program, or a really stupid programming error, perhaps in the financial sector.  I was *not* expecting a story about someone coming in, undercutting the incumbents, and taking their customers.  That is not damage: that is business.
LookUp needs to start looking down
If people think the terrorists have started putting bombs in brightly-coloured cartoony boxes for unsuspecting citizens, maybe it's time to call out for [our last hope](http://img64.exs.cx/img64/6748/batsignal2r2cy.jpg). 
Who needs sensitivity, curiousity, or simple human decency when you work for the government? Once you're working for the city, you can send the FBI out to round up people who give away operating systems! You know you're a real man once you can do things like that!
[The story of its development](http://glenmurphy.com/blog/2006/03/explorercanvas.html).
Wow! nicely done. Now, if we only could push this to some mainstream media. It would make people think even more about things like DRM.
This is what happens when people would rather change their bodies than their societies.
Why mod down this? Because a lisp thing is written in Python? crazy buggers.
Well, his New Year's predictions usually have an above-average accuracy rate (even if you count out the non-predictions). And here he's predicting trouble for Microsoft, which is a rather interesting meme.
Predicting Microsoft's death seems to be fashionable at the moment, in the same way that every man and his dog were predicting what Google would do next (WWGD).
It at least got our attention.  Kinda funny.  I wonder if people gravitate to bad news stories faster than good news stories?  I wonder if someone could study the logs on reddit to write some sorta paper on it... and then "reddit" that paper...
I wonder what the Scandanavians do; their mornings must shift by hours.
I dislike using the constitution as a bible as well.  But there is plenty of evidence that gun ownership leads to less crime.  Switzerland is one of the best example out there, along with Finland and Israel. There are many countries with virtual gun bans that have far higher crime rates than the US: Mexico, Russia, and Brazil for example. More evidence is that when you compare the US States with shall-issue concealed carry laws, they have lower crime on average than those without.  In Vermont, you don't even need a permit to carry a gun, and Vermont has one of the lowest violent crime rates in the nation.  Washington DC is the opposite in both ways.  Florida's crime rate dropped after they liberalized their gun laws, and many other states are seeing the same effects. It is true that crime rates are affected by many issues, especially cultural ones and police efficiency.  Japan is culturally very authoritarian, for example, when compared with the U.S.  But even when you allow for such cultural differences, places with high gun ownership tend to have less crime than those with strict laws.  I blame a lot of the US's high crime rate on the drug war - it's like we never learned the lesson from prohibition.  Then it was the mafia, now it's street gangs. The best way to create a society where there is little to fear from violent crime, is to make a society where criminals are scared shitless of their armed victims.  All they have to do to stop being scared is stop committing crime, which is an extremely powerful incentive.  The US government could solve its violent crime problem eliminating every gun law (not crime law, obviously) and legalizing all drugs, giving the saved money back to the taxpayers.  Unfortunately, when something repeatedly doesn't work, the natural government response is to do it harder. As far as underlying social causes, I believe that guns are much more valuable to the poor than to the well-off, and laws against affordable (or "cheap" guns) are very harmful.  If inner city poor are allowed to carry protection, it helps decrease crime and reverse "ghettoization," by making gangs less powerful and therefore less attractive.  Depending on others for protection is a luxury few can afford. But you're right, Penn and Teller really could have put a lot more evidence out there.  John Lott's books are supposedly very well-researched, and I'm disappointed they didn't give him more time.
Anmoder flere å legge inn linker med tittel som begynner på  'Beste norskspråklige podcast?'.
Damn, I'm whistling the Mario theme song now. Not another week of Mario! eep!
It is worth reading Freakonomics (see http://www.freakonomics.com/ ) if this question interests you. To summarise several of the chapters of this book "No, it doesn't guarantee it, but it helps"
&gt; He had earlier built an instant-messaging client called Gaim, which has become popular among the open-source crowd. Spencer didn't actually build Gaim, did he? Am I right in thinking he was just one of many contributers? Its a shame that people covering stories don't actually know what they are talking about in said subject field.
With a misleadingly negative portrayal of its findings, of course.
That they're in trouble over this is simply depressing. I think the idea was really cute.
29 Year Old Programmer May Have Created 7 Billion Dollars Worth of Value.
Relative to the hundreds of billions the IRS takes in the few billion increase is good but not spectacular.  If you scale that down to corporation numbers I'd expect a bigger bonus ($50k?) but hey $25k is nothing to sneeze at.
I find it amazing that the law is considered so elastic that the authorities can "find" some law that the girls broke.  Why have law if some police officer can hunt through the rubbish heap and "find" some offense for just about exercise of rights?
Now you have two problems.
I think it is easier to fiddle with my clock then to remember to do everything an hour later.
You know, I hadn't even realized I was humming it until I read your comment. I just saw the boxes and started without thinking about it....
Why didn't you just link to the video?
RIGHT ON!!!!
OUTSTANDING!!!!!
And to the point of the concept, I have a feeling this is not being developed to play Warcraft.  It is probably being developed on a military contract to make a better way to control automated field units.
I suspect it's more related to the target audience.  You use these when you only need a lil' bit o' lisp.
that's not sexism. It's social commentary.
Actually I'm gladd you posted this Matt.  I enjoyed immensely it months ago when you posted it in a comment.
um does this just use the word lessig to get votes? this isn't that different from what most good profs do now.
No...if he really does replace the telecom switch industry, then he has _created_ $7 billion worth of wealth because people have everything they had before plus they now have 7 billion dollars to spend on something new, and the people who used to work in the telecom industry are now free to put their labor to other productive purposes.
But in this case it sounds like they were conspiring behind his back. Regardless of the veracity, Cringely is always an interesting read.
Interesting comment on some of the shakeout in the podcasting world by the CEO of ClickCaster.
Photos of the aftermath: http://www.cargolaw.com/2006nightmare_hyundai_for3.html#the-feature
And dude, like, did you ever notice that dog is god spelled backwards?  Whoa.
I didn't mean to bring up the "DaVinci Code" example because I think patents should be allowed if homage is paid -- rather, to show that "submarine copyright" lawsuits are rare and most often lose. BTW, the US currently is using "first to invent" instead of "first to file." I don't want the person who invents later to be able to invalidate the patent, or get the patent instead.  Instead, assuming that the person can truly show independent work, they get to work in limited ways. Then again, it would still be expensive to work around patents on obvious things, like F-Secure's patent on a remote virus scanner that you mentioned in another comment. 
While I enjoyed most of the article, the opening of the article bothers me. The author says that the Ivies are for those who are bright, and that Duke and top-tier state schools (like W &amp; M and Berkeley) aren't all that: so that means Dartmouth is preferable to U Chicago for a kid that wants to be a classicist or economist or architect? Maybe the author is trying to replicate the cluelessness of rich parents aiming only for status and power. Or maybe no one really knows what an "academic ranking" is, or how the "history of a school which has world famous departments and alumni" might be relevant to the school.
Wow! Brilliant!
Why did you say damage?
It's a puppy.
After I read a headline, and when I go back to the page I can't find it as easily in the same page. Maybe reduce the number of headlines per page or figure out some way of formatting so the headlines can be easily found.
I think everyone here ought to contact the police department and the prosecutor's office and ask them if they have *any* idea what a joke is. I already have.
Interesting style - makes me think of the Bob Dylan video for Subterranean Lovesick Blues
doesn't seem to work
what US armed forces? they're all in iraq.
The poster is confusing basic economics. When we replace human labor of any kind with a machine, we are better off for it. The more industries we can eliminate with machines, the richer society becomes.
Do you really think you'd care if you had "slide burn" if you escaped an airplane emergency?
that guy doesn't know what he's talking about, since he recommends personal firewalls, and those do not furfill any purpose.
I'd develop it for Y Combinator if they'd fund me. I doubt that would happen though.  Anyway, I posted my proposed solution to these problems on my website: http://www.alexkrupp.com/fourwebs.html There are really two basic issues: 1)Seperate commercial identity from noncommercial identity. There are many billion dollar attempts to create a unified identity for ecommerce sites. The chances of a small player succeeding here is zero. That being said, you can create a seperate identity for blogs, WoW, onlike poker, etc. 2)Each person can only make one account, but that account isn't necessarily linked back to the person. For example, get your Iris scanned and use your unique Iris to get an account activation code. Then you create an account, but your iris isn't actually linked to your account. This way each person can make only one account, but based on your account there is no way to find out who you are, and based on who you are there is no way to find out your account. Anyway, I mostly design, I don't really enjoy coding. That being said, if someone enjoys coding and wants to tackle this stuff then I will take care of the social stuff :-)
I wish they'd covered HOW they got to be like that!
this is waaay old. nice pictures, though.
If a little DST saves energy, why not a lot? At what point do we wake up too early and go to bed when its still light out? And what if businesses naturally shift to a 10:00 to 6:00 work day? Then we could move DST even earlier to compensate. So, in order to counter-act the natural cultural adjustment that occurs because people like to sleep in, the government could consistently increase DST by an hour every five years, or two, or one, or quarterly? I live in Arizona, and it drives me crazy trying to keep track of which time zone I am currently in. The rest of the country should take their lead and either lock in DST or lock it out.
Gee, tell me [something I don't already know](http://thomas.loc.gov/)!
why GIFs? 
who the hell saves photos as GIFs??? Half a meg each
He hasn't created anything but his software (which is really cool) and his company. The wealth, he's just redistributed.
She said "Islamic terrorism cases", not "Islamic terrorism". There is a huge difference: the former is about injustice, the latter is about fear-mongering. Being the typical lazy American, I cannot read Russian, so the links you provide do nothing prove your point to us "west-oriented bullshit" readers. I also like how you acknowledge that "unsavory practices" occur but then focus on the piece as propoganda to be dismissed. Sorry, but if you read about torture and are not emotionally charged, you have a problem. You sound like one of Putin's people trying to spin this.
John Harmer needs a blow job.
Wrong.  The software _is_ the wealth.
Once again, a social-conservative group will fund science as long as its conclusions converge with their agenda. If science says otherwise... look up what happened to Surgeon General C. Everet Koop, a conservative man if there ever was one, when he refused to bend and spin a government-commissioned scientific report on effects of abortion. Basically: they tore him a new one.
Build a wall on the Border
&gt;Perfectly simple-minded. Rather brilliantly simple-minded, I'd say ;) It's just a cartoon, people.. Get real! And as for christians... the Pope's stand and episcopal church stand was pretty unambiguous. "We do not support Intelligent Design"
This is clearly the work of the Riddler!
Correlation is not causation.  An equally plausible explanation is that brighter people spend more time putting their frontal cortex to use, thus triggering its growth.
yardımcı olun
The advice is sound but the writing style is grating.
We must be really, truly entering another tech-stock upswing - time to talk about the Death of MS again.
Can folks here recommend other such books that convey technical ideas using clear, yet evocative, writing?  Geeky books that are well-written, where the writing makes the book enjoyable even if you've no inital interest in the topic.
It is not the education - it is who you meet, who your roommate is, who your frat brothers are.  You can extract a really good, cheap education from about any school if you go there and work your ass off.  But if your suite-mate is the son of a senator, you might have more oppurtunities than someone at University of Idaho.  I am talking undergrad, BTW.
Hey I'm a fucking Card Carrying Liberal, but holy shit guys, I'm about to cancel Dish Network. Why? Not because of the adult channels, all that stuff is locked out. It's because of the goddamn advertisements for PORNO PAY PER VIEW. It's like they're on every channel. Any idea if I can turn that stuff off? Throw me a bone here people!
The article doesn't mention CentOS, even in passing.  So, I could hardly recommend it to anyone as a useful guide to the important current Linux distributions.
cool blog site!
cool blog site!
Ja, netter Repost einer Story aus dem **englischsprachigen** reddit. :-( 
It should also be noted that Ryan, the author, also writes one of the best comics on the internets, [Dinosaur Comics](http://qwantz.com).
Could you please post their contact information?
Please don't tell my boss about this stuff... 48 hours shifts anyone?
Much of it's common sense, but I really wish the page provided a reference for updating the max TCP ports manually (surely just a registry tweak) rather than linking to some dude's .exe 'patch' which will magically do it for you. No way I'm running that, thanks.
Bleh. First it's "We're not getting enough sleep!" and now it's "You won't need to sleep!". I think I'll just go outside.
rggffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffg
rererer
eretg rgbgr
It is a gorgeous clip. My only concern is that it *is* a little bit void of info... like, my biggest fear with TC is how it squelches any developer who can't get their code "signed" or whatever.
The word is used to describe this style. No prof here does it Lessig style. I did it once and they discouraged it: "it's ok for a keynote but never to this with your thesis!" Our profs slides are made und used more like scripts.
Cyber-sex, war, and erection-inducing drugs are a recipe for a more socially inept, violent culture, according to a panel of top US sex experts.  The concern was raised as researchers discussed "The Future of Sex" at an unprecedented summit near Santa Fe, New Mexico, late last week. "The de-interaction of sex is something I worry about," said Julia Heiman, director of the Kinsey Institute for Research in Sex, Gender and Reproduction 
Actually the .exe patch is well respected in p2p circles.  Check the wikis of all the major bt clients and you will see it gets a mention.  I would however strongly recommend getting it [directly from the author](http://www.lvllord.de/?lang=en&amp;url=downloads). It isnt a registry tweak - it patches tcpip.sys which has the connection limit hardcoded.
Yeah, that sucks. Sorry about that. I didn't notice it.
What about Adolf Hitler's death?  (Shout outs to my main man Godwin)
Now that Ken Livingstone, the Mayor of London, has backed Sir Ian Blair, one can see that donkeys of a feather flock together
This sounds very much like the "war on Christmas". I've heard  enough right-wing propaganda to know to be careful in trusting "my friend who was the only one who will talk about this."
Ah, how sweet! They gave kitty his own handgrenade.
Non-Emergency line for the police department: 330.296.6486
According to Joel Spolsky that 7 billion went into the setup of the system ( http://www.cio.com/podcasts/spolsky.html ). I suppose some of it actually did, but all of it? I think not.
One benefit is that, by being syntactically separate from the standard argument list, it is quite easy to write methods that handle a variable number of standard arguments (with perhaps default values) without worrying about getting confused about the block argument.  This gives you two 'dimensions' on which to define the API for your method: (1) the regular arguments and (2) the optional block argument. It gets better.  Ruby allows key/value pairs to be implicitly gathered up into a hash, which is passed as a final 'standard' argument and also allows a method to define required arguments, default arguments, and optional arguments.  When you put this all  together you get an extremely flexible method calling syntax that can be used to create internal domain specific languages quite easily. Ruby on Rails and Rake are both examples of this.  From Rails &amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;Products.find\_by\_name('widget', :all, :order =&gt; "price", :limit =&gt; 10) which results in three standard arguments passed to the find_by_name method.  The last argument is a hash with two keys, :order, and :limit.  Here is an example from Rake: task :mytask =&gt; [:priortask1, :priortask2] do &amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;#code for :mytask end This is a single method call to 'task'  with one regular argument, a hash with one key (:mytask) and matching value which is an array of two elements. This call also illustrates that parens are often optional on method calls.  This method call has an associated block of code delimited by do/end.  The do/end keywords are instead of {} but bind more loosely than {}. Anyway, once you play around with the standard libraries you quickly see how nicely the optional trailing block argument works in most cases.  If you really need multiple block arguments you can construct them via lambda/proc and pass them via the standard argument list.   
Strange, because saying that we are [destroying the earth](http://www.livescience.com/technology/destroy_earth_mp.html), and using that to argue the case for a human cull, is an anthropocentric view in itself (in a way). Unless we turn our planet into a cloud of dust, the cockroaches will not really mind.  Taking a very anti-anthropocentric view is often quite shocking, so why not go the whole way?  John Gray argues against it - and [**Straw Dogs**](http://tinyurl.com/z3g5a) is a great, mind-opening read.
Having read the intro to the article, I detected the humor in LookUps catchy title.
exactly!
http://www.ci.ravenna.oh.us/ http://www.portageprosecutor.com/
That is not strictly correct.  Tinyscheme and Siod are schemes, but hedgehog is not.  I think now that little lisps are single namespace because it is harder to implement a lisp-2 than a lisp-1, particularly if there are size constraints.
You probably know it wasn't a "post 9/11 meeting", but a benefit concert for 9/11 victims' families.  You probably also know it wasn't Clinton or any politician altering the soundtrack for any political gain, it was VH1's sound technicians for a rebroadcast of the concert to raise more donations. Have we really sunk so low that it's not only acceptable to rudely shout down people helping to raise money for charity... but to call it a "great moment" and slant that news to smear those people further?
i think this is all irrelivant and makes no sense because in reality we will never find out if gamala did exist or if jesus was ever alive and if we do find out it wont be in our time unless reincarnation does exist, therefor the case is too controversal
Why do you think this is "right-wing propaganda"? From his remarks, the man is obviously a environmentalist extremist, and what he advocates is far worse than any of the acts of PETA. If this guy is anything politically, its most likely that he is far left-wing. But I'm not sure why needs to be labeled as belonging to either side anyway, as he is obviously crazy.
idiot.  downmodded, if only to discourage people from giving misleading titles to their submissions.
so what is your characterization of Intelligent Design?
I think the grandparent is referring to the posted article itself as right-wing propaganda rather than the article's subject.
'... these membranes are made of teflon and are microporous and hydrophobic. ...' is   [teflon](http://teflonfacts.blogspot.com/) safe   [material](http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;q=%22teflon+is+*+safe%22) to use for this purpose?
One of the features of unabomber was rational thought shown in his writings.  Many people pointed out that there was much truth in his manifesto.  Does this mean if you agree with that truth, you are as evil as he?  Absurd. Where the unabomber departs from what is considered rational is what he decided to do about the problems he saw in modern society: kill people with bombs.
I'm amazed that so many people still use IE.  Old habits die hard I guess.
I see a fairly significant difference between all sitting down together to discuss what you'll do in the hypothetical, versus overhearing how your "friends" will try to grab your shares, should the deadly sickness you're currently fighting get the upper hand. If it's true, (and I'd say there's corroborating evidence to Bill's character) -- vultures.
A Breif History of Time - Stephen Hawking about anything by S.J. Gould all of E. Burke-particularly Circles Godel, Escher, Bach - Douglas Hofstadter(sp?) and then you can also read the other works by Pinker, Diamond, and Dawkins.  That should eat up a week or two pretty easily.
Give non-native speakers a break. Why don't you mail corrections to the author? There's a lot of places with incorrect usage/non-usage of articles. Now that would be useful. If you don't, I will in 48 hours. That cartoon *was* pretty cool, though :) Cancelling mod down.
Title should be "Selling-off the turnpike". Nit, nit, nit.
What does "Blogjacked" mean?
Guys, this is a *really* good tutorial. I've been trying to grok haskell off and on for a couple of years now, but everytime I return to it after a while I have to again refresh my memory of just what a monad is. Here's what this tut has to say of it: "input &lt;- getContents :type getContents getContents :: IO String getContents is a function without arguments that will return 'IO String'. Prefix IO meant that this is an IO action. It will return String when evaluated. Action will be evaluated as soon as we use "&lt;-" to bind its result to some symbol." Hallelujah. I don't think I will ever forget now.
Whenever someone advocates destruction of 90% of humanity, the odds are that someone thinks they should be in the remaining 10%. 
&gt; ...it is estimated a spacecraft could reach the moon’s atmosphere within four days... The next paragraph: &gt; ... Because there is no atmosphere on the moon...
This is absolutely true.  My girlfriend worked for the our state's revenue department a few years back.  She said that one of the few things keeping the place running was an organizational culture that revolved around shared contempt for taxpayers. She was apolitical then, and isn't now.
Microsoft Bob?
&gt; Market share for Linux will always be very low as long as the best distros can be downloaded for free. That doesn't follow at all. If anything being free has increased Linux's market share massively. How many people would use Linux if you always had to pay for it?
A previous post of this link was to some blog that reference the sat tracking link (n2yo)
Saving links is a bookmarking function. I don't think reddit is a bookmarking service.
Agree.  Actually I don't know much about the advice, the writing turned me off too quick.  I saw a paragraph about the evils of premature optimization, I'm sure that will catch everyone by surprise.  "release early and often", this guy is a genious.
I was expecting a solution in interesting queries only. From the article: "Far from being just for holding and manipulating data, T-SQL is a programming language in its own right." So, um... yawn.
Definition from wikipedia: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blogjacking 
The NYT says that "Americans Underpay their taxes by about 20%" I'd rather see it phrased "America's tax system, riddled as it is with deductions, credits, exceptions, special cases, loopholes, half-actualized campaign promises, bizarre enforcement decisions, sweetheart deals for the politically well-connected, and hatchet-jobs perpetrated against *persona non grata*, is at least 20% inefficient, despite the best efforts of a huge federal bureacracy with thousands of employees." I'd have expected a less conventional take from the Times, especially given its editorial position on political horsetrading and campaign finance reform.  What do they think all those lobbyists want, if not changes to the tax code?
I have the same feeling about Windows in general.
ie is the Irish top level domain name. All Irish websites end in .ie, e.g. irlgov.ie, taoiseach.ie. .ie makes the most sense to Irish people.
That's been my experience too - when I got into the job market, I found that I was getting calls from companies and recruiters who would say, "Amherst education...that definitely helps, you should be able pick things up pretty quickly here."  It wasn't the *only* factor, and I'm sure that if I just had the Amherst degree I wouldn't have been hired by any of the places.  But it was definitely something they looked at. I've heard this effect diminishes with subsequent jobs, and that you get your second job based on your performance at your first, your third job based on your performance at the first two, etc.  I know *I* would hire primarily by experience, though I'd look at the degree for a tiebreaker or if I had a candidate on the fence. Also, the article overblows the total cost of a degree for many middle-income families.  Amherst paid 2/3 of my tuition in outright grants.  It's often possible to rack up generous financial aid awards at many top-ranked schools.  Sometimes this can cut the tuition down below out-of-state -- or even in-state -- tuition at top state schools.
Thankyou.
ha! This guy should join the Church of Euthanasia, he'll fit right in. This article has absolutely no proof except for 'this one guy once said...'. All the same I'm sure some idiots out there think this is a pretty good solution, but then, those people are total crackpots, and if there's any constant in life, its that crackpots of all sorts and forms exist. The whole standing ovation business, though? Yeah, right. Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence, and 'this one guy said' aint it. going down!
A lot of the statistics in this article smell of faulty logic.  For instance, they say gay people move differently, therefore gayness must be physiological.  But but this ignores the culture and environment effects (e.g., a gay man might modify his behavior to attract other men) around gay people.  And I get the impression that the family with the potentially gay 9 year old are encouraging this - at that age you don't get nail polish and a pastel-colored bedroom without mommy and daddy's intervention. Just all smacks of shoddy journalism.  There is an interesting statistic at the end though.
My point is, I've played a fair amount of Warcraft 3. And if Warcraft 3 is considered any kind of decent metaphor for an actual military command and control system, a keyboard and mouse is pretty darn hard to beat.  Is speech recognition ("Attack!") going to beat the speed and accuracy of hitting "A" on the keyboard anytime soon? Can someone move their hand around on the screen faster then they can move a mouse? (A mouse only has to move maybe a 10th the distance your hand has to on-screen.) I want to like this system and get excited about it, but I really don't see it beating out keyboard and mouse.
There's still risk, it's just hidden in places that people don't bother to look.  What if you lose your job?  Outside of the public sector, there's almost nowhere that can guarantee you a job for 40 years.  Most business nowadays can't even guarantee that they'll be around in 40 years, let alone employ the same people. You're also fighting inflation, which shaves about 3% off your mattress money every year.  So yeah, you may be a nominal millionaire, but that million will be worth less than a quarter what it is today. IMHO, the least risky way to amass a million dollars (and perhaps more) is to learn how to keep educating yourself and stay abreast of the trends.  That way, you'll always be able to get a job.  Save a large portion of that and put it into an index fund, so your capital earns a share of everyone *else's* work too.
"He said that the effort to relax statutes of limitations reflected 'a peculiar kind of anti-Catholicism' and that the goal of some lawmakers is the 'dismantling and pillaging of the Catholic community.'" More like anti-raping-our-children.  Sick, sick, sick.
Gee, whiz, java has more boilerplate. In other news, the sky is blue. Whomever hasn't realized this -by now- should probably not be allowed to program anything. Comparing java and python side by side for small programs with little practical purpose will almost always mean python wins. That's -very- old news.
He's not really all that forgotten.  When Woz spoke at the startup school last fall, he devoted several minutes to talking about Ron Wayne, how the three of them had started Apple from Homebrew Computer Club meetings, and how he sold out his 10% for $800.
"It's the most profitable industry in the world," he said. "But I'm convinced we'll demonstrate in the not-too-distant future the actual physical harm that pornography causes and hold them financially accountable. That could be the straw that breaks their back." read that paragraph again and substitute 'pornography' with 'religion'.
How can safari have over 3% marketshare? OS X is barely on 3% of computers, and many people with mac's use Firefox, Opera, Camino, Shiira, etc.
Think those who need to become more aware of TC care about that side of the issue?
Your OS X marketshare statistic may be inaccurate.
well.. people did buy into naziism.. and i don't remember who it was, but someone once said that "[hitler only put into practice what a lot of people believed at the time.]" I am not surprised when I told that there are hundreds or thousands of people out in the world living, thinking or acting together who think in this way. Many nazis (including hitler himself) did not even fit within their own categorization of being worthy of germany's future, so that either they or all their children would ideally someday be exterminated. so is it a surprise that there are people who want all the weak and disease-succeptable in the world to die, even if they may die themselves? when people think of all the problems they have, they tend to associate them with the worst in any population and therefore respond with hatred, anger and resentment as opposed to compassion or empathy for poor and suffering people who in their mind are the ones overpopulating the earth. somehow, the ruling hand of a disease, like blind justice, must seem so appealing to them. the quotation by the student saying that the dr. does support the death of 90% of the population is linked-to, just improperly. this is the correct link (look at the bottom):  http://www.zo.utexas.edu/courses/bio357/357evaluations.html and yes... be very afraid of these people.
I don't think we can ignore the article out of hand, without looking at the "good" prof's own website -&gt; http://www.zo.utexas.edu/courses/bio213/why.html .  He does talk about Ebola as a way to curb population right on the site.  He is a total doomster, and a dangerous one at that.  Just from reading this his site, I think he is one of those idiot crackpots.
Now the people have their 7 billion dollars _and_ their phone services, before they only had phone services.
It's dated 31 March - might be an April Fools' hoax.
&gt;And I get the impression that the family with the potentially gay 9 year old are encouraging this - at that age you don't get nail polish and a pastel-colored bedroom without mommy and daddy's intervention. No parent tries to create a gay child. Clearly he expressed a desire for those things in the first place.
You should let the Post know. I used the same headline as they did.
Estimates of this are all over the map.  With no info provided on how they came up with these numbers, this is worthless.
Actually, japple wrote that he has learned from reading right-wing propaganda not to trust people argue in the manner that this article did.  He does not classify the article or the scientist as anything.
Its probably more accurate to say the *media* has forgotten him. Its just not as glamorous to mention the involvement of a 41-year old man.
I just think it's a pity more people don't use Firefox. I love getting extensions for the browser. I also find that things load quickly on it, and that I'm relatively virus and certainly spam/adware free.
Yes, Dalrymple is such a Francophobe that he has selflessly moved to France, so he can keep an eye on them for the rest of us. * rolls eyes *
I got the same feeling - the first page promotes the hypothesis that sexuality is determined by "nature" (as opposed to "nurture"), citing divergent sexual behaviour observed between *children* who are twins (not suggesting it is entirely genetic, as they obviously share genes).  the second page talks about a successful experiment where participants were asked to guess the sexuality of people after seeing only a silouette of them talking (one imagines the stereotypical limp wristed gesticulation), and separately a recording of their voices.  then it starts talking about regions of the brain being "feminized", ostensibly a physiological process.  maybe that would follow if the second experiment was also performed on infant twins (later a similar experiment performed on children is mentioned), but there is a lot of cultural feminization that isn't really accounted for here.
"Misleading and inappropriate," eh? Apparently, that whole thing about Jesus loving everyone as long as they accept Him ( you know, that crazy stuff that people have been getting out of the Bible for thousands of years) is incorrect, and new bibles will reflect the new conventional wisdom that Jesus only loves a few select groups of people, as defined by the American Bible Society." Exactly. Jesus loves everyone.
Not a gay child, but perhaps a differently gendered child.  The literature is full of accounts of psychopathologies supposedly engendered (in a manner of speaking) by parents who, disappointed by the sex of their children, dress them in the clothes of the desired gender, cut/grow their hair short/long, etc.
I sell [my book](http://tinyurl.com/kuwa8) off the turnpike.
What else are you going to use on that computer you bought from Dell?
Right, the name refers both to Scheme48 and to those "Teach yourself X in 21 days" books.
You say, "Desire for stability drives French unrest," but that's exactly Dalrymple's point: As long as the youth have access to excessive stability, they won't take jobs that they see as less desirable, like carpentry. Instead, they all hold out for sinecures from which they can't be fired and at which they can just slack off. Which is fine for them in the short run, but ultimately runious for their economy. Meanwhile, because it's hard to try out a worker without giving them a short term contract (which is equivalent to a 100% chance of firing), employers are highly discriminating about whom they hire, which hurts the non-white French.
According to the same site the rise in Firefox use is incredibly slow: http://marketshare.hitslink.com/report.aspx?qprid=3&amp;qpdt=1&amp;qpct=4&amp;qptimeframe=M&amp;qpsp=75&amp;qpnp=12
note that i am not arguing that cultural feminization plays a part in determining sexuality, only in how sexuality is expressed.
Riiiiiight. You're thinking too much. Get back to me when you convince a *9-year-old boy* to play with Barbie dolls and stuffed animals, wear nail polish, and desire to be a girl. Have you ever heard of the boy who, after a terrible circumcision accident cost him his genitals, was raised as a girl, but still desired to play with trucks, etc.? Who, when told he really is a man, was immensely relieved (having felt there was something wrong his whole life) and ended up marrying a woman? Yeah, there might be something cultural about the "limp-wristed gesticulation", as you put it, but the twin boys are *definitive*.
i see the plot line of a new james bond movie!
I have to confess that I only skimmed the website above, but I didn't see anything that actually *advocated* this destruction, just that it's going to happen. From the his website: &lt;quote&gt;  If humans do not control their own population (and we seem unwilling and unable to do so), then other forces will certainly act to control our population. The four horseman of the apocalypse (conquest, war, famine, and death) are all candidates. Most likely, lethal virulent microbes like HIV and Ebola zaire will set limits on the growth of human populations. HIV, by allowing infected hosts to survive years while they spread the virus and infect new hosts, has already become a pandemic, but it will be years before it decimates the human population. Although Ebola kills 9 out of 10 people, outbreaks have so far been unable to become epidemics because they are currently spread only by direct physical contact with infected blood. However, a closely related virus that kills monkeys, Ebola reston, is airborne, and it is only a matter of time until Ebola zaire evolves the capacity to be airborne.   &lt;/quote&gt;
Really? I've only read about the following case, which was supposed to be the nail in the coffin of the idea that a boy can become like a girl by being raised as one: (quoting my own post above)  &gt;Have you ever heard of the boy who, after a terrible circumcision accident cost him his genitals, was raised as a girl, but still desired to play with trucks, etc.? Who, when told he really is a man, was immensely relieved (having felt there was something wrong his whole life) and ended up marrying a woman?
They certainly should, if they want to be able to buy software that comes from outside a cartel of "trusted" developers.
[Another Honda ad](http://media.honda.co.uk.nyud.net:8090/campaign/civic/CivicChoir_368.swf) (The choir one)
No, i haven't heard of him.  You think there is something definitive about a single pair of twin boys?  Wow.
Fantastic idea.  I'm glad that some governments are finally realizing the benefits of privatizing "public" services, even if it is a last-ditch effort to stop hemorrhaging taxpayers' money.
Any PM-related topic is a "common sense" stuff by definition. It is a nature of the beast. I am glad that you don't need reminders about "evils of premature optimization". "Release early and often" --- if you know, who originated this expression, please share it with me. I'll be glad to put in a link. I tried to find the origin unsuccessfully. Yes, that guy was/is a genius.
I was thinking particularly about Charles Manson and Henry Lee Lucas. http://www.google.com/search?q=henry+lee+lucas+dressed+girl  http://www.google.com/search?q=charles+manson+dressed+girl+mother
Wasn't this the plot 12 Monkeys? (I watched it a long time ago, but I seem to remember a virus and some environmentalists.)
Wouldn't they have waited for April 1?
Some times I also wish humans would disappear so that countless other species would survive. So, I can see his point, but I think the main flaw in his thinking is a lack of humility. How can anyone feel qualified to condemn someone else to death, much less 5 billion people?
Those seem to be two people who became *fucked up* after being dressed as girls - not particularly surprising. Did either of them actually become gay? I don't have time to look into it.
Yeah, interesting that CBS states its position on the first page, when science has not yet formed mature conclusions. There is still a long way to go. An interesting thing is the role of interaction with infants on their brain formation. Even to the point that feral children have completely differently formed brains. Would some scientists therefore conclude the children were born that way? More research please.
Q) Why are the pubs on the moon so boring? A) No atmosphere.
Kudos to the man for not being bitter. If it was me I would probably be sick as a parrott for bailing out!
Yes it was. A good movie too.
nice article, though it smells a bit like submarine PR for LaLa.com, IMO
How old is it?
I bet you won't.
OK, i revise my hypothesis - "because most of them are schemes, and the ones that aren't schemes or CLs, but ad-hoc implementations of 'lisp-like languages' are unburdened by standardisation and have authors smart enough to realize that separate namespaces for functions and values was a massive brainfart on the part of CL, and as such have no desire to repeat it"
A lot to bite off and I don't think Paul was able to handle it, some of it was sloppily argued.  And the intended conclusion seems to be, Ehhhh, it doesn't affect us software startups (who're so important) much at all.  Also, the "speed is zero, force is nonzero" analogy doesn't hold, the meaning of the statement that patents don't affect startups much is that the force is zero.  The "speed=0, force&gt;0" analogy would mean that software patents are greatly holding back innovation but we press on anyway through sheer curiousity and drive.  To which the answer would be, remove software patents and spur innovation further.  It's an enormously complex topic and you have to hand it to Paul for trying to bring something to the discussion.  However, he never ends up making a case for software patents (and one can read a case AGAINST them into his statements of fact) so the conclusion implicitly ends up being that software patents ARE evil.
Besides there would be an awful mess if  5,856,623,595 people died. I'm sure that would cause some environmental degradation. 
That's it.  I'm calling the cops on that easter egg hunt those kids are having next door.  Who knows what's in those mysterious plastic eggs?
I think the point is that Apple's share of active computers is not the same as its share of sales.   It's a known fact(tm) that Mac's aren't discarded as quickly as PC's.  I still have a 7 year-old G3 laptop running Mac OS X, for instance.
I really thought that number will be higher
I would hesitate to call either of them "gay", though Charles Manson held a straight-razor to a boy's neck and sodomized him while at a reformatory, and Lucas had a questionable relationship with his accomplice, Ottis Toole - though their  respective sexualities have no bearing on my original point.
I think this is the most important point of a prestigious college.  If you go to a top school in your field, you will meet the most ambitious and well connected kids in your field.  If you go to USC for film school, you'll be there with children of producers and actors.  If you go to Berkeley or Stanford or MIT you'll be meeting/living with the founders of the next big tech companies.  If you go to HArvard or Yale or Princeton, you'll probably be hanging out with the kids of some of the most well connected people in the world.  And so on.
I think you missed page 2 of the article, where it talks about how most people don't pay the "rack rate" for their education, and spcifically mentions how Harvard charges you nothing if your family income is below 40k.
"What's happening with the condo conversions is it's reduced the supply of available apartments," Conway said.
*Guarantee* is a pretty strong word, in a world in which GIANT METEORS OF FLAMING DEATH could fall on you or your sandwich at any time!!! :-O
Whether this will have a positive impact on the real estate general market is yet to be determined.
I don't quite understand your argument. If we reduce human population, species other than cockroaches have an increased chance of survival. How is this anthropocentric?
It’s unsure at this time what the intent of the new Google Base listings are intended to accomplish.
What I should have made clear is that I'm saying the twin boys case definitively has absolutely *nothing* to do with cultural upbringing. I think one of the most likely possibilities is that the gay child was infected by some pathogen at some point early in the brain's development.
Yeah, that's not really "gay". But apparently, in spite of that, you think there is some value to those examples. What do they prove that I didn't already know?
This is the worst idea I've ever heard.  Having low voter turnout is a GOOD thing.  It means that only people who actually care are voting.  It also means that you have a better chance of getting informed voters.  When I go to the voting booth, I do it after spending at least 10 hours or so researching all of the candidates and initiatives on the ballot.  I don't want a bunch of people showing up who are only there to collect their chance at one million dollars, and haven't put in the research to make an informed voting decision.
&gt;If we reduce human population, species other than cockroaches have an increased chance of survival.  Really, I don't think the cockroaches care either way.
Some interesting predictions for the rest of the year.
Exactly.  A program that doesn't correctly render to-spec HTML and CSS isn't really a web browser, now is it?
&gt; Choosing your economic theory is itself an economic choice; Gee, ever since I got this **really** great *hammer*, suddenly there are *nails* **everywhere**!
Arizona should just do away with silly old-fashioned voting and go with Diebold instead.
Please, let us all know how it is that I can change my society.;) Modafinil does sound interesting though. I've not tried it and I know there would be adverse side affects, but still interesting. &gt; Can cause headaches, nausea, dizziness, **overconfidence** and psychosis.  heh, and what does that mean? Anyway:  &gt;  If we can safely skip on sleep, what's to keep us from working around the clock? This is similar to saying that steriods would allow top weight lifting competitors to completely throw all recovery periods out the window. This is not true, recovery is still neccesary.
Good points about content-filtering versus subject matter filtering. However, if video.reddit.com is a type subject matter filter in itself, thats more than OK because basically the type of content that suits itself to the 'popular internet video' is often different from the content that suits itself to a popular HTML page (or pages)   
that's a good idea, i'll just make-sure to vote as many times as possible.
Salmonella.
As an African I am offended by the author's description of African society as "most primitive." If treating your old with care and respect, instead of banishing them to old age homes and then throwing money at the problem when problems do eventually occur, is primitive then maybe understanding of the word primitive is wrong.
Life doesn't work on the principle of "you do what is said, you get good grades, you suceed". I attended a fairly non-descrit private institution (after transfering there from a community college), with a CS degree from a program which was by no means top-ten. I also have friends who have graduated from top schools in their fields (electrical engineer, physics, computer science) yet are earning (on their first jobs out of college) tens of thousands less than I am on my "first job" out of college. In addition to that I have zero debt (with parents paying for the education, due to the first year and a half -- at community college -- being really cheap; I also lived at home and commuted, thus I did not end up paying insane amounts for a dorm or a private appartment). Why? Since I've got an early start: I began doing tech support as a freshman in high school, I contracted (part-time) as a system administrator for my last two years of high school and first three years of college (with only six months of no job between my two contracts), I constantly kept playing around (on my home-built network) with newer technologies and ideas, especially those that were in high demand (and low supply) and I did "free-lance" consulting at times as well. In other words I did not let my schooling get in the way of my education (thank you Mark Twain) -- in college I concentrated on the most important ideas (algorithms, compiler design, automata theory, operating systems, and various mathematics such as combinatorics and probability theory) as well as a broad general education (philosophy, history -- and beyond GE requirements, taking upper division classes in those topics as well), while at the mean time keeping myself up to date on the latest using books, the internet and my own personal computers. In the end, it is important to recognize that your are an individual and there is no said universal formula by which X amount of education at school Y will yield Z (where X is the highest degree level obtained, Z is some sort of measure of happiness [which isn't always synonymous with financial success]). Hence you should tailor your educational experience to yourself. That doesn't exclude going to Yale or Harvard (this may be the optimal option if you wish to attend a top-ten law school in order to become a judge or a law professor, for instance) but doesn't demand it either.
Exactly. Ivy leagues aren't even near the top for many disciplines. For instance, you are likely to get a better CS or engineering education at Berkeley than at most Ivy Leagues; I wouldn't even exclude the possibility that also smaller schools with no Ph.D program (and hence not on the same list at US News) such as Cal Poly, Harvey Mudd, Rose-Hulman or Cooper Union also provide a measurably better CS education than an Ivy League would. This isn't just for the technical subjects like engineering. For philosophy, for instance, some of the Ivy Leagues aren't even in the top twenty.
now i have my daily helping of gloom and doom.
So Cool :) I wish I could use it for my site.
Here's a try at explaining why software patents seem more burdensome than patents on, e.g., drugs or mechanial assemblies: In software the cost of checking for and obeying patents (either licensing or working around them) is so high. compared to other costs of production that it is simply infeasible to do.  The ratio of cost of patent-obeying to other costs is higher for software than otfher fields for several reasons:  - other costs of production are so low; eg the cost of manufacturing a design is the cost of burning a cd, if that  - someone designing / writing software makes a larger number of potentially  patent infringing decisions per unit of time, compared to a pharmacologist or a mechanical engineer  - the patent office is much worse at filtering out obvious software patents than for older domains of knowledge (at least I hope so for the sake of folks in the older domains !) 
His research finds that men are still likely to die at a younger age than women, lifestyle is implicated in the majority of health conditions in men.
Plotline for Rainbow 6 from Clancy.  What a prophet he was!
I could believe that one nutcase said things like that.  I couldn't believe all the parts where all the other scientists enthusiastically applauded. 
I'm sure it's literally random numbers. JWZ has posted fake "codes" in the past and challeneged people to crack them. I think it's cruel. For example, when visiting his home page in the first version of Netscape for Unix, the "N" throbber in the upper right would turn into a spinning compass. He had some fake code in an HTML comment that was designed to look like the key to the whole thing .. he even taunted readers, to get them to try and crack it. But it was all a hoax, a red herring; it meant nothing and it did nothing. See this page for details:  http://tinyurl.com/h5lgp 
&gt; quite a few containers are missing Estimates are around 500 or so, if I read correctly.  That's a *lot* of lawn furniture, [rubber duckies](http://www.csmonitor.com/2003/0731/p01s04-woeu.html), DVD players, chemical solvents, soccer uniforms, lawn sprinklers, matchbox cars, furnace filters, baby strollers, .....
It's actually more likely to induce Steve Balmer to snort more cocaine.
A look at the latest from Google Labs, and how it complements another popular Google tool.
hey, it's Forrest M. Mims III.  Did anyone else learn electronics from his little books at Radio Shack? I can still picture his handwriting.  I'm inclined to trust what he says about this crackpot scientist. 
Only temporarily.  People are biodegradable.
Well, it appeals to a vague sort of "American Dream" concept, that the software market shouldn't block out newcomers. You know, rather than wrapping the discussion around dictionary definitions.
Suposedly, "It's less a mathematical decryption problem than it is a Zawinski social engineering problem." http://www.kottke.org/remainder/06/03/10703.html
Yes! I loved those books. Did you know Forrest founded MITS with Ed Roberts and friends? (MITS sold the first microcomputer) http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Altair_8800#History ---- "(Mims) wrote some Amateur Scientist columns for Scientific American magazine in 1990, but the magazine refused to hire him after discovering that Mims was a creationist and had doubts about evolution. However, the magazine did say that Mims' work was "great", "fabulous" and "should be published somewhere." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Forrest_Mims Wow! Thought police.  
This story's a turd. You all are just karma whores. 
I'm having trouble getting how whole solar energy is converted into tremendous instantaneous thrust... is it just a gigantic electromagnet?
I found the opposite effect from #3: I get better speeds from peers than from seeds.  This is probably because I have a fast (fiberoptic) connection, so I'm almost always one of the fastest uploaders that a given peer will be connected to.  Bittorrent uses a tit-for-tat algorithm when deciding which connections to unchoke, so I usually jump to the top of the list for peers.  Seeds aren't downloading, however, so I have to take my random chances for when they want to unchoke me.
It is nicely done, except for the minor spelling errors and the odd phrasing of some of the key points. Tangentially, does anyone else think voice over was recorded by a native German speaker? Kind of sounds like that...
[Regulators] "allege that Blue Cross scours years of medical records after expensive claims have been submitted, looking for innocent misstatements and omissions to use as pretext to rescind coverage and escape expensive bills."
Maybe the fact that the site's design screams "1993"?  Wow, that's a Godawful site.  And agreed on using GIFs.
Just posted this email to Eric Pianka... Hello Eric, [This email has been CC'd on Reddit.com] I thought that you might like to know that your lecture in Beaumont last month is gaining some infamy at the moment on a popular news web site at the moment - Reddit.com - where an article describing the lecture has been posted. I imagine that you already know about the article in the Christian Scientist.  I was wondering if you would care to head over to Reddit and add to the comments; or simply answer the following question for me: Did you advocate the deliberate use of the ebola virus to wipe out 90% of the human population, or are you simply re-iterating the arguments on your web site; ie: this is something that will naturally come to pass (and furthermore is probably a good thing, given the destruction that mankind is currently wreaking on the planet)? I confess that I haven't read either the article or your web site in detail, but I smell a smear campaign and I would like to at least have you defend yourself on Reddit if indeed you aren't espousing genocidal ideas. Thanks,  Dave.
easy tips on minimising your electronics spending
Children who drank 100 percent juice had healthier overall diets than non juice consumers and consumed more total fruits, fiber and key nutrients such as vitamin C, potassium, magnesium and folate.
"Everyone complains of over-population, but no one is willing to say, 'I'll go first.'"  -- Nathan Hill.
This reddit, not /.  There's no karma here.
Scary stuff! But what are the odds of this Ebola virus knocking out 90% of the people given the current conditions that it is isolated in certain parts of Africa etc. - any budding maths/stats genius out there willing to hazard a guess?
Maybe in developing countries like USA. The rest of the world has other figures. Europe   http://www.xitimonitor.com/etudes/equipement13.asp  Germany   http://www.webhits.de/deutsch/index.shtml?webstats.html   http://www.keks.de/web/heise-browser#heise   
What is the relationship between .jar files and raw jvm assembler?  Not a simple one, it appears.
I don't know ... Only juice? You'd think you'd have to eat solid food eventually.
or the plot from the film *Outbreak* concerning airborne Ebola. Maybe this is all a joke.
Interesting. I stumbled upon another example a few clicks later - http://www.identity20.com/media/OSCON2005/ Doesn't this seem a lot like Odd Todd (for those of you who remember)? - http://www.oddtodd.com/index2.html
The Altair or the Creationism?
I voted for your comment, but I also wanna throw out two things: 1.)  the W3C doesn't make specifications, they make recommendations and 2.)  no browser out there fully supports the CSS recommendation (I'm not 100% sure about XHTML)
This is why this whole article is kind of blah, and misses the point. The point is that optimally, you decide what you want to major in before you apply, you apply to and optimize your resume for the schools that are best at what you want to do, and then you go to one of those and be as good at your major and related activities as you can. It's certainly true in CS that going to the right undergrad helps. It also happens that the Ivies are in the top ten in a lot of disciplines.  Thus, if you don't know what you want to do when you apply, it's probably a fine idea to optimize your application to Ivies and try to go to one of those, because if you go to one of them you have a pretty good chance of having a high-caliber department in whatever you decide to do. You're at an "upwind" position, as PG would put it.
Very well designed video. Now if only it explained in simple terms HOW trusted computing is bad for you as a consumer instead of simply saying "THEY" decided not to trust "YOU." I know, they did. But you have to explain in simple terms how/why this matters to me.
Pianka is a very well-known and respected scientist (I've used several of his articles as reference - most notably "Willson, M. F. and E. R. Pianka. 1963. Sexual selection, sex ratio, and mating system. American Naturalist 97: 405-407" which is a classical text).  When Pianka speaks, others better listen, since he knows what he is speaking about. And because the source of this article is something/someone I wouldn't trust, I suspect that the real speech wasn't quite "let's kill 90% of the humans". Besides, who can deny that Earth is horribly overpopulated by humans? 10% of current - or 600 million humans is still too much, imho - 100..300M would be better as a sustainable limit.
Some indirect evidence are some of the former students of Pianka's comments: "I don't root for ebola, but maybe a ban on having more than one child. I agree" "Though I agree that convervation biology is of utmost importance to the world, I do not think that preaching that 90% of the human population should die of ebola is the most effective means of encouraging conservation awareness. I found Pianka to be knowledgable, but spent too much time focusing on his specific research and personal views. " http://www.zo.utexas.edu/courses/bio357/357evaluations.html   
Nice interface, good community
Any evidence to back up those figures?
I love this site, lots of great content. They do a good job of keeping me entertained for at least an hour or two a day.
One of the Fletch novels describes a fictional Human Surplus League whose motto is: "Do The World A Favor -- Drop Dead!"
Even the watchers don't like to be watched.
i want one.
  'There's nothing special about physical embodiments of control systems that should make them patentable, and the software equivalent not.' is a false argument. The most common reason used to justify the patent system is that it allows investors to recoup their investment in research and development. The main reason why companies replace their physical control systems with software ones is that the software ones are cheaper to produce and maintain.   If 20 years was sufficient to recover research and development for the old, expensive technology, then the new one must recover the costs sooner.  (see Pakes (1986) in Econometrica -- which you may be able to read online at http://www.jstor.org/view/00129682/di952684/95p0488g/0  for some figures which support the conclusion that the  vast majority of all patents _never_ repay their owners  even the cost of filing, while the tiny minority of them that do repay their owners do so after a period of time much shorter than 20 years.  Pharma is an important exception  here, where it is common for the first sales of a product  to take place 10 or even 12 years after the patent is first  filed.  But even there, the question 'how quickly after  you get to market can you repay your r and d costs' seems   to be 'a few years'.) What have we seen in the field of control technology?  To  begin with, new computer systems were designed to replace  existing mechanical ones.  Research and development went into the construction of the new hardware.  But the software was, with very few exceptions, routine to write.  These days  the hardware mostly sits on one chip, which is a general  purpose computer.   At this point, you have innovated your way out of an invention, in order to reduce costs.  There's no invention  here any more. Laura Creighton
I agree with dfranke. Spencer has *created* wealth.  Anyone who disagrees should read Paul Graham on *How to Create Wealth* (http://paulgraham.com/wealth.html)    That being said,  the title of this post is **brilliant marketing**.  With everyone fighting to get their posts to the top,  it's no surprise that titles such as these are used.
For the record in Australia it's against the law not to turn up at the poling place. (You don't have to vote, just turn up and have your name crossed off) The penalty is about $50.
The [Voluntary Human Extinction Movement](http://www.vhemt.org/) is real. I'm not a supporter, but I know of at least one biologist who is.
As a bisexual man who has done a lot of studying about human sexuality, including a class entirely devoted to "The Statistics of the GLBT population" I can tell you that this article has a lot of problems and misinformation, but also cites some interesting statistics that I had not specifically heard of (the "older brother" thing, specifically). In general, the article kept confusing itself, mixing together entirely too many theories without any kind of understanding. A few memorable ones:  The article refers to feminization (of either the brain or of bodily traits) as a sign that a child is becoming gay. There is, to my mind, no specific proof that a child's "mental gender" relates at all to the gender to which he is attracted, or at least that "mental gender" is the only determining factor in sexual orientation. That is to say, not all gay men are especially feminine, nor are all gay men mentally feminine. Although many gay relationships have a "top" and a "bottom", this division is no more gender-based than dominant and submissive S&amp;M participants. Are straight women more feminine if they are remain passive during sex? It just isn't true. There was a study in the eighties where the corpses of eight people, 2 each of gay men, gay women, straight men, and straight women, were autopsied and thier brains examined. The gay men's hypocampi and the women's hypocampi were smaller than those of the straight men's, but due to the tiny, tiny sample size, there is very little statistical signifgance. Other than that, no science has found real hard and fast differences in the brain chemestry of differently oriented people. So to say that a child with "more feminine" brain chemesty is probably going to be gay is either a gross oversimplifcation or just bad science. One thing that other commenters have pointed out is that although the article's premise is that nature is more important than nurture, it makes serious oversights when it comes to the leeway the parents are giving these kids to pick thier gender- they "gay" twin may be so because the parents saw in the two children a difference very early on, and purposely exacerbated it. Like most of child psychology, early-age genderization is not well understood, although it is clearly widespread. One of the first things one always asks a recent mother is "Is it a girl or a boy?" The only thing that is really clear is that early-age experiences have significant effects on people's later life- our first batch of experiences tends to be much more psychologically scarring than our later ones. Another thing the article doesn't really accurately discuss is the influence social experience has on gay behavoir. A lot of theorists tend to believe that the stereotypical gay behavoirs (limp wrists, immaculate style, a lilt or lisp to one's speech, etc) is not something innately part of being gay, but rather a survival mechanism, a way to subtly (or not so subtly) attract the attention of other gay people, a sort of *nod and a wink* that you too are *part of the family.* Because unlike other minorities, without concious decision on a gay person's part, it is very, very easy to pass as being a member of the majority. That is, there are no outward physical clues that show someone's sexual orientation, except for the ones that have basically been agreed upon by society as the "stereotypical gay behavior" The science and theory behind both sexual orientation and gender is so convoluted, so not certain, that the best (and most politically correct and kindest and most tollerant and most human and humane) conclusion to come to is that gender has no significant bearing on sexual orientation- people end up loving who they end up loving, and that sexual orientation is not a choice any more than one's favorite food or music is- its simply part of who you are as a person.
These are comments made by his students! What evidence, indirect or otherwise is this? Read the headline for this posting: "Texas scientist advocates extermination of 90% of humanity by airborne Ebola" Nowhere do I see evidence of this. He may be Dr Doom 'n' Gloom, but I can't say I blame him.  This amounts to slander in my book.    
Sir, I am intrigued by your opinions.  May I suggest you consider a career in broadcasting?  In particular, Fox News when they eventually need a successor to the much-lamented Bill O'Reilly.
This is weird. I read the article and was alarmed. (I remember reading Forest Mims from way back when I was a wannabe wirehead so I respected the name). Reading the course outline at http://www.zo.utexas.edu/courses/bio213/why.html gave no support to the original article, save for the possiblity of misinterpretation.
Read what I said - "imho". If you don't know, that means "In my humble opinion", denoting that this was not quoting fact, it was an opinion. As for the sustainable population limit - I've seen numbers ranging from 100M to 4B. For simple discussion articles, see: http://www.optimumpopulation.org/opt.earth.html   http://www.mnforsustain.org/erickson_d_determining_sustainable_population_levels.htm Let's not forget that right now more then 3 billion humans are living in hunger - and this will not change, no matter how many "support" programs UN has.
This isn't the NYT. It's the New York Times *Magazine*. Big difference. In the magazine, writers come right out with their biases.
Hmm.. is it just me or has the "free registration" stuff been removed. Maybe i'll give [nytimes](http://nytimes.com) another chance.
I am amazed by the contention that we either have patents or secrets in the software world.  I would think that the Open Source movement has made rather more of an impression than that!   The take home lesson is that an awful lot of us find it very important and empowering to build, use and support software that is both open and can be used by anyone without encumbrance except to not place encumbrances on others.   Patents were invented for specific reasons.  To evaluate patents the results and likely results must be considered as to how well they achieve or are likely to acheive what was intended.  In software there is no great danger of more software being kept secret if we do not have software patents. I am rather disgusted to see Paul Graham attempt to stampede software developers into seeking souftware patents less they be seen as foolishly not playing the game that they are in.  Who set the rules to this game?  Who said that we wish to play it?  Didn't the very advent of Free and Open Source Software say clearly we are playing a different game with rules we feel are more of a win for all of us?   For shame.  I am not so sure the next Open Source Convention will be so welcoming to Paul Graham. 
Community Voted Top Internet Media Aggregator Site
i heard some accent there too, couldn't really put my finger on what accent it was.
Going from 7.38 % to 10.05 % is a 36 % increase in market share. I'd say that's rather good in less than year.
Community Voted Top Internet Media Aggregator Site
Soylent Green is made of people!!
Count me in: this guy didn't even do the same thing in two codes. Shame on you hizziaips!
*a Broward police union issued a "Be On The Lookout" (BOLO) warning for Mike Kirsch on its website* That is more then just being watched.
They aren't living in hunger because of overpopulation. It's because of corrupt governments not distributing the food.
"You cannot do that with a complex system because there is a good chance it will never be perfected – during development you will discover more and more faucets of the initial problem sinking in the swamp of never-ending modifications." I also hate swamp faucets.
What you just said is tautologically equivalent to "smart brains grow differently".
Well now we have 3 independent sources, 2 students and Forrest M Mims III. Hardly a smoking gun I agree, but it's pointing to the fact that he may well have said that.
Although the ad itself is rather old, it's still semi funny. It also reflects the importance of lyrics in songs. I remember singing along to some of the raptori songs (a finnish, um, rap group) which resemble the lyrics of that song in the clip. The only difference is that i'm a native finn and i could understand the words. Ah well.. ;)
In the Executive Orders novel, Clancy has an airborne Ebola spread in the USA by a fictitious Muslim government. Somehow, the outbreak is contained after killing close to 20 thousand. Even though the guy is not a scientist, I reckon he did call a few epidemiologists to check for plausibility before committing to press.  Also, I did some background work on bioterror back in 2002, and there is lots of material on containment strategies that work. When all else fails, you *militarize* the enforcement of quarantines, including some cruel behavior to the unfortunate who are beyond cure.
The percentage of hungry people now is the lowest *ever*. Same for analphabetism and infant mortality. There was even a Flash presentation posted to reddit a couple months ago, showing how much progress most countries did in the last 40 years or so. http://gapminder.org/Projects/BangladeshSVT2005Eng/swfVersion/swfview.asp?fref=start.swf&amp;cref=ADjuZwab/Oll1Q2cnVJA7XpEUJsA
Here's a forth: "the bulk of his [Pianka's] talk was that he's waiting for the virus that will eventually arise and kill off 90% of human population. In fact, his hope, if you can call it that, is that the ebola virus which attacks humans currently (but only through blood transmission) will mutate with the ebola virus that attacks monkeys airborne to create an airborne ebola virus that attacks humans. He's a radical thinker, that one! I mean, he's basically advocating for the death of all but 10% of the current population! And at the risk of sounding just as radical, I think he's right." http://brenmccnnll.blogspot.com/2006/03/dr.html
.. and a fifth: http://www.sas.org/tcs/weeklyIssues_2006/2006-04-07/editorial-p/index.html
on my blog IE has 12% click-share :-D
I am also a left leaning person, and I agree. Porno, not unlike smoking, farting and polka dancing, should be allowed but restricted to designated areas. It is a disgrace when porn is dished out in-your-face style when one doesn't expect or want it.
Here's another person's opinion on what Dr. Pianka said during that meeting: http://brenmccnnll.blogspot.com/2006/03/dr.html
I have to agree.  So far, we have one anonymous student (out of about 100 positive student evaluations), and one angry article by a creationist, claiming he *advocates* 90% of the human population dying of Ebola.  I don't buy it from secondhand sources, not in an age where scientists raising troublesome facts are routinely misquoted, censored or slandered for political and religious reasons.  When I hear it from Pianka's mouth, then I'll believe it. Maybe, instead of the aspiring mass murderer the article paints him to be, he's warning that the ecosphere can't support runaway overpopulation, and it will lead to systemic collapse if humans can't learn to control it.  And the symptoms of that overconsumption scenario seem to be coming faster and faster: global warming, peak oil, atmospheric pollution, energy shortages, global conflicts over dwindling resources.  Maybe he's right and maybe not, but I'm inclined to listen to what he has to say about the ecosphere - certainly more than I'd listen to an indignant article by a guy who doubts evolution.
He still speaks for more than all other groups of Christians combined. That says something.
Pfft, my toaster loves more than Jesus. He's long dead (assuming he ever existed).
Also note that it has been said [meditation thickens the front cortex](http://paramita.typepad.com/dharma_forest/2005/11/thicker_the_bet.html).
Nazis are people too!
:-) Thank you for bringing it to my attention. I rephrased it.
Eric S. Raymond, *The Cathedral and the Bazaar*. http://www.catb.org/~esr/writings/cathedral-bazaar/cathedral-bazaar/ar01s04.html P.S. That isn't a Linus quote, it's one of ESR's many "lessons" sprinkled through the text.
Thank you very much. Now the link is in place.
It looks like random doesn't work on My reddit. it would be nice if you could get random links from my reddit too.
Here's someone else who bought it: "the bulk of his [Pianka's] talk was that he's waiting for the virus that will eventually arise and kill off 90% of human population. In fact, his hope, if you can call it that, is that the ebola virus which attacks humans currently (but only through blood transmission) will mutate with the ebola virus that attacks monkeys airborne to create an airborne ebola virus that attacks humans. He's a radical thinker, that one! I mean, he's basically advocating for the death of all but 10% of the current population! And at the risk of sounding just as radical, I think he's right." http://brenmccnnll.blogspot.com/2006/03/dr.html
The main problem with software patents is not their existence, but their lifetime.  When the original patent timelines were laid out, the lifecycle of a technology was about 30ish years.  So a patent gave you protection for 40 to 50% of the lifecycle of that tech - a considerable advantage.  Compared to the high tech lifecycle of 2 years or less, however, 14 years is WAY too long.  Who would complain about software patents that had a lifetime of a year? The halflife of technology has decreased, so the patent halflife should decrease along with it...
could probably throw you a boner
If you can't remember to do things later, how do you remember to do things on time now? The point is that every little change to DST has to be distributed to all the VCRs and wristwatches of the world, but a scheduled time shift can just be put on your business hours sign once.
**[skip straight to article.](http://www.miami.com/mld/miamiherald/14218941.htm)** Not that there's a whole lot of crucial content.
&gt; My characterisation is that the question of whether or not there are signs of intelligent design in terrestrial biology is deeply intriguing. Is ahi's soft, spongy skull proof of God's existence?
An AP report on depression amongst preachers' wives misses a crucial factor
In case anyone wants to look this up, the boy's name was David Reimer, and his story is covered in «As nature made him: The boy who was raised as a girl», John Colapinto (2000). What's interesting about this case is that the most hardent proponent in professional circles of the muteability of childrens' sexual orientation, John Money, used him as a poster girl/boy for his own professional views *even* when it became obvious that he had completely failed to "reorient" the boy. Wikipedia has more on this, and gives pointers to further background information. 
good video collection
The magic of shitty science writing.
Sind wir hier nicht auf *de*.reddit.com?!?
very misleading title
In addition to the usual suspects, i.e. Dawkins, Gould, Pinker, Matt Ridley, Mark Ridley, Susan Blackmore, Daniel Dennet, I would recommend reading your way down on the list of Aventis Science Writing winners. See http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Aventis_Prizes_for_Science_Books I've read a *lot* of amazing books from that list the last couple of years. I hardly ever read fiction any more -- too boring, when the world has opened up as such an interesting place.  :-D Oh, and Carl Sagan's "The Demon-Haunted World" is a must, and Robert L Park's "Voodoo Science" should be in every young person's curriculum. 
If that means he wants ebola to become airborne, then Robert Frost wanted the world to burn and freeze: SOME say the world will end in fire,\t  Some say in ice.\t  From what I’ve tasted of desire\t  I hold with those who favor fire.\t  But if it had to perish twice,\t  I think I know enough of hate\t  To know that for destruction ice\t  Is also great\t  And would suffice.
The article is full of prejudice disguised as science - Gay men are feminine. Straight men are shallow and gay men are shallower than straight men. How does he define shallow? Howdoes he measure shallow? Some science!  Some choice quotes - "So, is the conclusion that gay people do in fact move differently?" Stahl asked Rieger. "Yeah, absolutely," he replied.   "Straight men tend to be shallow in terms of focusing on looks. Gay men are shallow, too. Straight men are more interested than straight women in having casual, uncommitted sex. Gay men are like that, too," says Bailey. "One has the impression that gay men are much more inclined toward casual sex than straight men," Stahl said. 
I think you have fundamentally misunderstood something here.  Informed option, including that of the most ardent advocates of the patent system and its expansion, says that _all patents are evil_.  What the advocates argue is that _patents are a necessary evil_ and that _the benefits to society outweigh the harm_.  Misunderstanding this one leads to the _Magic Fairy Dust_ theory of patenting.  In J.M. Barrie's novel, _Peter Pan_, the children gained the ability to fly when sprinkled with _fairy dust_ which naturally falls from fairies when you shake them.  Many people have made the mistake of believing that salting their businesses with patents will make them fly, too.  Instead they turn out to be a wasteful opportunity cost.  See: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Parable_of_the_broken_window Laura Creighton    
This is so true. Often the reason for this hate is fear or insencitiveness and narrow mindedness. If I ever again have opportunity to hire a person into management position, this is what I do: I put them to work with people who are disabled or weak in some way. If they bully, show disgust, fear, hate, feelings of superiority, shame, anger or just can't act naturally, this will show their own weakness as a leader of people. Hell, I even may play disabled myself in situation where they don't know they are evaluated. Great leaders always treat people with dignity. Unfortunally even when they intentionally do them some harm. :(
Like I said, secondhand sources aren't enough for me to condemn the guy for whatever was said in this speech -- when I hear it from Pianka's mouth, then I'll believe it.  Quoting another secondhand source doesn't change that.   Pianka has the right to speak for himself in response to public attacks.  Maybe he's a nutcase, maybe he isn't, but it's remarkable how many people are rushing to pass judgment on him with no verifiable evidence.  I'll decide for myself based on the facts, thanks.
It implies that we are special. If humans are the same as other animals, we won't be able to destroy the earth. Of course, we aren't actually destroying the earth - just rendering it uninhabitable. Which is exactly the same as all other species do, on a much smaller scale.
This quote has been used a lot to support "Texas scientist advocates extermination of 90% of humanity by airborne Ebola" but it simply doesn't. I read http://www.zo.utexas.edu/courses/bio357/357evaluations.html and "Dr Doom" was pointing to various ways that natural systems will bring about a population equlibrium, the natural evoloution  of the ebola virus being one of them. I think that this article is misinterpretation, or worse.
We have created the environment and circumstances where it could be possible for a virus to decimate the world population. Increased travel in the past century means that an outbreak could spread in days and no part of the world would be untouched. Even as recently as 1918 - travel between continents took days or weeks and had an effect on rates that the flu epidemic spread. We saw with the fears over SARS how travel restrictions are possible - but there is a critical mass of cases which could be reached very quickly given the right organism which would make such restrictions meaningless.
obviously...
Since you asked, Gamasutra has some good articles covering how these things apply to game developers (probably not that different):  http://www.gamasutra.com/features/19970819/patent_law.htm  http://www.gamasutra.com/features/19970801/myth_and_facts.htm
ehm.. sbaglio o manca il link?
Seems like I suspected - the secondhand source, wannabe-scientist Forrest M. Mims III, was talking bullshit all along. Pianka was talking about possibilities, Mims made him sound like a mini-Hitler.
According to the credits, the voiceover was by Christian Hoening. If it's [this](http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0388522/) Christian Hoening, he's German. In fact, all google results on "Christian Hoening" return german pages.
I think mcdonalds eating americans may be less biodegradable than you think!
"secret"
Interesting that the things they say are so similar... If it was someone on the right saying things similar to a terrorist etc it would get much more milage I would guess.
Wow, ermm brilliant. Can I be a hip and cool liberal like them?
Wonder if the quality control on content will be better ;-)
*Soylent Green is made of people!!* That should be "Soylent Green is people!"
Damn, its nearly getting too popular.  Soon it will pass that point that products pass when they become popular and turn into a complete pile of crap. :-(
Some police don't take kindly to being policed.
There is actually a fourth guy out of sight holding a razor and waiting for the kitten to feel safe.  Once settled and playing with the flower held by one of the other three, Mr razor man pounces and shaves a swastika into the kittens fur.  Never be taken in by Nazi's - even innocent looking ones!
後で読む。
Once again the terrorists win...  &gt; Herb Wiseman, high school consultant for Lee County: “What happens if kids get on a train that blows up? We don’t have trains blowing up in America,” Amusingly, London parade officials [have released a statement](http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2006/04/01/world/main1461855.shtml) warning British travelers about the crime and homicide rates in Fort Myers.
I understand the point of the question, but it's way off target.  "Gay" means someone who is romantically attracted to others of the same gender.  "Anti-Semitic" means someone who discriminates against Jews.  You can't equate the two types of terms.   The point would be better made by using more comparable terms, like: what if, instead of saying "that is a gay car," we said "that is a Jew car."  Or, what if instead of saying "you like that song? what are you, gay?" we said "you like that song? what are you, a Jew?" Regardless, it's an important point to make, and one I've been making for years.  You can't say "nigger" on TV (and rightfully so), but you can say "fag" all you like.  No single minority group is any more deserving of respect &amp; protection than any other.  Shit, we even still have a pro football team with a name that insults American Indians: the Washington Redskins.  How quickly would we have changed the name of a team called the New York Hooknoses, or the Carolina Thicklips, or the Seattle Slanteyes?
Usability sucks. - Horizontal Scrollbars on my standard 17" monitor  - Nasty interruption pages asking you to conduct 50-question marketing surveys  - Ugly, spindly serif fonts that are hard to read  - Streaming mulimedia (why do I want to listen to a reporter read a story when I can ... read the story?) 
One of the most amazing pieces of architecture in the world, and you guys are saying "look at the bear"?  (oh, and yes, it is a dog by the way)
Here's how to spot propaganda:  If someone's beliefs are described as absolutely Disney-villian evil, and that person's views are received with a standing ovation, you can pretty much bet something is being misrepresented.  But don't  listen to  me.  I'm one  of  those baby-hating, criminal-loving people who want to force everyone to be gay and now apparently actually wants 90% of people to die horribly.  Wait till next week when MTV will broadcast our plan to inscribe the name "Satan" in big letters on the surface of the moon. 
Of course the trains have to arrive first. Ba dum tish!
the same site gives [statistics for os share](http://marketshare.hitslink.com/report.aspx?qprid=5), and has macs at almost 4.5%, up from 3.5% in May last year .. interesting though that the number of windows computers seems to have been fairly steady over that period, but the percentage of 'other' has gone almost half a %. The other is sadly likely to be distros of linux. so no matter how good macs become the competition they steal customers from is linux?
it'll be interesting to see if this happens with the non-commercial model of open souce .. i agree with you that good products tend to go bad when they gain popularity and the stakes get higher. my only hesitation from having complete confidence in firefox is that they do earn quite a fair bit of money from the browser through tie ins with various other companies ..
How that money is going to be used is currently being discussed throughout the community. What you can be sure of, is that it will in the end benefit Mozilla and its derived products!
Ironic that the user interface for 37signals' manifesto is so awkward.
So you think the optimum level is 300M at most, even though three billion humans are well-fed?  In *my* humble opinion, your humble opinion doesn't make any sense.
puts File.readlines('numbers.txt').join rescue puts "Error!" ;-)
Considering that wine has been able to run IE6 for ages, it's already been impressive for a long time. To get 6, 5.5 &amp; 5 (the whole mess) installed with one script, go to [WineHQ](http://appdb.winehq.org/appview.php?versionId=469) or directly to http://www.tatanka.com.br/ies4linux/.
They forgot "winning the lottery"
"Professor Pianka said the Earth as we know it will not survive without drastic measures. " "what good is a lizard: what good are you?" Taking the point about lizards vs. people, you could also ask "why does the earth as we know it" need to survive? Even if humans cause a major extinction event, then the Earth will recover in some other form that is no better or worse than the one now. And even it it doesn't, so what?
good point. i think it might be because it isn't legal, although maybe it should be. As it is now, even in the legal organ trade, a lot of people make a lot of money on transplants, except the donors or the donors family. 
Bu güzel eklenti sayesinde belli zaman araklılları içinde  Dünyadaki deprem haraketlerinin özetini durum çubunuzdaki  eQuake bölümünden görebiliyorsunuz. Örnek görüntü ;  http://img214.imageshack.us/img214/8058/ffequake0mi.jpg
Amen!
eQuake eklentisini indirebileceğiniz bağlantılar ; http://www.freebookzone.com/firefox/equake.xpi https://addons.mozilla.org/extensions/moreinfo.php?application=firefox&amp;id=2239
Notice the doctor's reaction when she says she feels as if she can't go on any more. That's how it's supposed to work. I have heard a lot of scary stories about doctors not taking suicidal patients seriously.
I hate the new design. The text is too small and the columns are too wide. It's really dumb. Wide layout or small fonts -- choose one! Ugh. Also "Tech" stories aren't on the front page any more -- WTF?
Thank you Paul for getting people discussing what is a very important issue.  However, I don't agree with some of your argument.  You seek to justify the status quo by pointing to the absence of patent actions against small companies.  However, in doing so, you fail to address the economic/moral justification for patents in the first place and whether a monopolistic intellectual property right is appropriate for a knowledge based industry, such as software development.  Furthermore, I think there are a number of reasons why there has been less patent litigation which you don't seem to address, such as the uncertainty in Europe as to the legitimacy of software patents.  If those wanting software patents have their way and we have software patents at a global level, I am sure we will see more litigation.  You are right that you may not be sued as a start-up, but just because you are going to be sued once you have some money does not make patents less of a threat to innovation or the business economy as a whole.  Patent litigation is expense and every penny spent on filing patents, hiring lawyers, hiring technical staff to review existing patents etc costs money and takes time away from creating other innovative software.  As a lawyer, I can also tell you that making commercial agreements in a software patent world is much harder because of the common request from partners for intellectual property indemnities.  These indemnities are often very hard to give for start ups (due to accounting rules and how indemnities need to be dealt with at a balance sheet level) and pose an indirect barrier for small businesses in agreeing development agreements etc.  Whilst we have software patents then those with the money to fund litigation remain a threat to smaller companies and they may not be suing today but whose to say they won't sue tomorrow - in terms of risk management, the risk is still there.  In terms of directors of small companies 'acting in the best interests' of their companies, one cannot simply turn a blind eye to the issue of patents. For a detailed consideration of why software patents are not appropriate for the software industry in the context of the European debate, I would urge you to read my article on software patents, particularly the sections of whether software patents benefit the software industry.  http://www.groklaw.net/article.php?story=20060115145429444   Regards Cristian Miceli 
I don't see any scientific validation of his cliam that straight men tend to be shallow and gay men shallower.
Looks nice, but my folks had one about 20 years ago. Nice how things go full circle.
The BOLO is here: http://www.bcpba.org/ (it's in the PDF download on that page).
i appreciated this post both as a programmer and former architecture student. his accounts of the burnout architecture students is a bit haunting to anyone who has been there.
This has been telegraphed for quite a while.  How can anyone be surprised when this happens?
Woz talks about Ron Wayne in his interview on IT Conversations also.
A slightly less extreme strategy is the [Voluntary Human Extinction Movement](http://www.vhemt.org), which suggests "Phasing out the human race by voluntarily ceasing to breed will allow Earth's biosphere to return to good health." A worthy cause perhaps, but I wonder about it's effectiveness.
fuck all the nations! I want a passport that's International.
You will find a very good explanation of the problematic about offending God's prophet in Islam and its tragical consequences...
Everyone should be more tolerant, but respectful.
hmmmm, no answer from jesusphreak... perhaps he's backed himself into a logical corner and can't get out. Look, people, this whole line of discussion is forgetting one simple thing: don't look too hard at the bible for logic.  It's not about that.  It's about faith.  **If you ask too many questions you don't have faith.**
I sure hope the school board and superintendent feel this when  election time comes...
Great Advice!
If trading time-limited monopoly against secrecy is good (which it might be), 20 years of monopoly is a gross overpay in software industry. We clearly miss a market to adjust "prices" here. 
Good point.  Effeminate, gay men are sort of in a strange place.  Many consider themselves to be masculine and are offended if you suggest otherwise.   I know several gay males that are "normal" guys and they are attracted to masculinity, not to a gender-confused male.  If they wanted something girly, why not build relationships with, uh, girls?
The movie trailer is now available [here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QT3phlfyoFY).
FWIW, Safari passes the Acid2 test.
I never can figure out how something will get modded on reddit... How did this comment get the same negative mod as "This story's a turd.  You all are just karma whores."  ?
haha, I thought the same thing.  The content is great, though.
Useful ..yet there are some other widely practiced activities that are proven to make you happier in short term such as masturbation, watching porn, smoking crack, etc... 
Thanks for researching and finding the references.   Could we call him a human-hater?  Self hating biologist?
Unless of course, they are all very fond of lizards, and less fond of humans.
By 50,000 years ago, Homo neanderthalensis and Homo sapiens had long since split.  Humans are not descended from Neanderthals.  Either Neanderthals were singing 50,000 years ago - which raises serious questions about both evidence and relevance that were not touched on in the article - or Professor Mithen uses the word "Neanderthal" when he means "Cro-magnon" or "Early Homo sapiens" - in which case he's not very credible as an evolutionary anthropologist.
I was not talking about hunger level - I was talking about population that Earth can handle. Don't mis-quote like Mims does!
Controlled research trials prove vegerarian diet's efficacy.
Humans have a robust capacity to learn and retain new information unconsciously, retaining habit memory even when conscious or declarative learning is absent.
The earth isn't over populated.  We have tons of space.  There is plenty of food with the supply only increasing.  We haven't had any mass famine that couldn't be attributed to war.  Our natural resources are abundant, over the past 150 years the prices have fallen about 80%.  The number of trees are increasing.  We are living longer.  Quality of life in general is increasing across the world.
(via inhabit.com)
That single pair of twins also lacks any real sexual data.  They're 9 years old, nowhere in the article does it mention any sexual attractions (hard to measure at that age I imagine).  And it's clear that the parents treated the two boys differently once they figured out something was different.  Not a good study case to build any conclusions from.
Why your child's brain takes longer to develop.
Smoking crack while on a walk? Watching porn while doing some minor chore you've been putting off for a while? Masturbating while doing something creative-painting, woodworking, sculpting with clay.
As far as april fools jokes go I give this one a 3/10.
So if I lie to get your attention, in this situation, that's a good thing?
Ah the old "Everyone else is doing it so it must suck because I'm too cool to do things the majority of people do" syndrome.
Yes, we have also created an environment where our best scientistific minds can be linked over the internet to cooperatively battle any new desease.  Don't give up so quickly on mankind.  We aren't dead yet.  
"How to make a peanut butter and jelly sandwich", along with, "how to make instant coffee" will follow shortly.
He owns eleven pairs of sneakers, hasn’t worn anything but jeans in a year, and won’t shut up about the latest Death Cab for Cutie CD. But he is no kid. He is among the ascendant breed of grown-up who has redefined adulthood as we once knew it and killed off the generation gap.
From the link:  Now, suppose that you drank water that was 50 degrees Fahrenheit. Your body must burn a few calories to warm the water to body temperature of 98.6 degrees. To raise one pint of 50 degree water the 48.6 degrees to body temperature, about 12.25 calories are burned. That doesn't sound like much, but suppose you drink only 3 pints a day for a year; that's almost 4500 calories or 1.4 to 3.1 pounds of weight loss.
s/dumber/less-educated/g
Studies have shown that high fiber diets may help reduce body weight and beans are an excellent source of fiber. 
NOT WORK SAFE
Splitting parents who shack up with new partners can unwittingly push their children towards cannabis use. 
New prediction model assists doctors in determining the chance of recurrence of cancer in high risk breast cancer patients who have undergone a mastectomy followed by radiation therapy.
"We do not support Mozilla or Netscape." -- movielink.com This will be good for their sales to the geek population.
The finding could lead to improved infertility treatment, cancer therapy and pest management.
Nobody seems to have commented on one of the largest problems with patents. Consider the original purpose of patents: to stop people just keeping things secret (even things that other people knew, by way of threats of force). Obviously this is praiseworthy: nobody wants a return of the Venetian glassblowers' situation. The point of the patent system is to force publicity by publishing the would-be secret in a form that one skilled in the art can use to reimplement the invention. And already, here, current software patents fall down. When was the last time you heard of anyone searching patent databases to discover nifty techniques? I've never heard of anyone doing it and I doubt I ever will. The software patent databases are very nearly a write-only resource. As I see it the causes of this are: - until recently, most databases of patents were not efficiently searchable: you had to pay a patent lawyer a lot of money and wait a long time. This seems to be getting better, slowly.  - nobody dares search for useful info, because if anything else they stumble across matches something they've already done, they suddenly have to license it, too, or pay through the nose for wilful infringement (triple damages, or something, isn't it?)  - there is very little useful info to find, because the patents are so vague and woolly and written in such legalistic language as to be wholly unreadable. (Maybe a very few exceptional patents aren't like this, but if so I've never seen one. Probably Paul's are better!)  I don't know if it's the fault of the original author of the patent or the fault of the lawyers for redrafting it (to make it ludicrously broader) and removing every vestige of utility from it...  - thanks to court judgements in certain countries (the UK for one, if I recall) which state that computing professionals are not competent to judge whether a patent is relevant to something they've been working on (only patent lawyers are considered competent), if you ever look at a patent database in those countries you're essentially condemned to having a patent lawyer look at every line of code you write from then on to make sure you're not violating that patent, or you can be considered a wilful infringer again. Given how much patent lawyers cost, this is totally impractical.  - the fact that patent owners can decide how much to charge and can charge different amounts to different people means that if a patent owner wants, he can ban you from doing anything which infringes anything in his (probably huge) patent library; patent owners also often charge a significant percentage of total revenue, making it impossible to develop a product at all if more than a couple of trolls get interested (oops, that's 150% of your revenue you've promised). Protoindustrial extortion was survivable because you generally only had a *few* corrupt courtiers on your case, and they didn't try to take more than everything you owned. As such, there's little point looking for more than one or two useful patents over the entire lifetime of a project, and given the oops-I-ran-over-that-now-I-have-to-license-it syndrome, even doing that is much too dangerous (who knows how many other things you might run over? Will it be more than your project's revenue can stomach?)  In practice with profit margins being what they are, few can afford to license patents at all: all they get used for is cross-licensing MAD stuff and spoiler attacks ('we want to buy you and will use this to force the price down').  - Plus, of course, if something is patented, free software is blocked from implementing it without the largesse of the patent holder, and even that largesse is often revocable. So if you ever want to work on free software you'd better avoid ever searching a patent database, lest you become contaminated and liable for wilful infringement again. Many of these problems strike me as being intrinsic to the idea of patents. So yes, I do think patents are simply wrong. The sooner they vanish the happier I'll be (and I say that as someone who'd be long dead without the pharmaceutical and medical industries: despite that I *still* think patents do much more harm than good).
If you are a mouse, then stretching before you exercise is a good thing, but if you're reading this for yourself, it's a bit more complicated.
err, that there are parents who wish for differently gendered children, in spite of what the children themselves want. "No parent tries to create a gay child. Clearly he expressed a desire for those things in the first place."
Seriously - if you need to be told this stuff then you don't deserve happiness.
Erections make people happy.
Not only do happy people live longer than curmudgeons, but they also lead healthier lives.
I wonder how they decide who gets to create the April Fools joke each year.
24, 36, 48 hours - it's not important.  Important is doing RIGHT things, not doings things quickly.  When you focus on time management optimization, you can lose the goal.
Police, magistrates and Youth Offending Teams feel that they have little choice than to hand out harsher punishments for young offenders despite the government’s emphasis on tackling the underlying causes of their criminal behaviour, new research has revealed.
You are absolutely right!  My mistake.  I've only seen the movie once.  The rest of my exposure has been through allusionary references in popular media. :)
The Cape Malay Choir Board is probing the first incident of violence at its annual competition in 65 years, when members of troupes allegedly stabbed and pistol-whipped rivals in full view of 8 000 shocked spectators at Athlone Stadium at the weekend.
I read that as "McDonalds is eating up Americans and the resulting food product is less biodegradable than you think." Soylent green is people!
Frankly, this seems like a great BOLO to help end racial profiling and harassment of law abiding citizens. Why does it take a BOLO?
I was really hoping for some tips on leaving longer.  Instead I get some crap about longevity.
Alcatel's share [jumped 6%](http://www.businessweek.com/ap/financialnews/D8GOGEF00.htm?campaign_id=apn_home_down&amp;chan=db) after the announcement
Hmmmm.... an estimated 80% of America is Christian.  Are you an american? If so, you are in vogue. 
Ok, you are either a troll intentionally being an asshole, or need to just turn off the computer and go back to reading your bible.
That sounds about right, yes.
Poorly edited title and the article doesn't provide much in the way of evidence.  Nay.
Yeab but that just isn't as cute as a giant turtle.
Thanks, now I'm fired! Spare any change?
Whats up
Suppose instead that you don't worry about cold water and go walk for at least twenty minutes a day. Average there is around 100 calories per day, which adds up to 36500 calories. By your most conservative estimate that would be 11.3 pounds of weight loss. This could easily be accomplished without dedicating time by planning for it as you go, like simply parking further from the door when you go shopping.
Thanks for the warning. My usual routine is middle click on link, left click on comments. :)
Welcome to Philip Greenspun's world, where anecdotes equal data. (not saying I disagree with him, but he makes broad generalizations like this a *lot*)
Hmmm. April Fools?
&gt; I can't think of a startup that avoided working on some problem because of patent trolls. That's because it doesn't make news when it happens. After all, what is there to report? Without implementation, it's usually difficult to say what the effect would have been. As you write, design is hard to quantify; the effect of a hypothetical startup with an unrealised invention much more so. Usually, the best that could be written about the situation would belong in sci-fi, not in the news. Even when there's a clear benefit - maybe an 85% saving of network traffic - you may get [a blog entry or a webpage](http://ozlabs.org/~rusty/rproxy.html), but not much else. Of course, the rproxy case is boring - but the more exciting and revolutionary an invention, the less likely you are to be able to get credible numbers for what its effect would have been if it had been allowed to go ahead. So your statement is a fallacy; the reason you can't think of such examples is because the very problem you're discussing means that they will die before they reach your attention.
[here's the 'reasoning'](http://www.nytimes.com/2006/04/02/business/02ednote.html?_r=1&amp;8dpc&amp;oref=slogin) for the redesign according to their editor. Seems to me that they're really wanting to push the multimedia aspect of things... who wants multimedia from a print publication?!?
Hmmm. Entered 89128 (here in Las Vegas). Doesn't seem to show any casinos in Las Vegas at all. I'm pretty sure we have one or two...
The article is meant for startup companies (particularly software companies) that are interested in creating a website that can actually work for them.  Simple, practical advice for startup entrepreneurs.
As already mentioned in another comment:   What makes saving the Earth a worthy cause, if not saving it for humans?  Humans are the creatures that assign values to things.  No humans, no value for anything.   Without humans, nothing is either worthy or unworthy, it just is.  The universe itself is cold and indifferent.  And so is Nature: species come, species go.
AllOFmp3 is the shit. They offer both lossy and lossless (for albums released after 2004) formats for their downloads: * mp3  * Apple AAC (lossy and lossless)  * Windows WMV (lossy and lossless)  * Ogg  * Flac  * APE (Monkey's Audio) Not only that, but they also allow you to specify your bitrate for each lossy format. Apple's iTMS pales in comparison. I don't know about you, but this is what I expect, when I'm actually shelling out money to buy music online: freedom to choose my music's sound quality. I'm not paying $13 for a CD on iTunes to have it encoded *only* in a lossy format. For that kind of money, I could've gone to the music store myself and bought the CD. 
No, no, this is real.
Ottimo Mini PC su base Linux ad un prezzo accessibile
The strength of a nation is in it's families.  What happens when the institutions of family &amp; marrige are attacked from all sides? As seems to be happening. 
I'm childfree, by choice.  But, goodness, I hadn't realized I was attacking family and marriage. I'd better go dig a ditch, or make battle plans or something. Not to mention break the whole attacking marriage thing to my wife.
I have referenced, recalled something from, and / or recommended this book (actually, the revised Strunk &amp; White ed.) I would guess once a month since it was assigned reading in English Comp. 1020 back in...ohhh...2001 / 2002 or so. 99% of the things that drive "English Nazi" types crazy could be avoided if people took the 2 - 3 afternoons it would take to read this book cover to cover.
Also, download IronPython to get a free 1.7x speed improvement: http://www.gotdotnet.com/workspaces/workspace.aspx?id=ad7acff7-ab1e-4bcb-99c0-57ac5a3a9742 
Amusingly (thankfully maybe!), this replaces the "Dr Doom" story at the top of the front page. Maybe people do stop feeling the need to reproduce once they reach a certain standard of living.
"strength of a nation is in it's families" - what does that even mean? Yes, raising childern properly is improtant, that's why we shouldnt impose this task on people who do not want it.
Well, there is, but it's for submitting links and not comments.
Yes, this is straight up harassment.  I just couldn't figure out a way to get the full sense of the story in a sentence that didn't stretch across the page.
Higher risk of mortality in men is directly associated with visceral fat in the abdomen.
How does the personal choice to not have children effect the "institution" of marriage? Go ahead and have all the kids YOU like.  Or perhaps we should force people to have children?
&gt;"We believe it is up to the individual to decide what &gt;constitutes a family," he says. "It's not up to the state." I agree with the guy in the article: what you define as family is your choice. With that said, a I'm curious of the impact these childfree families will have on the society in the coming years. Or will it have any impact at all?   
Comparing the associations between faith and health, a physician has shown the improvements in life expectancy of those who attend religious services on a weekly basis.
All the cool people are using [Grail](http://grail.sourceforge.net/) now ;-) Yeah, there's a lot of that mentality about. There's a need to feel special, or an oppressed minority ("Feh, they were better before they went sold out!"). Then again, it may just go sour - it will be interesting to see whether the increased usage will lead to more malware or nasty extensions being developed for it.
Mother's nutritional status in pregnancy also affects the behavior and personality of the child as well.
Scary stuff, though the article doesn't address whether there are plans for what happens after such strikes. One wonders if there are any such plans.
What? A Linux user would advocate using a non-opensource program? And a "M$" program, at that?  Wonders never cease.
I suppose we will see how long a society can offer such a high standard of living while the population shinks.
inescapable mortality?
I used Turbo Tax premium  online version and it was very well programmed. User friendly. And damn easy.
I'm asking a genuine question here.  Not pointing fingers, FTFA it mentions about childless people getting the same support from the government as families with children.  Imagine this happened, all of a sudden it becomes even more expensive to have children, and remember even now it's not cheap. So in a way it's an attack on the family. But hey if you dont want to have kids that fine, but your only following a liberal trend(I assume your liberal). By not having kids your taking part in the liberal baby bust.  http://www.usatoday.com/news/opinion/editorials/2006-03-13-babybust_x.htm
PG is still annoying, after all these years.
Because we really do force people to have kids against their choice.
Yeah, spamming reddit is really good publicity for your site. Keep it up.
&gt; having kids gets in the way of buying crap and blogging about it. Why do people who have problems with the idea of being childfree always assume that people who make this choice do so because they wish to have more money to "buy crap"? Is it not possible that the decision not to have children can be made for legitimate ethical reasons?  Should everyone be a parent? &gt; if we don't make them ourselves we will have to import them This is the same old argument that was previously trotted out [here](http://reddit.com/info?id=3msg). Some people expect Western women to become breeding factories just so our nations' population will "look like they used to". It seems that we've come full-circle back to that antiquated belief that it is somehow our duty in life to go forth and multiply to preserve our race/religion/culture/social security system.
Your presumption is that, by not having children, a couple necessarily "attacks" other couples with children. But this is a fallacy. Forgetting for a moment the speculative nature of your claims, it just doesn't follow. What is the mechanism you propose that would make it more expensive? In fact, it's the case right now that the government has made having children (provided you are middle class) quite cheap through tax breaks, even if one gets divorced.  Oh yes, and that "liberal baby bust" article is bunk, as was pointed out in the Reddit comments when submitted.
Wait a second, Scientific American is a *scientific* magazine, and why should they hire anyone who rejects the most fundamental tenet of biology?  Is that really "thought police" to you?  What if he rejected the theory of electro-magnetism, should he still be hired by Scientific American? Creationists famously misunderstand biologists (and geologists and cosmologists) and twist their words.  Now that I know that Mims is a creationist, the most likely explanation of this incident is that Mims is misrepresenting Pianka's words.  Mims even tells us that he's not getting Pianka right: &gt;In his last e-mail, Pianka wrote that I completely fail to understand his arguments. He's basically just persisting in misinterpreting Pianka to try to discredit biology and the scientific establishment, in my opinion. So thanks for the Wikipedia link, I'm now certain that Mims is just blowing smoke up all our asses.
Sex?
If Italy has 1.33 children per two adults, then every generation will be ~66% of the last, that means in 100  years, once the older population dies off, the population of Italy will have crashed. The government there is frightened and it has good reason to be.  They will have to face a very real economic nightmare in a couple generations at this rate. The reason?  Having children is hard.  It is in the best interest of the government and their society to make it as easy as possible to rear a child, and as hard as possible not to.
Another day... another person confusing cause with co-relation.
hi, what do you mean by confusing?  Am I doing something wrong here?  Thank you for your answer.
Notice the difference between the word "impose" and "force". Something like "the stength of the nation" should not be a determining factor when deciding to have a child.
&gt;It seems that we've come full-circle back to that antiquated belief that it is somehow our duty in life to go forth and multiply. That is the point to life, any life.  If it wasn't, then there would be no life.  It may be antiquated (ie the dawn of time and exsistance?), but it is still a fact. I'm glad the fucking socialists and commies choose not to breed.  Step in the right direction. "Childfree" This state of existance certainly needed a PC term.
This is just a reaction to Mims, not an independent account.
I also recommend the book, [Being Logical](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/1400061717). It is about effective logical thinking, that will help us in arguments and finally writing essays. &gt; McInerny, in Being Logical, becomes to thinking what Strunk and White have long been to writing. A voice of common sense, a voice reminding us what the essentials are.  &gt; Consider the following McInerny reminder: *"The whole purpose of reasoning, of logic, is to arrive at the truth of things. This is often an arduous task, as truth can sometimes be painfully elusive. But not to pursue truth would be absurd, since it is the only thing that gives meaning to all of our endeavors."*
That's actually an interesting concept. Many jingoist governments in history have actually advertised that idea as valid-- you have kids because you're patriotic. Nazi Germany certainly was one, although it was a little more than jingoistic. The Old Testament has this too. So it's not as unprecedented as one might think, although it's still unjustified.
The white and asian american birth rates are below replacement and falling.  The rate for brown and black americans are also falling but not yet below replacement rate.  The US grows only by immigration (legal and not) and a little by increased longevity. This is basic economics.  In non-/low-industrialized societies children are a resource, in industrialized ones they are a luxury.
Good analysis of how the immigration fears are blinding Americans to broader geopolitical and global issues that are of far greater importance.
I am childfree.  I believe I strengthen my nation and world by doing good works.  I volunteer.  I give money to good causes.  I would be a horrible parent. AND, I do believe there is an overpopulation problem in this world.  I believe choosing to not have children is one of the least selfish decisions a person can make.  What unselfish reasons are there TO have children?  JUST to prop up your country?  I have no problem with people from overpopulated regions moving to the US (or to Italy or wherever).  Or to keep the social security system (a ponzi scheme) from collapsing?  I have no objection to saving for my own retirement.  Ponzi schemes always suck for those who paid in and won't get anything back, but they can't last forever.
definetely agree..there are too many kids with out a home as it is, the last thing we need is more unwanted unplanned kids
using a modification of the mollio css.... site in beta
I think it's good for people to see this sort of thing.  It's too easy to think that the Nazi's were evil animals nothing like us. When you realize that they were people with families and friends and who played with kittens, it becomes easier to see how we can do evil just like they did.  And why we must never assume that it can't happen again.
You are full of shit. Yes, of course there are many people who don't have children because they wouldn't be able to buy as much shit for themselves. Perhaps some of the people mentioned in the article would fall into this category. Feel free to ridicule them. Perhaps your experience at the BMW dealers &amp; at the Stanford mall would acquaint you with these people. There are also lots of people who don't have children because they don't want them for other reasons. Some of them feel that too many parents have children *because of their materialism*. I'm sure you would agree that there are lots of people out there that would make terrible parents. Some of them have the self-awareness to recognize that in themselves, and then don't have children. They deserve a fucking medal.
anecdote does equal data.  Just not very much.
Reminds me of a comment from a fellow college student years and years ago, he from New York City, me from a small upstate town.  He basically said people not from "The City" all seemed so slow (ie, dumb).  I think there is a cultural difference in that people in urban environments are often "sped up" compared to those from more rural settings, and the urbanites often perceive it as a difference in intelligence.
But don't tell anyone, couse it is a secret you know, I trust you guys.
When you end a line with a single linebreak, the linebreak will not show up after posting.  Assuming this is intended, then a note in the help for comments explaining that you should end a line with two spaces would be helpful.  I hit this a bunch of times where my formatting became oddly screwed up.  I only found out about the solution when someone else asked about it and a user explained. Alternately if this is a bug, then it would be nice to see it fixed.
I don't see the errors here.  Anyone know a lot about Buddhism and want to comment?  Srid?
This is pointless. There's only two tips you need for speed with python: 1. Write beautiful, easy to read code 2. Profile and convert critical bottlenecks to C   Voila! Now you have easy to read, easy to maintain code. ;)
Boosts Human Growth Hormone? So if you laugh enough you can fail Steroid testing? o_0
Maybe, just maybe, the "secret" aspect of the talks isn't that they're happening, but the exact content... as in, whatever is said there will be classified.
The elder-welfare systems were built on the assuption that people would continue having many kids and that lifespans would stay about static -- not good assumptions. But the government doesn't make children, people do, so they are stuck making incentives to have children (or to import them).  As a parent, I fine with them sending me incentives :) Seriously though people who don't want children shouldn't have them, (and certainly not for money), they won't make good parents.  And yes it's selfish (I don't see why they want or bother to deny this), but selfish people shouldn't have kids.  So it's OK.
&gt; But hey if you dont want to have kids that fine, but you're only following a liberal trend(I assume your liberal). By not having kids you're taking part in the liberal baby bust. WTF ever. By breeding as cultural warfare, you're only following a fascist trend. Zed, on the other hand, probably has personal reasons for his decision.
here's a tip for you, elite business guy: learn the difference between "its" (possessive) and "it's" (contraction).
On May 13th 1917, at a time when one part of the world was in war with the other and when people needed spiritual guidance and something strong to believe in, the Virgen Mary made her appearance to three young children who were taking care of their sheep near their village called Aljustral.
&gt; visit the mall and do a short demographic test. visit the bmw dealers and make some observations. I'm sure if you visit a mall or a BMW dealership you will be guaranteed to find plenty of people, childless or otherwise, whose lives revolve around "buying crap". I'm not so sure that this proves anything above the attitude of people who remain childless.
With the continual rise in the cost of gasoline, most consumers welcome the new breed of cars in the form of hybrid cars. Hybrid cars use multiple propulsion systems to provide power. It combines the use of gas and also electric to power up the car.
Good advice, but not necessarily all you need to do. My girlfriend's father, for instance, started an online lingerie website (thelingerieconnection.net) and it works. Sales, however, have not been consistently good. The point is that Web 2.0 people need to think about advertising too. It doesn't matter how good your website is if nobody's ever heard of you!
The "criticisms" here are based on a mountain of assumptions and statements presumably meant to stand as axioms. In short, there's not enough meat in this "article" to support anything said.  The author, for example, states that Western Buddhism is Buddhism with "its real heart removed." Okay... so what do you mean by that? What's your evidence? Can you give even one example? Anything?  Garbage.
&gt; No humans, no value for anything. "if a tree falls in the woods and nobody's there to hear it, does it make a sound?" Does the universe deserve existence without any human perception of it? Does the Earth? All valid questions to ponder on, sure. If you have no friends or interactions with anybody, can I justify your murder? What about abortion: If an unborn baby's foetus is unloved even by it's mother, does it deserve to be born at all? Are we talking about some kind of "garbage collected" universe, where things are deleted as soon as they're not prercieved? Could I morally justify myself in suicide bombing a market square, because without my ongoing perception of it, the world does not exist and therefore neither the bloody carnage? Hmm.. I'd like to think that we owe some moral responsibilities to the planet of our conception. I don't think utter extinction is necessary, but moderation would be a good policy to apply to the population of the human race.
&gt; The Old Testament has this too. So it's not as unprecedented as one might think, although it's still unjustified. For much of the 20th century, in many European countries (and I'm sure elsewhere), the Catholic church insisted it was a woman's duty to produce as many children as possible. Those women who were unable to or chose not to do so were effectively branded as failures, and sometimes demonised. There's an interesting article [here](http://www.beliefnet.com/story/167/story_16728_1.html) on the topic.
The odds of the referenced virus in the article killing 90% of the Human Population are - specificly - zero.   "AIDS is not an efficient killer, he explained, because it is too slow. His favorite candidate for eliminating 90 percent of the world's population is airborne Ebola ( Ebola Reston )" Ebola Reston is non-symptomatic in humans.  It kills some lower primates very effectively, but is non-lethal and non-transmissable by humans.  Several human infections occured in the Reston outbreak, none of which exhibited anything more serious than a low grade fevor.  
Greenspun writes some very interesting articles but often he fails to recognize there is a country between the two coasts with actual people living there. I wonder how many people in Liberal he actually talked to or did he just glance over at the Wal-Mart as he zoomed through town and make a snap judgement?
&gt; It is about effective logical thinking, that will help us in arguments if only
Paranoid Idiots for $1,000, Alex.
Interestingly, he talks all about meeting the people between the two coasts in his free online book, Travels with Samantha: http://www.photo.net/samantha/
Or better yet, find someone to proof-read my articles before I post them. Good catch.
Awesome.  I guess they own everything now.
Not a 'Trailer'  Merely a 'Teaser'
They're not advocating using IE.  It's just remarkable that you can run it on Linux using Wine.
Agreed, but that's a whole different problem. The article was intended on making the website "work" for you to optimize the traffic you have. Now, getting any traffic/visibility in the first place is obviously critically important -- otherwise, the site doesn't matter very much.
I'm from the South and we generally live life more slowly down here than in other parts of the country.  Perhaps it's a cultural thing left over from the pre-airconditioning days. Anyway, I've always liked the saying "It's better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to speak and remove all doubt". Perhaps a corollary can be developed "It's better to speak slowly and be thought a fool than to speak quickly and remove all doubt immediately"?
I found the entry about crossing the country in a small plane to be a lot more interesting than his trite observations about some redneck town.
Well, reproduction is certainly the point to life... if you're a dog, a paramecium, or a boa constrictor. But considering there are significant differences between us and them, I'd say your analysis is deficient--unless it's your position that the differences don't matter.  For my part, there are many reasons for living. We can think, reason, and create with our minds and even the most dim-witted among us have rich internal lives. Having children is one aspect of human life, but it is not the only one.  I, of course, won't dignify your last remark with a reply.
1) it was a cease-and-desist, not a lawsuit 2) in 2002
So Linux users don't actually use IE with Wine... they run it as a purely academic matter?
Personally, I wish sleep were optional.  Sometimes it's a convenient 'fast forward' button for life's more boring sections.  Other times, like, say...the first few weeks after a big game (read: Oblivion) comes out, or say when I have a week long vacation in Vegas, or Mardi Gras (pre-Katrina) in New Orleans, I'd just as soon stay awake the full 168hrs.
Did US Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice say the Bush administration’s made “thousands of tactical errors” in Iraq, but the “right strategic decision?” Or is that Napoleon, speaking through Condi from the grave?
Why will they have an economic nightmare in a couple of generations?  I can see that having less than 2.0 per couple means that there is a higher proportion of people in retirement, but we will hit that issue in one generations time, surely? After that, GDP will be hit, of course, but what matters (unless you happen to be sitting at the helm) is per capita GDP, which should not change other than for the above reason.
This applies to the illegal wiretap program because it is probably fully automated &amp; is based at the telco. However. An FBI report from a few years ago discussed computer wiretaps and the use of encryption. In one (pre-GWB) year, there were something like 700 wiretaps where the subject used encryption to protect their communications. In all cases, the FBI was able to surveil their targets without breaking the encryption. They just put a bug in your keyboard. Or a microphone in your phone receiver. Of course the FBI doesn't talk about the wiretaps it doesn't want to. So lord only knows what their political purposes were for releasing the report. But if they want to monitor *you*, they will.
&lt;quote&gt;Our goal when we set out to redesign The Times Web site more than a year ago&lt;/quote&gt; One year? and they end with light blue no-underline format for links that is hardly distinguishable from plain text. This makes everything seem pale, thin and colorless when compared to the inviting, vibrantly orange Times Select. Oh! now I'm definitely going to shell out money to be a part of the Times Select gated community!  
Synopsis: Liberals have few children.  Children always acquire the worldview of their parents.  Therefore Liberalism will die out. Sadly, the article doesn't point out how 'liberalism' managed to establish itself in the first place, against such fierce darwinian opposition.  Hint: one of the assumptions is not valid.
The patent system works wonderfully.  No one would have ever been able to figure out this string-phone thing without it.
Bizarre.  What's most unusual is when you find some places very close to each other which sound radically different, or when the samples from another country or region all sound less 'accented' than those from your own country.
All I can say to you thought-wankers is this - ask anyone who has ever had a child - "Do you regret having a baby? Do you feel all that parenthood has given you is less than what you have lost in freedom and expenses?"  Is there one person in THIS WHOLE WIDE WORLD answers who will answer in the positive? This is another sick expression of freedom in the western world, where everone - irrespective of age is treated as equal in wisdom. Just as I am fanboy #1 of the West's freedom of thought, I am hatemonger #1 of it losing it sense of proportion of those freedoms. This is why the rest of the world does not have these population problems (they have an overpopulation problem which is bad in its own way - but that's another topic).
Cool article on the importance of credibility
Recommendations about what and in what form?  Specs, I believe. Or are there some other specifcations for what defines HTML and XML than from the W3C?   More to the point concerning 'canvas', the "recomendation" vs. "standard" argument is probably a lost cause; asking people to adhere to recommendations just doesn't have the same "oomph." Yet I suspect that many of the same people who argue for designing with Web standards [sic] will be quiet on the use of the canvas element (as many of them are about the use of XMLHttpRequest) because it's too useful, W3C-sanctioned or not. 
This is amazing!
I'm sorry, but choosing not to have a child is entirely different from having a child and regretting it afterwards. Where does adoption fit into your argument? And what about abortion? Despite your insistence, I don't see how someone choosing to be childless is "sick". What makes that person a "thought-wanker"? Surely having a child and subsequently neglecting it is worse?
What's a non-selfish reason to have children?  [edit: vote this question down all you like, but what's more telling is that said voters don't answer the question]
you mean our collective voting choices might get worse?!?
Read the patent first!  It describes how to package a string-phone into a  small space so that it can be inserted in a cereal box, yet be easily  re-assembled by children.  It's actually quite clever and non-obvious.  - Rujith. 
You can't calculate only on that, You must take immigration and emmigration into account. 
A man jokingly placing an order for a "Microsoft 4ever"-engraved iPod from the Apple store gets an "Apple rocks"-engraved iPod instead.
Results from a Phase III study of a new drug show promise for patients with colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body.
Preschool children who usually eat meals at home while watching TV ate one third more lunch when they were shown a cartoon video during lunchtime versus when they ate lunch without TV.
Are you saying that people in, lets say, the third world are forced to have kids because they don't have the freedom too choose?  I can't think of anything forcing them to have kids, except lack of condoms
The pelvic examination can only occasionally detect ovarian cancer, generally when the disease is already in advanced stages.
Clever and non-obvious?  Umm.  Care to share *your* definition of those words with us, because the patent application that I just read certainly doesn't live up to them.
Yes, but you still added wealth because you could still have been sleeping and the time would have gone to waste.
I sell books through Amazon, and boy has this site been helpful.  A lot of people mess up their international addresses trying to figure out how to cram them into the fields that Amazon provides.  At least once every few months, I need to check here to make sure that what I'm sending will get where it is supposed to. 
u defitely missed the point.
not bad.  the geography is a bit off (algiers point, anybody?), but not bad.  Most of new orleans is tucked inside the "U" formed by the southern-flowing river turning east and then north, before winding around Algiers Point.
One of the best articles I've read in a while ... thanks Paul
If it's for "computer scientists," why doesn't it use programmer's syntax?
Maybe it would be better to make it us.reddit.com, move all US only stuff there. Those that want it can read it.
This was a very interesting article, I quite enjoyed reading it.  The comments here have also been very interesting and informative.  One thing that I think was missing from the article was how do patents affect someone who wants to give their idea to the world, and whose main goal is not to get rich from it?  I for example have an idea, which I believe is unique, and I am working on implementing the software for it.  I want to make it available to for everyone one to use.  The thing I fear is that some big corporation will usurp my idea and patent it themselves and essentially take it away from the world, just so they can use it as a weapon against some other megacorp.  It seems to me that this is precisely the opposite of what the patent system was designed to do.  I was just speaking with a lawyer last week and he tells me that in the US even after I have made my idea public, that someone else has a year to file a patent on the same idea.  I wish I had the money to patent the idea myself, just for the purpose of protecting for the people of the world, from this "corporate warfare" game.  In my case I feel like the patent system is definitely inhibiting innovation.
But I thought one of the great wins with virtualization was that it let you run *less* stable OSes on top of *more* stable ones, not the other way around...  Plus after MS's *long* history of (not-so) subtle incompatibilities, I'm not so sure that I trust MSVS to play nice with Linux on top.
The fact that democracies try to encourage marginal voters is clear evidence of the essentially parasitic nature of the state. Marginal voters are the most likely to be relatively uninformed, and thus tend to respond the best to crude political tactics that will not result in good public policy.  Therefore, anything that boosts turnout will probably be harmful to the interests of the citizens in general. Yet we never hear of a state encouraging uninformed citizens not to vote.
Well, I agree mostly with [this](http://www.geocities.com/scimah/argumentsagainstbuddhism.htm).
I agree, one big assumption and cultural legend is that mothers are completely selfless.   ** Warning, this is a rant only about selfish mothers. If you're truly selfless, this is not for you, so please don't read on or assume that this is a generalization for all mothers **  But many have children for entirely selfish reasons, for example: a) to fulfill their frustrated dreams, and so they invest every minute "molding" a future dysfunctional adult, b) to give their life meaning that they haven't been able to find elsewhere, c) just to fit in, d) to have someone to take care of them when they are old, e) to somehow hide the boredom of their lifes, f) to hide their lack of goals and purpose, and so devote every minute messing the children's lives, g) to be virtous in the eyes of others. No wonder mother's are the worldwide experts in inducing guilt besides priests.  Try going on a vacation to Hawai for Christmas instead of going back to your family, to find out how "selfless" they are: "Oh yes, boy, after all these years I spent raising you, this is how you pay. Don't worry, I won't bother gettting out of bed tomorrow.  I hope you enjoy your vacation and that you're happy now".  Or try deciding something against their will.   Many may look selfless, but they are keeping every expense in an accounting book and one day they start demanding payback. When you fail to fulfill their annointed vision, that's when hell starts.   When they start demanding that you solve their problems and needs, when they finally show all their rage for not fulfilling their selfish needs and desires, just say, "Mother, I didn't ask to be born".  
Well, parents won't admit that upfront.  But the amount of child abuse that goes on the world daily, shows that parents are blaming children for messing up their lifes.   There are many leves of psychological protection, but in the end, the actions show what's really behind.
Haha, I love The Times' comparison of the weather conditions: Fort Meyers: Hurricanes batter Fort Myers every decade - and it is getting worse. Hurricane Charley hit in 2004 and Hurricane Wilma in 2005. London: London features in the Met Office's records of extreme weather. In a month in 1890 the Borough of Westminster recorded no sunshine at all. 
yeah, I've already reached the moon's atmosphere.
Mr. Wiseman's (how's that for a name) reasoning is ridiculous. There are no trains blowing up in America *as yet*, but that doesn't mean anything. A year ago, there had been no trains blowing up in London, either. Five years ago, there had been no skyscrapers blowing up in America. Five hundred years ago, there had been no civil war in America. According to Mr. Wiseman, that means that the Civil War or 9/11 will never happen. Brilliant! Ah, one more thing. The London parade officials have my full support. I mean, just look at these figures: &gt; FORT MYERS  &gt;   &gt; Murders: 28.8 per 100,000  &gt; Rapes: 76 per 100,000  &gt;   &gt; LONDON  &gt;   &gt; Murders: 2.7 per 100,000  &gt; Rapes: 33 per 100,000
&gt;After the molecule completed about 10 rotations, the shock dwindled and the water molecules rushed back in. Forgive me for missing the big story here. 
Yes, parenting doesn't need a degree. There are people that get kicked out of school, can't keep a job for more than a month, spend their money in lottery tickets and alcohol, yet they have children and suddenly are assumed to be responsible citizens.  While the ones who have self-awareness are deemed irresponsible.
*Imagine what would result if a new Apple OS was based on the new Windows kernel rather than on Unix. It would be much more acceptable to a broad cross section of companies that wouldn't touch it with a ten foot pole today.* He lost me there...
packaging = innovation?
&gt; exporting video ( called DISPLAY )  &gt; -----------------------------------  &gt; you want to open display of REMOTE on LOCAL.  &gt; LOCAL should allow REMOTE to open display on LOCAL   &gt; For that on LOCAL we do  &gt;   &gt; LOCAL$ xhost +REMOTE_IP  &gt; example : [smr@inferno ]$ xhost +172.16.10.31* Another one who doesn't know what he's talking about. That is actually a **very bad idea!** Never use xhost! You allow everyone on that machine to read all your typing and view all your windows. The proper way to do this is is to use ssh -X. Or to give your ~/.Xauthority to the user you want to allow access your X.
&gt; *"strength of a nation is in it's families" - what does that even mean?* Because people learn to be people from their parents.
Because it's actually theoretical math, not compsci. In mathematics, abstraction is an end unto itself.
self-awareness? You are setting the bar fairly low.
In other words, smart kids are retarded.
&gt; United States Patent\t 4,195,707  &gt; Kupperman ,   et al.\t April 1, 1980 note the date...
"This is basic economics. In non-/low-industrialized societies children are a resource, in industrialized ones they are a luxury." This is completely witless.
Jakob Nielsen is irrelevant as well.
I've always thought there were multiple modes of "knowing".  Personal experience/knowledge is one mode.  Scientific is another.  Neither one always trumps the other, and each has it's strengths and weaknesses.   I do have to question the intelligence of someone who elevates one doctor's &lt;i&gt;opinion&lt;/i&gt; of the current state of scientific knowledge over his own fairly cut-and-dry direct experience of the opposite.  Not only did he go against what he clearly knew, but he accepted hearsay over direct knowledge.
This game is called Contra some of you might have heard of it. Basically this game is really fun! Just give it a try i know you'll like it. please submit feedback...
What certainly _doesn't_ make me happy is the thought of reddit turning into slashdot.
*Pssst!* The people on reddit do not want anything to be funny!
Ouch, the X part is indeed pretty bad. I only ever looked at the audio part (which is also unsecured, but that's usually less dangerous than unsecured X)
